The Original Documents from which much of this valuable .work was compiled having been lately deftroyed, and  the work itfelf being fcarce, it is hoped ita reproduftjon will  be an acceptable contribution to American Hiftory. Two Editions of the work have been publilhed ; the Firft,  or Williamfburg Edition (of which this is a reprint), in  1747, and the London Reprint in 173'3. In the " Hiftorical Magazine," Vol. II., page 184, a writer,  under the pfeudonym of B. Franklin, defcribes what he  confiders 'Two Williamfburg Editions, but which were, in  reality, the Editions of 1747 and 1753, but probably having  titles alike. In the fame Magazine, Vol. V., page 350, D. P. S [mith]  attempts to point out the difference in the Editions, but falls  into a double error : firft, in defcribing the Fine Paper Williamfburg Edition as correfponding with the London Edition in Type, Lines, Pages, and Ornaments ; and fecond, in  ftating that the "Poor Paper Williamfburg Edition" differs  from the Fine Paper of the fame place and date. As I have the three varieties now before me, I will endeavour to defcribe them. The Firft, or Williamfburg Edition, of 1747, appears to  have been printed on two varieties of paper, both the fame  fize, and both laid, one being thicker than the other. The  Signatures, Catchwords, Ornaments, &c., agreeing exaftly  with each other, and the error on page 104, which is printed  410, being alike in each. Signature S is mispaged. It fhould read 257 inftead of  247, and fo on to the end, adding 10 pageS to the whole  number (331) as they appear in this reprint. viii BIBLIOGRAPHICAL NOTICE. The fecond Edition has the following Title : — " The Hiftory of the Firft Difcovery and Settlement of Virginia. By  William Stith, A. M., Prefident of the College of William  and Mary in Virginia. Tanta molis erat * * * condere gentem.  Virg. Virginia, Printed : London, Reprinted for S. Birt,  in Ave-Mary-Lane. M.DCC.LIII." The Number of Pages, Signatures, &c., is the fame as in  the Williamlburg Edition. The pagination runs on regularly  up to page 304, then the reEio of Signature X is paged 295,  and fo on till it terminates at page 331 (for 341) as in the  other Edition. The Paper and Types are the fame as the Williamlburg  Fine Paper, but in other refpefts there are feveral variations. On pages i, 35, 101, 175, and 176, the Ornaments differ. On pages 21 and 119, the London Edition has Signature  marks not in the other. On pages 33, 73, 82, 84, 86, 89, 98, 99, 131, 171, 178,  179, 206, 208, 214, 225, 233, 238, and 244, the Catchwords  differ ; while Signature X appears to be precifely the fame in  each Edition, and in my copy of the London Edition, the  paper in this Signature differs from the reft of the volume. On page 308 of the Williamlburg Edition, there is a line  acrofs the page, over the foot-note. This is omitted in the  London Edition, On page 2 of the Appendix, the capital J is in Roman —  in the London Edition it is in Italic. Joseph Sabin. New York, 1865. THE HISTORY OF THE Firft DISCOVERY AND SETTLEMENT OF VIRGINIA: i BEING An ESSAY towards a General History of this COLONY. By William Stith, A. M. Re£tor of Henrico Parifti, and one of the Governors  William and Mary College.  of  Tantiz molis  erat *** condere gentem.  Virg. WILLIAMSBURG:  Printed by William Parks, M,DCC,XLVII. J -7^7THE PREFACE.  HE R E prefent the Reader with the firjl  Part of my Hijiory of our own Country.  When I had left my laborious Employment  at the College, and began to enjoy a little  Leifure., I could not think myfelf wholly difcharged from the Service of the Publick.  As therefore my late Uncle^ Sir John Randolph, had purpofed to write a Preface to our Laws, and  therein to give an Hijlorical Account of our Confiitution and  Government, but was prevented from profecuting it to EffeSl,  by his many and weighty Publick Employments, and by the  vaji Burthen of private Buftnefs from his Clients, I thought  the Hijiory of Virginia would he no mean or unacceptable Undertaking. For fuch a Work, well performed, muji naturally  he a great SatisfaSlion, and even Ornament, to our Country.  Beftdes which, I was farther induced by fome other Reafons.  It is now an hundred and forty Years, fmce the firji Difcovery and ^Settlement of Virginia ; and as many ufeful Papers  and Records, relating to our Hijiory, may probably be found  at prefent, which will perhaps be loji hereafter, I conceived  it high time, that fomething material Jhould be attempted in it.  For I need not fay, how empty and unfatisfaSiory every thing,  yet publijhed upon the Subjeii, is ; excepting the excellent but  confufed Materials, left us in Captain Smith'j Hijiory. I fpeak not this with the Pride and Malevolence of an Author, that would raife his own Reputation by depreciating his  Brother Writers ;• but it is a Cenfure moji jujily due to thofe,  who have yet meddled with our Hijiory, and which I, for  my own Part^ owe them, for the Vexation and Difappointment I met with, in reading their Works. And I can farther declare with great Truth, that had any thing of Confequence been done in our Hijiory, I could moJi willingly have  faved tnyfelf the Trouble, of conning over our old mu/iy Re- A 2 . cords. iv The P R E F A C E. . cords, and of Jiudying, conneSiing, and reconciling the jarring and disjointed Writings and Relations of different Men  and different Parties. However, I was firry to fee all our  Hopes at an End by the Death of Sir John Randolph ; and  was unwilling the Dejign Jhould be entirely abandoned, and  that our Hiftory Jhould Jiill remain in its old Confufton and  Uncertainty. I had alfi, by my Intimacy with that Gentleman, had the Sight and Perufal of many excellent Materials  in his Hands; and thought, I could not handfomely be denied  the Ufe of any thing elfe to my' Purpofe, either in our publick  Offices, or the Poffeffian of private Gentlemen. I may further add, that I at prefent enjoy a perfeSi. Leifure and Retirement, and am not burthened with any publick  Poji or Office. So that fuch a Work will he a noble and elegant Entertainment for my vacant Hours, which it is not in  my Power to employ, more to my own SatisfaSlion, or the  Uf( and Benefit of my Country. A S to my Helps in carrying on this Work, befdes De BryeV  Edition of Hariot'x Treattfe and With'j Cuts and Maps, and  befdes cafual Affiflances from fuch Parts of Purchas, as I  could procure, from Dr. Heylen, and other things ■ in Print^  the inquijitive Reader will eaftly perceive, how much of this  Volume is founded on Captain Smith'j Materials. They are  large and good, and of unquejiionable Authority, for what is  related, whilji he Jiaid in the Country. But they are however, as I before obferved, vafily confufed and perplexed, and  took me more Labour and Pains to digeji them, than I at firjl  expeSfed. The latter Part of his Hiftory alfo, efpecially from  Captain Argall'j Government, is liable to fime juji. Sufpicion.  Not that I queflion Captain Smith'^ Integrity ; for 1 take  him to have been a very honeji Man, and a Jirenuous Lover  of Truth. But being himfelf abfent in thofe times u^on other  ProjeSts, and having an Acquaintance and Friendjhip with  Sir Thomas Smith and Captain Argall, he feems chiefly to  have depended upon them and their Friends, for his Account  of things. And particularly, his Account of Captain Argall'j  Government is exprefy taken from himfelf, and from a Relation of Mr. Rolfe'j. Beftdes which, it is evident that his  Mind was fomewhat eagered by the NegleEts Jhewn him, and  by the Refufal of feme juJl Reward for his many and great  Services. So that he does not feem much inclined, to think well  of the Company or their Proceedings. And fuch Prejudices  and Partialities do ftlently and imperceptibly fide into the beji  and honejiefi Minds ; and ought therefore to be carefully  watched and guarded againji by all Men, but efpecially by  Hijiorians. But from whatever Caufe it proceeded, it is certain, that he gave a very wrong Idea of Captain Argall and his The PREFACE. hh Government, and of the Reafons of the Dijfolution of the  Company, in which he has been implicitely followed by all our  fucceeding Hijiorians. And I would not have the Reader furprifed to find my Account of thofe Particulars, fo very different from all others, yet in Print. For I ajjure him, there  is not one Article, fcarce a Word, in my Relation, which is  not founded on the exprefs Tejiimony, and the incontejiihle  Authority, of our Records in the Capitol, and the Company's  Journals. FOR befides thefe printed Accounts, I have had the greateji  and moji conftderable AJJiJiances from authentick Manufcripts.  Sir John Randolph'^ Collection of puhlick Papers, and the  Capitol Records, have been of no little XJfe to me, and will be  Jiill of greater Service and 'Confequence in the Profecution of  the Work. But I muji confefs myfelf moJi endebted, in this  Part of my Hijiory, to a very full and fair Manufcript of  the London Company's Records, which was communicated to  me by the late worthy Prefident of our Council, the Honourable William Byrd, Efq; Neither could I well excufe myfelf,  if I did not likewife acknowledge, with what Humanity and  Politenefs, that well bred Gentleman and Scholar, not only  communicated thofe Manufcripts to me, but alfo threw open his  Library {the beji and moJi copious ColleSlion of Books in our  Part of America) and was himfelf even Jiudious and follicitous, to fearch out and give me, whatever might be ufeful to  my Undertaking. A S thefe Records are a very curious and valuable Piece of  the Antiquities of our Country, I Jhall give the Reader an  Account of them, which I received, many Tears ago, in Converfation with Col. Byrd and Sir John Randolph. / had  then no Thoughts of writing the HiJlory of Virginia, and  therefore took lefs Notice, than I otherwife Jhould have done.  However, as I am perhaps the only Perfon now living, any  thing acquainted with their HiJlory, it will not be improper  to give it to the Reader, as I judge it highly worthy of his  Knowledge. THESE Records are a Journal of the Company's Proceedings, from Day to Day ; and are written in two large  Folio Volumes, on a Kind of Elephant Paper, generally in a  very fair and legible Hand. Each Page is fubfcribed by Edward Collingwood, the Company's Secretary, thus; Com.  Collingwood, which is, as I take it. Compared, Collingwood. Befides which, there is a TeJiification at the End of  each Volume. At the End of the firji, under the Hands of  Edward Waterhoufe and. Edward Collingwood, Secretaries  if the two Companies for Virginia ffre^ the Somer-Iflands, that  they had compared that with the Original Court-Book, and found VI The PREFACE. found it to he a true and perfeSf Copy of the fame, except the  Omijfion of one Court and Part of another. The fecond Volume is figned by the f aid Secretary Collingwood and Thomas  Collet, of the Middle Temple, Gentleman, tejiifying the  fame thing, except in a few immaterial Points, where were  wanted fome Original Papers : Thefe Volumes only contain  the Company's Proceedings for a little above five Tears, viz.  from April 28, 1619 /« June 7, 1624; including the whole  Time of Sir Edwin Sandys'j and the Earl of Southampton'^  Adminijiration. However they are not a brief and fummary  Entry of the principal Points and Matters - concluded upon,  according to the common Methods of Courts, but give, at  length, the chief Speeches, Redfons, and Debates, that happened in their Courts, during that'time. And as it was a Period of vaji Conteji and Difpute, they often recur back to  former Times and TranfaSiions, and thereby give us a clear  Idea and Account of the chief Matters and Proceedings of the  Company, almoji from it's firji Injiitution and Foundation. THIS Copy was taken, by the Order, and for the Ufe, of  the Earl of Southampton, the Company's Treafurer at that  time s who feeing, how things were going with the Company,  had their Records thus carefully copied and compared, and authentically attejied. Whether his Lordjhip intended to Jiand  Suit with the King for the Rights and Privileges of the Company, or whether he did it only in Vindication of his own  and the Company's Reputation, is uncertain. However they  were carefully preferved in the Family ; and as the Original  Court-Books were taken from the Company by the King and  Privy Council, and never again rejiored to them, that I can  find, but probably dejiroyed or lofi, this is perhaps the only  Copy, now extant. After the Death of that Earl's Son, the  Duke of Southampton (the worthy Partner in the Minijiry  with the Earl of Clarendon, after the Rejloration) which  happened in the Tear 1667, the late Col. ByrdV Father, being then in England, purchafed them of his Executors, for  ftxty Guineas. And thus have they been handed down, to  clear the Honour and Uprightnefs of the Aaions of that Nobleman and the Company, and to the full ConviSIion of King  James'j arbitrary and opprejftve Proceedings againjl them. . / therefore hope, my Freedom with that King's Charaher,  will need no Apology. For if more than a Century is not  enough to un-folombnife that filly Monarch, I mujl give up  all my Notions of things. A King's Chara£ier, whiljl he  lives, is, and ought to be facred, becaufe his Authority depends upon it. But when his Authority, the Reafon of it's  being facred, determines, the Inviolablenefs of his CharaSter  is alfo at an End. And I take it to be the main Part of the Duty The PREFACE. Duty and Office of an Hijiorian, to paint Men and Things  in their true and lively Colours ; and to do that Jujiice to the  Vices and Follies of Princes and great Men, after their  Death, which it is not fafe or proper to do, whilft they are  alive. And herein, as I judge, chiefly confiji the Strength and  Excellency of Tacitus and Suetonius. Their Stile and Manner are far inferior to Livy'f, and the Writers of the Julian  and Auguftan Ages. But they have more than painted, and  expofed alive to View, the greatefl Train of Monjiers, that  ever difgraced a Throne, or did Dijhonour to human Nature ; and thereby have obtained to themfelves a Rank, among  the bejl and mojl valuable Writers. King James /. fell indeed far Jhort of the Caefar'j fuperlative Wickednefs and Supremacy in Vice. He was, at beft, only very fimple and  injudicious, without any Jieady Principle of Jujiice and Honour ; which was rendered the more odious and ridiculous, by  his large and conjiant Pretenfions to Wifdom and Virtue.  And he had, in Truth, all the Forms of Wifdom ; for ever  erring very learnedly, with a wife Saw, or Latin Sentence,  in his Mouth. For he had been bred up under Buchanan,  one of the brighteji Genius's and mojl accomplijhed Scholars  of that Age, who had given him Greek and Latin in great  Wajie and Profufton, but it was not in his Power to give  him good Senfe. That is the Gift of God and Nature alone,  and is not to be taught ; and Greek arid Latin without it,  only cumber and overload a weak Head, and often render the  Fool more abundantly foolijh. I mujl therefore confefs, that I  have ever had, from, my firjl Acquaintance with Hijlory, a  moji contemptible Opinion of this Monarch ; which has perhaps been much heightened and increafed, by my long Jiudying  and conning over the Materials of this Hijlory. For he appears, in his Dealings with the Company, to have ailed with  fuch mean Arts and Fraud, and fuch little Tricking, as highly mijbecome Majejiy. And I am much mijiaken, if his arbitrary Proceedings and unjuji Defigns will appear from any  Part of his Hijlory more fully, than from thefe TranfaSiions  with the Company and Colony ; which have been thus far unknown to the Englifli Hijiorians, and will perhaps be Jiill  thought too infignificant for their Notice. However I hope,  my fpeaking my Mind thus fincerely and impartially will give  no Umbrage or Offence to any Man, or Party of Men. For  I declare myfelf to be of no Party ; but have laboured folely  with a View, to find out and relate the Truth. And as for  King James /. / think and fpeak of him, with the fame  Freedom and Indifferency, that I would think and fpeak of  any other Man, long fince dead; and therefore I have no  way rejirained my Stile, in freely expofmg his weak and injurious Proceedings. \^\^ :^T«^^, 1^ vu Vlll The PREFACE. IN the fucceeding Parts of this Hijlory^ I am afraid^ 1  Jhall meet with much greater Difficulties, then I have yet encountered. For I muji chiefly depend on fuch of our Records^  as are fill extant. Many of them doubtkfs perijhed in the  State-houfe at James-Town, and by tther Occidents ; and  thofe^ which have furvived the Flames and Injuries of Time,  have been fo carelejly kept, are fo broken, interrupted, and  deficient, have been fo mangled by Moths and Worms, and lie  in fuch a confufed and jumbled State (at leajl the mojl ancient of them) being huddled together in fmgle Leaves and  Sheets in Books out of the Binding, that I forefee, it will coji  me infinite Pains and Labour, to reduce and digejt them into  any tolerable Order, fo as to form from them a juji and conneSied Narration. And fome of them have beeny loft, even  fince Mr. Hickman was Clerk of the Secretary's Office. For  I cannot find, among the Papers in our Offices, fome old Rolls,  to which he refers. I have therefore been Mige/L, in a few  Points, to depend upon the Fidelity of that Gentleman's Extracts out of our oldefi Records, made for the Ufe of Sir John  Randolph. But thefe things were fo far frorn difcouraging  and rebuffing me, that they were rather an additional Spur to  my Induflry. For I thought it highly necejfary, before they  were entirely lofl and deftroyed, to apply them to their proper  Ufe, the forming a good Hiflory. But as the Houfe of Burgejfes, in a late SeJJion, upon my Jhewing their moldering and  dangerous State to fome of the Members, have jufily taken  them into their Confideration, and have ordered them to be  reviewed and fairly tranfcribed, I doubt not, by their Ajfiftance, and with the Help of the late Sir John Randolph'^  Papers, and fuch others, as are in the Hands of private  Gentlemen in the Country, and will undoubtedly be readily  communicated to further fo noble and fo ufeful a Defign, to he  able to colleSi and compofe a tolerably regular and complete  Hiflory of our Country. Varina, Dec. lo, 1746.  THt; ■■«!'- THE HISTORY OF VIRGINIA B O O K I.  IVERY Country hath it's Fables concerning it's Original, which give great Scope to  light and fanciful Hiftorians, but are ufually  paffed over with a flight Mention by the folid  and judicious. The late Difcovery of America^ in hiftorical and well-known Times,  might, ons would think, have exempted it from this common Fate of Nations. Yet fuch is the Pride of fome  Men to feem of deep Reach and, Inlight, and to ftrike  out things untouched and unthought of by others, and  fuch their prepofterouS Delight in groping after Truth  in the Dark, and yet neglefting her in the clear and meridian Brightnefs of Day, that even this new World hath  been endowed with it's fabulous Age, and old Tales revived, .or new ones invented, to flretch it's Antiquities beyond Columbus, and the fhort Date of two hundred and  fifty Years. We are therefore told of one Hanno, a Carthaginian Captain, who made a Voyage to America. But  in what Age he lived, or upon what Authority or Pretext  the Story is grounded, I have not been yet able fully to difcover. Even the monftrous Legends of Arthur, Malgo,  3 B and rbe History of VIRGINIA. Book I. and Madock, a Welch Prince, and of the Friar of Lynne,  who by his black Art tranfported himfelf to the NorthernParts of America, have found Men weak enough to be  the Relators and Propagators of tJiem. Plato's Fable alfo  of the Atlantlck Iflands has been applied to this SubjecSt ;  and Seneca the Tragedian, who could never yet obtain from  the Criticks a firm Rank among the beft and moft approved  Clafficks, hath neverthelefs been acknowledged by the Hiftorians as a true Prophet, and fome Verfes of his quoted,  as containing a predicSion of the future Difcovery and Settlement of America. But as I have ever had an utter Contempt and Averfion for all fuch learned Trumpery, and  have often been dilgufted and concerned to fee Authors,  otherwife of Judgment and Genius, carried by their Credulity too far into thofe dark and uncertain Tr3(9:s of  Time, I fliall leave thefe, with other Stories of the like  Nature, to their firft Authors or Inventors, and fliall apply  myfelf to give a plain and exaft Hiftory of our Country,  ever regarding Truth as the firft requifite and principal Virtue in an Hiftorian, and relating nothing without a fufficient Warrant and Authority. The European Nations had continued, through all Ages,  in the moft profound Ignorance of all the reft of the World;  except the beft Part of Europe, and the moft obvious and  adjacent Countries of Afia and Africa. And although the  attra£tive Power of the Loadftone had been long known  and obferved, yet it's Poles, and the wonderful Qualities  and Inclination of the magnetical Needle, were ftill a Secret, till it feemed good to Divine Providencte, that one  John Gioia, of Amalfi in the Kingdom of Naples, difcovered them about the Year 1300. This important Difcovery lay long ufelefs, without any Application to Navigation ; neither can we certainly fay, who firft turned, it to  this great End. However the Ufe of the Sea-Compafs  crept in by. Degrees, and was undoubtedly the grand Inftrument and Foundation of all thefe later Difcoveries. The Portuguefe was the firft Nation of Europe, that  engaged in maritime Expeditions, in order to explore and  difcover the unknown Parts of the World. For Prince  Henry of Portugal, in the Year 14 17, fent two fmall Barks  to make Difcoveries along the Coaft of Africa ; which Beginning, having fome Succefs, was afterwards profecuted,  durmg the Life of that Prince, under his Aufpices and Direaion. After his Death, they ftill advanced by Degrees  m their Trade and Difcoveries, till at length in the Year  i486 they reached the Cape of Good-Hope. But it was  I497> five Years after the Difcovery of America, before Vafco Book I. "The History of VIRGINIA. Vafco de Gama, by the Command, and in the Service, of  Emanuel, King of Portugal, failed round that Cape to the  Eaji-Indies. Chrijiopher Columbus, a Genoefe by Birth, a Perfon of  great Knowledge and Experience in naval Affairs, of good  Learning, and a comprehenfive Mind, and being alfo led  perhaps by the late Difcoveries of the Portuguefe, was  ftrongly • poffeffed with a Notion of fome Lands to the  Weftward, beyond the great Atlantick Ocean. He therefore firfl: offered his Service to his native Country, the Republick of Genoa ; but being rejedied as a whimfical and  chimerical Man, he applied himfelf to King John IL of  Portugal, Henry VIL of England, and to Ferdinand and  Ifabel, King and Queen of Cajlile. Many Years being  fpent in fruitlefs Sollicitations, and after much Vexation and  Difappointment, he was at laft entertained in the Service of  the King and Queen of Cajiile, and fent upon the Difcovery, which he happily effedled the nth of OSiober 1492.  After this, Columbus, being animated with, a publick Spirit  and a generous Principle of Glory, and the Spaniards, being as eagerly puflied on by an infatiable Thirft of Gold,  fo ardently purfued, and fo fuccefsfuUy improved this firft  Difcovery, that they foon became Matters of vaft Trails  of rich and fertile Country abounding in Gold, Silver,  Pearls, Errieralds, and many other the molt precious and  delicious ProduiSts of this Globe. The Portuguefe likewife,  altho' fufficiently loaded and embarraffed with their vaft  Acquifitions on the Coaft of Africa and in the Eaji-Indies,  yet neverthelefs found the Means and Opportunity to make  good their great Difcovery of Brazil. Neither were the  French entirely idle ; but they made many vigorous Efforts  towards gaining a Share of the Riches and Territory of this  new World. The Englijh in the mean time, a maritime Nation, of  great Bravery, and of a bold and adventurous Nature, lay  quite negligent and fupine, and let flip all ■ Opportunities in  thofe early Times of acquiring fome rich and ufeful Provinces in America. For altho' they had in the Year 1497,  under Sebajiian Cabot, made the Difcovery of Newfoundland, and of the main Continent of America from 38 to 68  Degrees of northern Latitude,, yet they made no other Advantage of this Difcovery, but to fend out a few fifliing  Barks in common with other Nations oi Europe. At length  Sir Humphry Gilbert, a Gentleman of great Reputation for  his Skill in naval ^Affairs, and of a high and refolute Spirit,  undertook to fettle a Colony in Newfoundland, a cold, barren, and unfruitful Soil, and moft unfriendly Clime. And R T to '=tbe History ef VIRGINIA. Book I. to this End, he obtained Letters patent from Queen; Elizabeth, bearing Date the iith of June, 1578- These Letters patent granted "free Powex and Li"berty to him, his Heirs and Affigns for ever, to dif" cover, find, fearch out, and view, all fucb remote,  " heathen, and barbarous Lands, Countries, or Territories,  " as were not aftualfy pofleffed by any Chriftian Prince or  " People ; and thither to lead and carry with him, to travel  " thitherward, and there inhabit, fuch and fo many of her  " Majefty's Subjeds, as would willingly accompany and  "join in the Enterprife. "And that he fliould have, hold, occupy, and enjoy,  " to himfelf, his Heirs and Affngns, for ever, all fuch  " Lands, Countries, and Territories, fo to be difcovered  "or pofleffed, with the Rights, Royalties, and Jurifdic" tions, as well marine as other, within the faid Lands  " and Countries, or the Seas thereunto adjoining, with  " full Power to difpofe thereof to her Majefty^s Sub]e£ts,  " and of any or every Part thereof, in Fee-fimple, or other" wife, according to the Laws of England, as nearly as  " conveniently might be ; paying to the Queen, her Heirs  " and Succeflbrs, for all Services, Duties, and Demands  " whatfoever,, the Fifth Part of all the Ore of Gold* and " Silver, which fliould at any time there be gotten ;  " holding all the faid Lands and Countries of her Majef" ty, her Heirs, and Succeflbrs, by Homage, and by the  " Payment of the faid Fifth Part, before referved. "Moreover granting to him, his Heirs and Afligns,  " for ever. Licence to encounter, expel, repel, and refifl:  " all Perfon or Perfons whatfoever, that fliould attempt  " to inhabit in the faid Couiiitries, without his fpecial  " Licence and Liking, or within the Space of two Hun" dred Leagues of the Place, where he, his Heirs, or Af" figns, fliould, within Six Years next enfuing, make  " their Dwelling and Abode ; provided the faid Countries  " were not before planted or inhabited, within the aforefaid  " Limits, by the Subjefts of any Chriftian Prince, in Amity  " with her Majefty. And giving and granting to him, his  "Heirs, and Afligns, for ever, full Power and Authority,  " to take and furprife, by all manner of Means whatfo" ever, all and every Perfon and Perfons, with their Ships,  " Vefliels, or other Goods and Furniture, that fliould be  " found trafficking within the Limits aforefaid, without  " the Licence of the faid Sir Humphry, his Heirs, or Af" figns ; the Subjefts of the Queen's Realms and Domi" nions, and all other Perfons in Amity with her, being  " driven thither by Force of Tempeft or Shipwreck, only  " excepted. "And Book I. rhe History of VIRGINIA. "And for uniting in more perfecS League and Amity,  " fuch Lands and Countries with the Realms of England  " and Ireland, and for the better encouragement of thofe,  " who would engage in the Enterprife, the Queen grants  " and declares, that the faid Countries, fo to be poffefled  " and inhabited, fliduld from thenceforth be in the Alle" giance and Proteftion of her, her Heirs, and Succeflbrs ;  " and farther grants to the faid Sir Humphry, his Heirs,  " and Affigns, and to every other Perfon or Perfons, to  " their, and every of their Heirs, that they, and every  " of them, that fhould thereafter be inhabiting in the faid  " Lands, Countries, and Territories, fhould and might  " have and enjoy all the Privileges of free Denizens, or  " Perfons native of England ; any Law, Cuftom, or U" fage to the contrary notwithflanding. "And fhe farther grants to the faid Sir Humphry, his  " Heirs and Affigns, for ever, full Power and Authority,  " to correft, punifh, pardon, govern and rule, as well in  " Caufes capital or criminal, as civil, all fuch her SubjecSls  " or others, as fhould adventure themfelves in the faid  " Voyages, or flibuld at any Time thereafter inhabit the  " faid Lands, Countries, or Territories, or fhould dwell  " within two hundred Leagues of the Place or Places,  " where the faid Humphry, his Heirs, or Affigns, or any  " of his or their Affociates, fhould inhabit within fix Years,  " enfuing the Date thereof ; with Power to conflitute fuch  " Statutes, Lawsj arid Ordinances, as fhould by him, the  " faid Sir Humphry, his Heirs, or Affigns, be devifed or  " eftablifhed, for the better Government of the faid Peo" pie : Provided always, that they fhould be, as near as  " conveniently ■ might, agreeable to the Laws and Policy  " of England ;, and provided alfo, that they be not againfb  " the true Chriflian Faith, profefTed in the " Church of  " England, nor any way tend to withdraw the Subj,e(Sts or  " People of thofe Lands or Places from the Allegiance of  "the Queen, her Heirs, or SuccefTors. "Provided always, and fhe thereby declares to, all  " Chriflian Kings, Princes, and States, that if the faid Sir  " Humphry, his Heirs, or Affigns, or any other by their  " Licence or Appointment, fhould at any Time or Times  " thereafter, rob or fpoil, by Sea or by Land, or do any  " Adt of unjufl or unlawful Hoftility, to any of the Sub" jefts of England, or of any other King, Prince, or State,  " in League or Amity with the Crown of England, that  " then, upon fuch Injury, or upon jufl Complaint thereof,  " the Queen, her Heirs, or Succeflbrs, fhould make open  " Proclamation,, within any of the Ports of England com- B 3 " modious. ^he History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book I. " modious, that the faid Sir Humphry^, his Heirs, or Affigns,  " or any other, to whom thofe Letters patent might ex" tend, fliould, within the Term to be limited in the faid  " Proclamations, make full Reftitution and SatisfacSion for  " all Injuries fo done : In Default whereof, it fhould be  "lawful for the Queen, her Heirs, or Succeflbrs, to put  " the faid Sir Humphry, his Heirs, or AfEgns, with his or  " their Adherents, and all the Inhabitants of the faid Pla" ces, out of their Allegiance and Proteftion ; and that  " from fuch Time as they fliould be fo put out of the Pro" teftion of the Crown of England, it fhould be free for all  " Princes and others, to purfue them with Hoftility, as  " being no longer Subjefts of England, nor by the Queen,  " her Heirs, or Succeflbrs, any ways to be avowed, main" tained, or defended." I N Confequence of thefe ample Powers and Privileges,  Sir Humphry Gilbert, with the ConjuncEtion and Affifl:ance  of many other Gentlemen, prepared to put to Sea with a  noble Fleet. But juft on the Point of Departure, upon fome  Difagreement and Diflention, he was deferted by his Aflbciates, and left with only a few of his firm and faithful  Friends. With thefe, however, he ventured to Sea, but  having been expofed to fome Misfortunes, and lofl: a large  Ship of his Fleet, he was obliged to return without effefting  any thing. Thefe expenfive and unsuccefsful Preparations  had fo impaired his Fortune, that if was 1583, before he  made any farther Attempt. But then having fold his Eftate,  and being joined by divers Gentlemen of Fortune, he again  fet Sail with two Ships and three fmall Barks. Coming before St. John's Harbour in Newfoundland, he was refufed  Entrance by the fifliing Veffels within, to the Number of  thirty-fix Sail, of all Nations. He therefore prepared to  make his Way good by Force of Arms ; but firft fent his  Boat in to inform them, that he had a Commiflion from  the Queen, to take PoflefEon of thofe Lands for the Crown  of England. Queen Elizabeth's Name was reverenced  through all Europe, and her Power and Authority at Sea^ in  particular, much honoured and revered. Thefe FifhingBarks therefore readily fubmitted, and even made a Contribution of Provifions to fupply the Wants of this fmall  Fleet. After this. Sir Humphry went aftiore, being conduced by all the Englijh there ; and having caufed a Tent to  be- fet up in View of the Bay and Veflels, being attended  by his Captains, Mailers, Gentlemen, and Soldiers, he  fummoned all the Merchants and Matters, both Englijh and  Foreigners, to be prefent at his taking a formal and folemn Pofleffion Book I. "The History of VIRGINIA. Poffeflion of the Country. He then caufed his Commiffion  ■ to be openly read, and to be interpreted to thofe who  were Strangers to the Englijh Tongue. By Virtue of  this Gommiffion, he declared,, that he took Poffeflion of  the Harbour of St. yohn's, and of the Territory two hundred Leagues every way, andinvefted her Majefty with the  Title and Dignity thereof. And having had a Twig and a  Turf of the Soil delivered to him, he entered Poffeflion alfo  for himfelf, his Heirs, or Afligns, for ever. He further  fignified to thofe prefent, and through them to all Men,  that, from thenceforward, they fhould look upon thofe Territories as appertaining to the Queen of England, and upon  himfelf, as authorifed by her Majefty to poffefs and enjoy  them, with Power to ordain Laws, under which all People coming thither for the future, either to inhabit or to  trade, fhould fubmit themfelves and be governed. And to  exercife his Power and JurifdicSion, he enafted three Laws,  immediately to take Place and be of Force ; and granted divers Parcels of Land, lying by the Sea Side, as well in the  Harbour of St. yohn's, as elfewhere. After fome Excurfions to fearch the Country, and  the pretended Difcovery of a Silver Mine, with which Sir  Humphry was much gulled and delighted, they fet Sail to  the Southward, in order to explore and difcover the main  Coaft oi America. But falling among fome Shoals, and  meeting with very bad and tempeftuous Weather, after  having undergone much Danger and Fatigue, they refolved  to return for England. Sir Humphry, the better to fearch  the Coaft, and to run up into Creeks and Harbours, had  gone on board a fmall Bark of ten Tons ; and could not  afterwards be perfuaded to leave her in their Return homewards, till her Lights were fuddenly extinguiflied in the  Night, at which Time fhe was fuppofed to fink, and was  never after feen or heard of. The learned and valiant Mr. Walter Ralegh was half  Brother to Sir Humphry Gilbert ; his Father having married  Sir Humphry's Mother, when a Widow, and had by her  this his fourth and youngeft Son, with fome other Children.  Led by this near Relation, and being alfo a Perfon of a noble  and enterprifing Genius, he had been one of the principal  Adventurers in this Undertaking of Sir Humphry, and had  fitted out, entirely at his own Charge, the largeft Ship of  his Fleet, called the Ralegh Bark. Some Authors fay, he  went himfelf upon the Expedition, and commanded his own  Ship in Perfon. But however that inight be, it is certain,  this Ship was, within a few Days, obliged to put back to Plimouth, greatly diftreffed by a violent and contagious SickB 4 nefs  The History of VIRGINIA. Book I.  nefs among her Companyi But notwithftanding this Difappointment, and the unhappy End of his .rafli and unfortunate Brother, Mr. Ralegh was not difcouraged ; but being  moved with the Voyages and Relations of others, he ftill  perfifted in the Defign of difcovering and making a Settlement in America. He therefore obtained Letters patent  from Queen Elizabeth, of whom he was at that Time one  of the chief Favourites, bearing Date the 25th of March,  1584, for difcovering and planting any fuch Lands and  Countries, as were not already in the actual poffeffion of  any Chriftian Nation, Thefe Letters patent are in Hackluyt's CoUecftion of Voyages ; but that Book is fo .very rare,  that our Country does not afford one Copy of it, at leaft  that I could find out or procure. I have not therefore been  able to obtain a Sight of thefe Patents ; but we are told,  that they were, mutatis mutandis, the very fame with thofe  granted to Sir Humphry Gilbert ; of which I have therefore  before given a particular Extracft, About the fame Time, the Queen granted Mr. Ralegh  another Patent, to licence the Vending of Wine throughout  the Kingdom ; which was defigned, as it has been fuppofed;  to enable him by the Profits, that would thence arife, to  fuftain the vaft Charges which this Undertaking of a Colony would neceffarily bring upon him. But yet the better  to ftrengthen himfelf, and carry on the Affair, he perfuaded divers other Gentlemen and Merchants to join with  him ; particularly his noble and gallant Kinfman, Sir Rich'  ard Greenvil, and Mr. William Sanderfon, who had married his Neice, and was much engaged among the Merchant  Adventurers of that Time ; and was alfo one of the Queen's  Commiflioners for the Spanijh Prizes, and of Note for the  great Globes, which, by his Encouragement, were firft  brought to Perfeftion. They therefore, with all convenient Speed, provided two fmall Veffels, and having plentifully furnifhed them with Neceffaries, put them under the  Command of Captain Philip Amidas, and Captain Arthur  Barlow ; which lafl was alfo a Land-Officer, and had ferved  under Mr. Ralegh in the Wars of Ireland, with great Bravery and Honour. But Mr. Ralegh, being hindered by his  Employments, and too bufily engaged in his ambitious Purfuits at Court, did not come himfelf upon the Expedition,  as hath been generally, tho' erroneoufly, thought. On the 27th of April, 1584, thefe Adventurers fet Sail  from the Thames ; and having paffed by the Canaries and  the Weji-Indies, (a Circuit both needlefs and unhealthy,  but through the Inexperience of thofe Times thought neceffary ) they fell in, on the 2d of July, with the Coafl of Florida. Book I. 'The -History of VIRGINIA. Florida. For that was the Name which all this Northern  Continent from Cape Florida then bore, there being yet no  diftindt Settlements, which gave particular Names to the  feveral Places along the Coaft. They were met at Sea  with a moft delicate and delightful Smell ; and foon after  making the Lajid, they coafted it along for about an hundred and twenty Miles, without finding any convenient  Harbour. The firil they faw, they entered with much  Difficulty ; and having returned Thanks to God, they went  afhore to view the Country, and to take 'Pofleffion of it in  the Queen's Name. The Place of their firft Landing was  a low and fandy Beach ; but it yielded fuch a wonderful  Abundance of Grapes, as very much furprifed and delighted  them. Every little Shrub was covered with them, and the  Tops of the talleft Cedars were over-run and loaded with  their Clufters. They concluded, that the Place of their Landing was on  the main Continent of America ; but going up to the Top  of a finall Eminence at a little Diftance from the Shore,  they perceived it to .be an Iflahd, of about twenty, or as Mr.  Harlot judged, of fifteen Miles in Length, and fix in Breadth.  This Ifland was .called Wococon^zxiA lay between Cape Hatteras and Cape Fear; and muft therefore be the Ifland of  (Ocacoci, or at leaft fome of the other fmall Iflands along  that Coaft. ,For it cannot, jbe, by With and Harlot's Plan,  Roanoke., or any other of thofe which befet and flop up the  Mouth of Albemarle Sound, in Norths Carolina, as has been  ■commonly fuppofed. It was covered with tall and ftately  Trees, Cedars, Pines, Cyprefs, Saffafras, and many others  ■of excellent: Smell and Quality ; and abounded in Deer, Conies, and Wild-fowl, in incredible Numbers. They faw none of the Natives, 'till the third Day after  their Landing, when they fpied three in a Canoe. One pf  thepi went aftiore, and waited ^without any Signs of Fear,  till the Englijh rowed tohipi. He fpokemuch to them in  his own Language, ^nd then went boldly aboard their Veffels. They gave him a Shirt, a Hat, Wine, and Meat,  with vwhieji ihe was much pleafed. Having attentively  vi&wed every thing, he went- away; and within half an  Hour he hadioaded his Canoe with Filh, which he brought  and divided between >the Ship and the Bark. The next Day.ifeveral Canoes came;, and intone of them  the King's Brother. His Name was Gvanganameo ; the  King was called Wingina, and the Country Wingandacoa.  The King himfelf at that Time lay, at his chief Town, ill  of the Wounds which he had Jately received in a Battle.  ^Gftanganamta, leaving his Canons at fome Diftance, went  4 to 'Re History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book I. to the Point of Land where the Englijh had gone to the  Indian the Day before. Having fpread a Mat, he fat down  upon it ; and when the Englijh came to him well armed,  he {hewed no Fear ; but made Signs to them to fit down,  ftroaking his own Head and Breaft, and then theirs, to exprefs his Love. The Natives were a proper, well-proportioned People, very civil in their Behaviour, and highly refpedlful to Granganameo, For none of them fat down, or  fpoke a Word in his Prefence, except four ; on whom the  Englijh alfo beftowed Prefects. But Granganameo took  them all. from them, and made Signs, that every thing belonged to him. After fome fmall Traffick, he went away ;  but returning in two Days, he eat and drank very merrily  with them. Not long after, he brought his Wife and  Children on board. They were of mean Stature, but wellfavoured, and very balhful and modeft. His Wife had a  Band of white Coral about her Forehead, and Bracelets of  Pearl in her Ears, hanging down to her Middle, of the  Bignefs of large Peafe. As to the reft, they were decked  with red Copper, and fuch Ornaments, as are at prefent in  Fafhion and Efteem among our Indians. After this, there came down, from all Parts, great  Numbers of People, with Leather, Coral, and divers Kinds  of Dyes. But when Granganameo was prefent, none durft  trade but himfelf, and thofe, who wore red Copper on their  Heads, as he did. He would have engaged a Bag of Pearl  for a Suit of Armour ; but the Engltjh refufed, as not regarding it, that they might thereby the better learn, where  it grew. He was very juft to his Promife, for they often  trufted him, and he never failed to come within his Day to  keep his Word. He commonly fent the Englijh every Day  a Brace of Bucks, Conies, Hares, and Fifli ; and fometimes  Melons, Walnuts, Cucumers, Peafe, and divers Kinds of  Roots. And the Englijh^ to try the Strength and Goodnefs  of the Soil, put fome of their Peafe into the Ground, which  grew wonderfully, and were found in ten Days time fourteen Inches high. A N Acquaintance being thus contrafted by mutual Returns of Kindnefs and Beneficence, Captain Amidas^ with  feven more, ventured up the River Occam^ as they call it,  which muft be Pamptico Sound. The next Evening they  came to the Ifle of Roanoke^ at the Mouth of Albemarle  Sound, about feven Leagues, as they fay, from the Harbour, where they firft entered. But this is a grofs Miftake,  and muft be an Error in the Copy. For by the Scale in  With's Map, it cannot be lefs than thirty Leagues, from  Wococon to Roanoke: On this Ifland they found a fmall Town, Book I. The History of VIRGINIA. Town, confifting of nine Houfes ; in one of which Granganameo lived. He was abfent ; but his Wife entertained  them with wonderful Courtefy and Kindnefs. She made  fome of her People draw their Boat up, to prevent it's being injured by the Beating of the Surge ; fome fhe ordered  to bring them afliore on their Backs ; and others, to carry  their Oars to the Houfe, for Fear of being ftole. When  they came into the Houfe, {he took ofF their Cloaths and  Stockings, and wafhed them, as likewife their Feet in warm  Water. When their Dinner was ready, they were condu£led into an inner Room (for there were five in the Houfe,  divided by Mats) where they found Hominy*^ boiled Venifon, and roafted Fifh ; and as a Defert, Melons, boiled  Roots, and Fruits of various Sorts. While they were at  Meat, two or three of her Men came in with their Bows  and Arrows, which made the Englijh take to their Arms.  But fhe, perceiving their Diftruft, ordered their Bows and  Arrows to be broken, and themfelves to be beaten out of  the Gate. In the Evening the Englijh returned to their  Boat ; and putting a little off from Shore, lay at Anchor.  At which {he was much concerned, and brought their Supper, half boiled. Pots and all to the Shore Side ; and feeing  their Jealouly, {he ordered feveral Men, and thirty Women, to fit all Night upon the Shore, as a Quard ; and fent  five Mats to cover them from the Weather. In {hort, fhe  omitted nothing, that the mofl: generous Hofpitality and  hearty Defire of pleafing could do, to entertain them. And this was the farthefl Difcovery made upon this fir{l  Voyage, except fome confufed and uncertain Accounts of  the Country, which they gathered from the Indians. They  returned to England about the Middle of September^ carrying with them two of the Natives, Manteo and Wanchefe ;  and their Difcovery was fo welcome there, that the Queen  herfelf was pleafed to name the Country Virginia, in  Memory of it's having been firfl found out in the Reign of  a Virgin Queen. Or as fome have been pleafed to glofs  and interpret it, becaufe it flill feemed to retain the Virgin  Purity and Plenty of the firft Creation, and the People their  primitive Innocency of Life and Manners. And foon after  their Return, Mr. Ralegh was eledled, together with Sir  William Courtenay^ Knight of the Shire for the County of  Devon. On the 14th of December., he caufed a Bill to be  brought into the Houfe, to confirm his Patent for difcovering foreign Countries ; which being committed to Mr. ViceChamberlain Hatton, Secretary Wal/ingham., Sir Philip Sidney^ ' ^ A Food made of Indiart ■ Corny or Maize, beaten and carefully hulked,  fomething like Furmety in England j and is an excellent Dilh various Ways. Tbe History of VIRGINIA, Book L Sidney, Sir Francis Drake, Sir Richard Greenvil, Sir William Courtenay, and others, it was in a few Days pafled, after many Arguments and a Provifo added. And not long  after, the Queen was pleafed to Knight him^ upon Occafion, it is faid, of this grateful Difcovery.^ But Mr. Of^or«?, ^n ingenious Obferver on her Reign, fays with Refpe£t to Sir Francis Vere, a Man nobly defcended, and Sir  Walter Ralegh, exacftly qualified, that they, with fuch others, were fet apart in her Judgment for military Services.  Neither did fhe ever raife them above Knighthood ; faying,  when follicited to make Vere a Baron, That in his proper  Sphere, and her Eftimation, he was above it already.  I585- The advantageous Accounts, which thefe firft Adven^  turers gave of the Fertility^ Pleafantnefs, and Wholefomenefs of the Country, induced Sir Richard Greenvil himfelf  to make a Voyage thither the next Year. And he accordingly fet out from Plimouth the gth of April, with feven  S-hips. Having made the ufual Circuit of the Canaries and  Weji-Indies, where they took two rich Spanijh Prizes, and  forced a profitable Trade, they fell in with the Continent  of America near Cape Fear, and were in great Danger of  being loft upon it. But having happily efcaped, they came  to an Anchor off the Ifland of Wococon the 26th di May,  They immediately fent to the Ifle of Roanoke, to Wingina  the King ; and Mr. Arundel went to the Main, with Manteo, who proved throughout their whole Stay, very faithful  and ufeful to them. Soon after, the General, Sir Richard  Greenvil, went himfelf to the Main, with a fele£l Body of  Men ; and ranging about, difcovered fevefal Indian^ Towns.  At one of them the Indians ftole a Silver Cup ; for which  they burnt their Town, and deftroyed their Cofn, and fo  returned to their Ships at Wococon. At Hatteras, whither  they went foon after, Granganameo, the King's Brother,  came aboard the Admiral with Manteo. This is the laft  Vifit he made to the Englijh ; for fometime this Year he  died, and in him they Ipft a fincere and hearty Friend. S I R Richard Greenvil, having only made that fmall Excurfion on the Continent, returned to England this Summer. In his Way home, he took another Spanijh Prize, of  three hundred Tons, richly laden, and with her arrived at  Plimouth the 1 8th of September. But he left behind him  an hundred and eight Perfons, as" a Colony, to keep Poffeffion of, and inhabit the Country. Of thefe he conftituted  Mr. Ralph Lane Governor, a military Man of Note, who  was afterwards Knighted, and applying himfelf to the Sea  Service, was of eminent Command in the Englijh Navy.  With him remained Captain Philip Amidas, as Admiralj one Book r. rke History of VIRGINIA. one of the Commanders in Chief in the firft Adventure  Mr. Thomas Harlot; Captain Stafford; Mr, Kendal; with  feveral others of Name in the Expedition. This Colony chofe Roanoke, an Ifland at the Mouth of  Albemarle Sound, for the Place of their Habitation ; and  their chief Employment was to reconnoitre and view the  Country. Their fartheft Difcovery to the Southward was  Secotan, an Indian Town, by their Reckoning, eighty  Leagues from Roanoke, lying up between the Rivers Pampticoe and Neus, in North- Carolina. To the Northward they  went an hundred and thirty Miles to the Chefapeakes, a  Nation of Indians, feated on a fmall River, to the South of  our Bay, now called Elfabeth River, from whom, as thefe  firft Difcoverers tell us, the Bay itfelf took its Name, But  fome pretend to give another Derivation of this Word ; and  fay, that Chefapeake fignified, in the Indian Language, The  Mother of fVaters; implying, that it was the Parent and  grand Refervoir of all the great Rivers within it.^ But this  is a dark and uncertain Guefs ; efpecially confidering the  Unftablenefs and -vaft Mutability of the Indian Tongues,  and that no body at prefent can pretend to underftand their  Language at that time. The beft Authority that I have  met with for this Derivation, is what a Gentleman of Credit once aflured me, that in a a very old Spanijh Map,  which he had feen, our Bay was laid down under the Name  of Madre des Acquas, or fome Expreflion to the like Purpofe. This Town of the Chefapeakes, we are told, for  Pleafantnefs of Situation, for Temperature of Clime, Fertility of Soil, and Commodioufnefs to the Sea, was not to  be excelled by any in the World. To the Northweft, thefe  Difcoverers went up Albemarle Sound and Chowan River,  an hundred and thirty Miles, to a Nation of Indians called  the Chawonocks, inhabiting above the Fork of that River,  where one Branch takes the Name of Meherrin, and the  other of Nottoway. The King of the Chawonocks, whofe Name was Menatbnon, was lame, but the moft fenfible and underftaiiding  Indian they had ftiet with. He amufed Mr. Lane and his  Company with a Story of a Copper Mine, and of a Pearl  Fifhery, which by the Defcription was fome where upon  our Coaft, and with a ftrange Relation of the Head of the  River Moratuc, now called Roanoke. This River was deferibed, as fpringing out of a Rock, fo nigh the Sea, that  in high Winds the Surge beat over into the Spring. And  the Eriglijh very fanguinely concluded this Sea to be either  the Bay of Mexico, or the South Sea, or at leaft fome Arm  that opened into it. Having their Heads filled with thefe chimerical T:he History of VIRGINIA. Book I. chimerical Fancies, they formed many Schemes, and undertook a very fatiguing and hazardous Voyage up that  River. And fo eager were they, and refolutely bent upon  this golden Difcovery, that they could not be perfuaded to  return, as long as they had one Pint of Corn a Man left,  and two Maftif Dogs, which being boiled with Saflafras  Leaves, might afford them fome Suftenance in their Way  back. But after fome Days fpent in vain, and having undergone much Mifery and Danger, they at laft returned, and  joyfully arrived at their old Habitation on Roanoke Ifland. The Death of Granganameo had caufed a great Alteration in the Affairs of the Colony. For whilft he lived, his  Credit with the King, joined to the Intereft of Enfenore^  their Father, had reftrained his Perfidy and Malice, and  kept him within Bounds. But upon the Death of Granganameo^ he changed his Name from tVingina to Pemiffapan,  and became a fecret but bitter Enemy to the Englijh. To  his Machinations chiefly were owing the many Hardlhips  and Dangers, they had encountered in their laft Journey up  the River Chowan. For he had given fecret Intelligence to  thofe Indians of the coming of the Englijh ; and had craftily infituated Jealoufies into the Indians of the Englijh^ and  into the Englijh of the Indians. But a Rumour being fpread,  that Mr. Lane and his Company were all either flain or  ftarved in this Journey, he began to a<S more openly. He  blafphemed the God of the Englijh, and endeavoured, by  all the Devices he could, to hurt and annoy them. And  Enfenore, his aged Father, the beft Friend the Englijh had  left after the Death of Granganameo, loft all his Credit to  affift or ferve them. But their Return foon after, and their  bringing the Son of Menatonon, their greateft King, Prifoner, joined to the Teftimonies of Manteo, and three other  Indians, that went with them, how little they valued any  People they met, or feared Hunger, Death, or any thing  elfe, reftrained his Devices for the prefent, and brought Enfenore again into Credit and Efteem.  1586. Soon after, Menatonon, King of the Chawonocks, fent  a Prefent of Pearl to Mr. Lane ; and Okifco, King of fVeopomeoke, (another powerful Nation, poffeffing all that  Country from Albemarle Sound and Chowan River, quite  to the Chefapeakes and our Bay) came himfelf, with twenty  four of his principal Men, to own Subjeftion to the Queen  of England. All which fo wrought on the Heart of fVingina, that by Enfenore's Perfuafions, they came and made  Weirs for the Englijh, when they were ready to famifli,  and planted their Fields of Corn, which they intended to  abandon. But this good Intelligence was foori broke off by the Book I. rhe History 0/ VIRGINIA. the Death of Enfenore^ which happened on the 20th of April. For fVingina^ under Pretence of folemnizing his Father's Funeral, had laid a Scheme of drawing together fixteen or eighteen hundred Indians^ and of cutting off all the  Engltjh at once. But his Defign took Wind, and was at  laft fully difcovered to Mr. Lane by his Prifoner Skico^ King  Menatonon'% Son. Then the Englijh^ in their Turn, endeavoured to feize all the Canoes upon Roanoke^ and thereby to have all the Indians in the Ifland at their Mercy. But  they took the Alarm, and after a fmall Skirmifti, in which  five or fix Indians were flain, the reft efcaped and fled into  the Woods. After this, neither Side cared much for trufting the other ; and at laft, after much Tricking and Diffimulation on both Parts, Wingina was entrapped by the  Englijh^ and flain, with eight of his chief Men. This is  the Account of that Adlion, as it is delivered by the Perfons concerned in it. But I find, that Mr. Hariot^ who  was likewife upon the Spot, blames the Violence and Forwardnefs of the Englijh ; and thinks, that the Caufes of  Sufpicion and Refentment had been better diffembled and  paffed over. I N the Time of thefe Confufions and Broils with the Indians^ Mr. Lane had been obliged, through Want of Provifions, to fend Captain Stafford^ with twenty more, to  Croatan^ on the South Part of Cape Look-out^ to {hi ft for  themfelves, and to fee, if they could fpy any Sail pafs by  the Coaft. In like Manner he detached Mr. 'Prideaux^  with ten, to Hatteras^ upon the fame Defign ; and other  fmall Parties he fent to the Main, to live upon Roots and  Oyfters. Seven Days after the Death of Wingina^ Captain Stafford, (who through the whole Voyage was very  vigilant and induftrious, and fpared no Labour or Danger,  to perform any ferious and important Service, committed to  him) fent Mr. Lane Word, that he defcried twenty three  Sail of Ships ; and the next Day, he came himfelf with a  Letter from Sir Francis Drake. Sir Francis was then returning from an Expedition againft the Spaniards in the  Weji-Indies, where he had taken Carthagena, and the Capital City of Hifpaniola ; and had burnt St. Anthony, and  St. Helena, on the Coaft of Florida ; and done much other  Damage to the Enemy. He had Orders from the Queen  to vifit the Colony of Virginia in his Return, and to afford  them fuch Affiftance and Encouragement, as was proper.  He therefore offered to fupply their Wants, and to do any  thing elfe in his Power, towards their Relief and the Furtherance of the Undertaking ; and after mature Deliberation, he appointed them a Ship of feventy Tons, with an hundred "The .History of VIRGINIA. Book 1. hundred Men, and four Months Pravifions, befides two  Barks and four fmall Boats, with abk Mafters and fufficient  Gangs. But juft zs all was ready, there arofe fuch a Storm,  as had like to have driven the whole fleet afhore. Many  Shipis were forced out to Sea, among which was that lately  given to the Colony, with all their Provifions and Company aboard. This Accident did not tlifcoufage the Admiral, but he  allotted them another Ship of an hundred and feventy Tons,  with all Provifions as before, to carry them to England the  next Auguji^ or when they fhould have made fuch Difcoveries as they thought fufficient. But their Harbour, which  was .very indifferent, would not receive a Ship of her Burthen ; and to lie in the open Road, expofed to the Winds  and Sea, was very dangerous. And therefore, after Consultation, it was unanimoufly agreed, to defire the Admiral  to. take them home with him in Ms. Fleet ; for they had already undergone much Mifery and Danger, and there appeared but little Hopes of Sir Richard Greenvil's Return.  .And fo this firft Attempt towards a Settlement became abortive, and they all arrived fafe at Portfmouth the latter  End of ^ly, 1586. But in his Way home, Sir Francis  Drake xouchedi on the Coaft of New-England; where be  landed, and fpent two or three Days in trading with the  Natives, and one of the Indian Kings came, and fubmitted  himfelf to Queen Eli%ab£th. Upon this Voyage, Sir Walter Ralegh, by the Qaeen's  Advice and Diredtions, fent, at no fmall Expence, Mr.  Jdin With, a fkilful. and ingenious Painter, to take the Situation of the Country, and to paint, from the Life, the  Pigures and Habits of the Natives, their Way of Liviiig,  and their feveral Fafhions, Modes, and Superflitions ; whic^  he did with great Beauty and Exaftnefs. There was one  Theodore Je Bry, who afterwards publiflied, in the Year  .1624, the beautiful Latin Edition of Voyages, in fix Volumes, Folia, a m«ft curious and valuable Work. He being in EngiaiKd foon after, .by the Means of the Rev. Mr.  Richard .Hackkyt,Xhevi of ChriJPs- Church, in Oxford^, wh©,  -De ^rc tells us, shad himfelf k&x\ the Country, obtained  from Mx. With.Tt. Sight of thefe Pieces, with PermiiEon to  take them off in Copper Plates. Thefe, being very lively  and well .done, he carried to Frankfort, on the Maine,  where he .publiflied a noble Edition of them, with Latin  Explanations, out of Jaha fFechelivs's Prefs, in the Year  1590. And thefeare .the Originals from which Mr. Beverley's, and the Cuts of many of our late Writers and Travellers, have been chiefly imitated. And to ,fliew, that the Inhabitants Book I. T-6^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. Inhabitants of England were once as wild and barbarous as  thefe of Ftrg'mia^ Mr. With gave him the Figures of three  of the Pills and two of their Neighbours, that he had.  found delineated in an old Englijh Hiftory ; which were  accordingly publiftied with them, and was no mean or impolitic Device, to recommend the Profecution of the En  terprife to the EfigUJh Nation. But befides this Painter, Sir Walter fent' upon this  Voyage a Domeftick of his, one Mr. Thomas Hariot, a  Mathematician, and highly in his Patron's Intimacy and  Friendfliip. He was a Man of Learning, and a very obferving and underftanding Perfon, and went chiefly to make  Obfervations on the Situation of the Country, and to aflift.  Mr. With in the Plan. After his Return, to obviate the  clamorous and unjuft Reports of fome of the Company, he  publifhed a fmall Treatife concerning the Country, divided  into three Parts. The firft treats of fuch Commodities, as  would be ufeful towards the Improvement of Commerce ;  the fecond, of thofe natural Produfts of the Earth, and of  fuch Fifh, Fovvl, and Beafts, as would contribute to the  Suftenance of M^n, and the Support of human Life ; and the  third, of the Trees and Timber, and other proper Materials for building Houfes, Ships, and the like. After which  he fubjoins the following Account of the Dodlrines and  Manners of the Natives. They believed, that there is one chief God, who hath  exifted from all Eternity : That he created the World ;  but firft made other Gods of a principal Order, to be his  Inftruments in the Creation and Government thereof:  That next the Sun, Moon, and Stars were created, as petty  Gods, and as Inftruments to thofe other Gods of a fuperior Order : That then the Waters were created, out of  which were formed all Creatures : That a Woman was  firft made ; who, by the Congrefs of one of the Gods, conceived and brought forth Children ; and that thence Mankind had their Beginning. They thought, the Gods were  all of human Shape, and therefore reprefented them by  Images, which they placed in their Temples ; and they  worfliipped, prayed, fung, danced, and made many Offerings to them. They held the Immortality of the Soul ;  which after Death, according to it's Works in the Flefli,  was either carried up to the Tabernacles of the Gods, to  eternal Happinefs ; or elfe to Popogujfo (a great Pit at the  furtheft Parts of the Earth, where the Sun fets) into perpetual Fire and Torment. And this DocEtrihe they fupported by the Authority of two Perfons, who, as they pretended, -had rifen from the Dead. 6 C These rhe History of VIRGINIA. Book I, ,„ These Opinions w-ere thought to make but flight Impreffiohs on their Weroances^ or Kings ahd Rulers ; or upon  their Priefts, and other Perfons of Figure among them.  For that Chriftian Cuflom, for the Great and Eminent to  free their Confciences from the Shackles of a Creed, and  exempt their Adlions from the unwieldy Clog of Religion  and Morality, had reached even among thofe wild and favage Nations. But thefe Doctrines had a great Influence  on the common Sort. They kept them in proper Subjection to their Rulers ; and made them very, follicitous to obtain the Blifs, and avoid the Torments of the next Life. They were not however fo firm to their own Doctrines, but that they were very open to receive any Inftructions from the Englijh. Their Compafles, Perfpe(ftive  GlaflTes, Burning Glaffes, CJocks, Books, Writing, Guns,  and other Inflruments and Inventions, fo exceeded their  Capacities, and amazed them, that they thought them to  be the Works of Gods rather than Men ; or at leafl:, that  the Gods had taught the Englijh, how to' make them.  This caufed them to give great Credit to whatever they  faid concerning God and Religion. And Wingtna himfelf  would often be at Pjrayers with them ; and when he was  fick, which, he thought, proceeded from having ofi^ended  the Englijh and their God, he would fend for fome of them,  to pray, and be a Means to their God, of his living with  him after Death ; as alfo did many others. And pnce,  when their Corn was much hurt and withered with a long  Drought, thinking it proceeded from fome Injury done the  Englijh, they came to them in Flocks, and begged them  to pray to their God to preferve their Corn, for which  they promifed, when it was ripe, to give them a Part. And this high Opinion of the Englijh was greatly encreafed, by a marvellous Accident. The Country was that  Year afBifted with an epidemical Difeafe, which was obferved to fall upon none, but thofe Nations, which had endeavoured to injure or betray the Englijh. This wrought  many extravagant and fuperftitious Opinions, which were  much confirmed by the Healthinefs of the Englijh Colony.  Some thought it was the Work of the Englijh God ; and others,that theythemfelves fhot invifible Bullets from the Place,  where they dwelt. Others obferving, that the Englijh had  no Women of their own, nor cared for ■ any of theirs,  thought they were not born of Women, but were Men of  an ancient Generation, rifen again to Immortality ; that  there were more of them flill in the Air, as yet invifible  and without Bodies, who would afterwards come, and de{troy their Generation, and take their Places ; and that thefe. Book I. "The History of VIRGINIA. thefe, by the Entreaty, or out of Love to the Englijh^  made the People die, as they did, by fhooting invifible Bullets into them. And their Phyficians, to cover their Ignorance, w^ould make them believe, that they fucked out  of the Bodies of the Sick Leaden Bullets in the Strings of  Blood. In ftiort, Wingina and others wrere fo firmly perfuaded, that it happened through their Means, that when  any of their ovi^n Enemies had affronted or abufed the Engli/h, they would defire them to make them die in the fame  Manner. And altho' the Englijh remonftrated to them the  Unrighteoufnefs of their Requeft, and how difagreeable it  was to God ; yet becaufe the Effe£l fell out foon after,  they would come and return them Thanks in their Way ;  thinking, altho' they had denied them in Words, yet they  had in Reality fully anfwered their Defire. H E likewife tells us of the great Eflieem and Veneration,  in which the Natives held a Plant, which grew fpontaneoufly in the. Country, and was by them called Uppowoc^ but  is now well known by the Name of Tobacco ; derived, it is  faid,. from the Ifland of Tobago^ one of the Caribbees in the  Weft-Indies^ where it grew in vaft Quantities. The Leaves  of this they cured and dried, and then being rubbed into a  Sort of Bran and Duft, thgy put it into Earthen Tubes,  and drew the Smoke through the Mouth. They thought  this Plant of fo great Worth and Virtue, that even the  Gods themfelves were delighted with it. And therefore  they fometimes made facred Fires, and inftead of a Sacrifice  threw in this Duft ; and when they were caught in a Tempeft, they would fprinkle it into the Air and Water. Upon all their new fifliing Nets they would caft fome of it ;  and when they had efcaped any remarkable Danger, they  would throw fome of this Duft into the Air, with ftrange  diftorted Geftures, fometimes ftriking the Earth with their  Feet, in a Kind of Time and Meafure, fometimes clapping  their Hands, and throwing them up on high, looking up  to the Heavens, and uttering barbarous and diflbnant  Words. Mr. Harriot alfo, in paffing through their Towns,  would fh'ew them the Bible, and explain the ■ Contents :  That in that Book was taught the true and only God, his  Omnipotence, the Doftrine of Salvation by Jefus Chrift,  and the other principal Heads of our Religion. But he was  obliged to tell them, that there was no particular Virtue in  the material Book itfelf, but only in the Doftrines, which  it contained. For they paid their Kind of Adoration to the  Book, by handling, hugging, and killing it, and by applying it to their Head and Breaft, and ftroking it over the  other Parts of their Body. C 2 And Tbe History of VIRGINIA. Book I. And here, if it were an Imputation worthy of. Notice,  I might tranfiently remark the great Injuftice, done to this  learned Mathematician and pious Scholar. For as Sir fFaJter Ralegh was afperfed with holding atheiftieal Principles,  fo it has been faid, that he imbibed them from this Mr.  Hariot, whom he retained in his Service with a handfome  Penfion, to teach him the mathematical Sciences at his leifure Hours. But an orthodox Divine, Dr. Richard Corbet,  afterwards a Bifliop, tells us, that Hariofs deep Mine was  without Drofs. And Mr. George Chapman, another Contemporary, Si grave and virtuous Author, fays. That his  Judgment and Knowledge in all Kinds were deep and incomparable, and as much to be admired, as his moft blamelefs Life, and the right facred Expence of his Time, were  to be honoured and reverenced. To which might be added  other Teftimonies, which have been carefully colle(fted by  the diligent and induftrious Mr. Oldys, in his accurate Life  of Sir Walter Ralegh, lately prefixed to his Hiftory of the  World ; who likewife (hews, that the famous French Philofopher, Defcartes, borrowed much of his Light from this  excellent Mathematician ; and that the learned Dr. tVallis  gave the Preference to Harlot's Improvements, before Defcarte's, altho' he had the Advantage of coming after, and  being aflifted by him. As to this groundlefs Afperfion, the Truth of it perhaps  was, that Sir Walter and Mr. Hariot were the firft, who  ventured to depart from the beaten Tradt of the Schools,  and to throw off and combat fome hoary Follies and traditionary Errors, which had been riveted by Age, rfnd rendered facred and inviolable in the Eyes of weak and prejudiced Perfons. Sir Walter is" faid to have been firft led to  this, by the manifeft Dete<ftion, from his own Experience,  of their erroneous Opinions concerning the Torrid Zone ;  and he intended to have proceeded farther in the Search after more folid and important Truths, 'till he was chid and  reftrained by the Queen, into whom fome Perfons had infufed a Notion, that fuch Dodirine was againft God. And  this was fufficient Ground' for Men, zealous without Knowledge, and ftifly orthodox, with a Charity ufual to fome fuch  in all Ages, to brand him with the odious Names of Atheiji  and Deift ; altho' he was an eminent Aflertor of God and  Providence, and has in many Parts of his Writings, efpecially in the Hiftory of the World, given ftronger Evidences  of his Chriftian Faith, than any of his Detraflors ever did  of theirs. Mr. Lane and his Company carried home fome Tobacco, which, Cambden thinks, was the firft, that ever was brought Book I. The History of VIRGINIA. brought to England^ And Sir Walter Ralegh^ a Man of  Gaiety and Faftiion, readily gave into it, and by his Intereft and Example, foon brought it into fuch Vogue at  Court, that many great Ladies, as well as Noblemen, made  no Scruple fomtimes to take a Pipe. We are not informed, whether the Queen made Ufe of it herfelf ; but it is  certain, {he gave great Countenance and Encouragement to  it, as a Vegetable of fingular Strength and Power, which  might therefore prove of Benefit to Mankind, and Advantage to the Nation. So far, as Mr. Oldys well obferves,  was this wife Princefs from the refined Tafte of her Succeflbr, who held Tobacco in fuch Abomination, that he  not only refufed the Ufe of it himfelf, but endeavoured to  deftroy and fupprefs it among his SubjecSs, and would thereby have robbed the Crown of what has fince proved one of  its nobleft Jewels and moft confiderable Revenues, and the  Nation of a very advantageous and important Branch of  Trade. Sir Walter Ralegh's Tobacco-Box, with fome of his  Pipes, was lately extant, and laid up among the Rarities in  the Mufeum of that curious Antiquarian, the late Mr.  Ralph Thorejby^ of Leeds, in Torijhire. There are alfo  fome humerous Stories ftill remembred, concerning his firft  Ufe of Tobacco ; particularly his Wag^r with the Queen,  that he would determine exadlly the Weight of the Smoke  which went ofi^ in a Pipe of Tobacco. " This he did by firft  weighing the Tobacco, and then carefully preferving and  weighing the Afhes ; and the Queen readily granted, that  what was wanting in the prime Weight, muft be evapora-ted in Smoke. And when fhe paid the Wager, flie  faid pleafantly, that flie had heard of many Labourers in  the Fire, that turned their Gold into Smoke, but Ralegh  was the firft, who had turned his Smoke into Gold. It is  alfo related, that a Country Servant of his, bringing him a  Tankard of Ale and Nutmeg into his Study, as he was intently, engaged at his Book, fmoaking a Pipe of Tobacco,  the Fellow was fo frightened at feeing the Smoke reek out  of his Mouth, that he threw the Ale into his Face, in order to extinguifli the Fire, and ran down Stairs, alarming  the Family, and crying out. His Mafter was on Fire, and  before they could get up, would be burnt to Afhes. But whilft Mr. Lane and the Colony were in the above  mentioned Streights and Difficulties' in America^ Sir Walter  Ralegh was not idle at home. He provided a Ship of an  hundred Tons, and loaded her with Plenty of all things  necefTary for the Settlement ; but it being Eajier before fhe  departed, Mr. Lane and his Company had fhipped them- felves rbe History of VIRGINIA. Book I. felves for England in 'Sir Francis, Drake's Fleet, a icvf Days  before her Arrival. Having therefore fpent feme Time in  feeking them up the Country w^ithout Effed, they returned  that Summer to England, with all their Provifion. Those Authors who will have Sir Walter Ralegh to  have been in Virginia, fay, that he came upon this Voyage :  But the Conduit of it was fo weak and trifling, that I cannot be eafily induced to believe it agreeable to a Perfon of  his Senfe and Refolution ; who, had he been there, would  certainly have made fome vigorous Searches and Enquiries,  and left fome ufeful Remarks on the Country, as he did in  his Voyage to Guiana. Indeed it does not appear, that Sir  Walter was ever in his Colony himfelf. The only Authority of Weight for it, that I have met with, is the Tranflation  of Mr. Hafiofs Treatife, which mentions the A£tions of  thofe, qui GenerofUm D. Walterum Ralegh in earn regionem  comitati funt. But this, I am inclined to think, muft be  an Error of the Tranflator, who^ feems to have been a  Frenchman, and might not therefore perfeftly underftand  our Language ; and I could never yet get a Sight of Hariot's original Difcourfe, which was written in Englijh, but  have been obliged to make Ufe of the Latin Tranflation,  publifhed by De Bry, at Frankfort, 1590. But if Mr.  Hackluyt ever was in Virginia, as we are exprefly told by  De Bry, it muft have been, I think, either in this Voyage,  or that immediately following by Sir Richard Greenvil, of  which we have fuch brief and fummary Accounts. For it  is not to be fuppofed, that a Perfon of his Figure and Confideration, would have been entirely paiTed over in the  full and particiilar Relations, that we have of all the other  Voyages. About a Fortnight after the Departure of this Ship,  Sir Richard Greenvil arrived with three Ships more, well  provided ; but he neither found that Ship, according to  his Expeftation, nor could hear any News of the Colony,  which he himfelf had feated and left there the Year before.  Therefore, after travelling in vain up and down to feek  them, finding their Habitation abandoned, and being unwilling to lofe the Pofleflion of the Country,' he landed fifty  Men on the Ifland of Roanoke, plentifully furnifhed with  all Provifions for two Years, and fo returned to England. These unlucky Croffes and Accidents gave Occafion  to many Perfons to difcant on their Proceedings, to the  Difparagement of -Sir Richard Greenvil. But their Cenfure  was very unjuft. For to plant Colonies abroad, and to diffufe and propagate our Nation and our Trade, is certainly  a moft princely and noble Enterprize, and highly worthy a Perfon  Book I. "the History of VIRGINIA. Perfon of his eminent and illuftrious Family, And indeed  he feems to have." embarked in the Affair with great rHeartinefs and Refolution, and tp haye hazarded an^ expofed his  Perfon very freely in the Profecution of it. And it wzs upon  Occafion of thefe Murmurs and Reports, that Mr. Harlot  wrote and pubUihed his Difcourfe, before mentioned. 1587 The next Year, three Ships were fent, under the Command of Mr. yohn White, who was appointed Governor of  the Colony, with twelve Afliftants, as a Council. To thefe  Sir Walter Ralegh gave a Charter, and incorporated them  by the Name of the Governor and Afliftants of the City of  Ralegh in Virginia, with exprefs Dire£tions to feat at Chefapeake ; which, however ufeful and important, they neverthelefs difobeyed and negledled. Having taken the old  Route by the Weji-Indies, they had lite to have been caft  away upon Cape-Fear, through the Error or Defign of Simon Ferdi'nando. He had been with Captain Amidas in the  firft Expedition ; and being made Pilot in this, was fufpedled  of a Defign to ruin the whole Voyage. But being prevented by the Vigilancy of Captain Stafford, they arrived all  fafe at Hatteras the 22d of fuly. They went immediately to Roanoke, to look for the  fifty Men, left there by Sir Richard Greenvil, but they  found nothing but the Bones of a M^n ; and where the  Plantation had been, the Houfes were undeftroyed, but overgrown with Weeds, and the Fort defaced. They refitted the Houfes ; and Mr. George How, one of the Council, ftragling abroad, was flain by the Indians. Soon after.  Captain Stafford, with twenty Men, and Manteo, who, I  believe, had been again in England this Voyage, went to  Croatan, to enquire, if they could hear any News of the  Colony. There they underftood, that Mr. How had been  flain by fome of Wingina's Men of Daffamonpeake \ that  the fifty, left the Year before, had been fuddenly fet upon  by three hundred Indians, of Secotan, Aquafcogoc, and Daffamonpeake ; that after a fmall Skirmifli, in which one Englijhman was flain, they retired to the Water Side, and having got their Boat, and taken up four of their Feljows gathering Crabs and Oyfters, they went to a fmall Ifland by  Hatteras; that they ftaid there fome time, but after departed they knew not whither. And with this Account,  Captain Stafford returned to the Fleet at Hatteras. However, Mr. White endeavoured to renew and keep  up a good Underftanding with the feveral Nations of Indians  on the Sea-Coaft. But finding his Ofi«rs of Friendfhip not  much regarded, he refolved no longer to defer his Revenge  on thqk oi Dajfamonpeake. This Nation was feated right C 4 oppofite  •flbe History of VIRGINIA. Book I. oppofite to Roanoke Ifland, on the Main, in the Neck of  Land, between the River now called Jlkgator, and the  Narrows. About Midnight; Mr. M^hite fet forward, with  Captain Stafford^ and twenty four Men, whereof Manteo  was one, who was their Guide, and behaved himfelf as a  moft faithful Englijhman. They landed by Break of Day,  and having got beyond the Town, they affaulted fome Indians that were fitting by a Fire. ■ One was fliot through,  and they hoped to have been fully revenged, but were foon  undeceived, and found that they were their Friends of Croatan, come to gather their Corn, becaufe they underftood,  that the Dajfamonpeake Indians had fled after the Death  of Mr. How. Manteo, their Countryman, was grieved at  the Miftake ; but howevef, imputed it all to their own  I^olly. And fo having gathered what was ripe, and left  the reft unfpoiled, they returned to Roanoke. On the 13th of Augujl, Manteo., according to Command  from Sir Walter Ralegh., was baptized, and ftiled Lord of  Roanoke and Dajfamonpeake., in Reward of his Fidelity. And  on the 1 8th, the Governor's Daughter, Wife to Ananias  Dare., one of the Council, was delivered of a Daughter,  which, being the firft Child born there, was called Virginia.  And foon after, there arofe a Difpute between the Governor and his Afliftants or Council, concerning a Perfon to  be fent to England to follicit Supplies. All refufed, except  one, who was thought very unequal to the Bufinefs. At  laft, they unanimoufly pitched upon the Governor, as the  fitteft Perfon ; and having figned a Paper, teftifying his  Unwillingnefs to leave the Colony, they at length prevailed  upon him, with much Importunity, to undertake it. Leaving therefore above an hundred Perfons on one of the Iflands  of tiatteras., to form a Plantation, he departed, and after  many Crofles and Difficulties, got firft to Ireland., and from  thence went to England. At this time, the Nation was in great Commotion and  Apprehenfion of the Spanijh Invafion and invincible Arma~  da., as it was vainly called, and the Queen caufed frequent  Councils to be held, by the oldeft and moft experienced  Commanders at Sea ; and alfo appointed a Council of War,  of fuch Perfons as were in higheft Repute for military Skill  and Knowledge, in order to put the Land Forces of the  Kingdom in the beft Pofture of Defence. For this Purpofe were chofen the Lord Greyy Sir Francis Knolles, Sir  Thomas Leighton^ Sir Walter Ralegh, Sir John Norris, Sir  Richard Greenvil, Sir Richard Bingham, Sir Roger Williams, and Ralph Lane, Efq; late Governor of Virginia,  who were therefore all entirely taken up with thofe important Confultations. HowBook I. =rhe History of VIRGINIA. However, having laid a* Plan of Operations, and made  proper Difpofitions for the Defence of the Nation, Sir Walter found Leifure to fit out a fmall Fleet for the Relief of  the -Colony, at Biddeford^ early the next Year, which was  put under the Command of Sir Richard Greenvil; and only  waited for a fair Wind. But the Alarm of the vaft and formidable Armament, made by the King, of Spain, encreafing, all Ships of Force, then in any Readinefs, received  Orders from the State to (lay in their Harbours, for the  Defencp of their own Country ; and Sir Richard Greenvil  was perfonally commanded not to depart out of Cornwall,,  where Sir Walter Ralegh then was bimfelf, muftering and  training the For-ces, and performing other Duties of his  Office, as Lieutenant of that County. However, Gpyer^  nor White laboured fo ftrenuoufly with them, that he obtained two fmall Barks, and put to Sea from Biddeford, the  22d oi April, 1588. But thefe Veffels, tho' of little Force,  being more intent on a gainful Voyage, than the Relief of  the Colony, ran in Chace of Prizes ; till at laft, one of them,  meeting with two Ships of War, was, after a bloody Fight,  overcome, boarded, aiid rifled. In this maimed, -r^nfecked,  and ragged Condition, flie returned to England in a Month's  Time ; and in about three Weeks after, the other alfo returned, having perhaps tafted of the feme Fare, at leaft  without performing her intended Voyage, to the Diftrefs,  and as it proved, the utter Defl:ru(9:ioii of tJie Colony in  Virginia, and to the great Difpleafure of their Patron at  home. These Difappointments gave much Vexation to Sif  Walter Ralegh, who had by this Time expended, as we  are authenticly affured, not lefs than forty thoufand Pounds,  ,upon the Enterprife. He had alfo, not Jong before, received, as a Reward for his great Services in the Irijh  Wars, a very large Grant, out of the . Earl of Defmond's  Lands there ; the Terms of which he fairly and honefHy  endeavoured to fulfil, by planting thofe Lands with EngHJh,  and made Ufe of none of the Arts and Frauds, which pthers  of thofe Grantees were charged withal. So that this grea,t  Bounty of the Queen was at prefent rather a B.urthen and  Charge to him, than any real Profit or Advantage. Befides  which, he was among the foremojfl: of the military Geniufes  of that time, who were fired with the Spanijh Invafiofl, and  profecuted the War againft them with great Coft and Induftry, and with an incredible Courage and Succefs. Bor  all ^hefe Reafdns, Sir Walter Ralegh made an Affignnjent,  by Indenture, bearing Date the 7th of March, 1588-9, to 1589,  Thomas Smith, (afterwards Sir Thomas Smith, and a Per- fon  the History of VIRGINIA. Book I. fon of Note in the Sequel of this Hiftory ) with other Mer' chants and Adventurers of London, and to Governor White^  and other Gentlemen, for continuing the Plantation of Virginia. By this Indenture, he grants to the faid Thomas  Smith, John White, and the reft, according- to a Charter,  formerly granted for . the City of Ralegh, free Liberty to  carry to Virginia, and there inhabit, fuch of her Majefty's  Subjefts, as would willingly accompany them ; as alfo to  them, their Heirs, or AfTigns, free Trade and Traffick to  and from Virginia, or any other Part of America, where  the faid Sir Walter, his Heirs, or Affigns, did, or might  claim any Intereft, Title, or Privilege. And he did farther, for their Encouragement, and for the Common Utility,  freely and liberally give them one hundred Pounds, to be  employed for planting the Chriftian Religion in thofe barbarous and heathen Countries. And thus Sir Walter Ralegh, having difengaged himfelf for the prefent from this burthenfome and expenfive  Affair, gave a Loofe to his martial Genius, and bent his  whole Thoughts againft the Spaniards, which foon became  the fixed and ruling PafEon of his Nature ; as abafing the  exorbitant Power of France, and preventing its ill Confequences on the Liberties of Europe, did, in later Times,  engrofs all the Thoughts and Inclinations of King William,  and was the principal Aim of moft of his Steps and Actions.  And altho' this Comparifon may be thought very unequal with Relation to the Power and Dignity of the two  Perfons, yet it will, I think, be found juft and exadl with  Refpedi to their Inclinations and Defigns. For no Man of  that Age was more deeply fenfible of the pernicious Confequences of the Spanijh Power and Aims, or was more eager  and affiduous in fpeaking, writing, and adling againft them,  than Sir Walter Ralegh.  1590. But thefe new* Affignees were not fo diligent and care- ful of the Bufinefs, as they ought to have been. For it was  a Year after, March, 1589^90, before any thing was undertaken by them for the Relief of the Colony. Then Mr.  White, with three Ships, fet Sail from Plimouth ; and paffing by the Weji-Indies, they ftaid fome time there, to perform fome Exploits, as they call them, which was to attack and plunder the Spaniards, among whom they got a  confiderable Booty. On the 3d of Auguji, they fell in with  fome low fandy Iflands, to the Wejhuardoi Wococon. From  thrence they went to Croatan, and fo to Hatteras. There  they defcried a Smoke, at the Place, where the Colony had  been left three Years before. The next Morning, they  difcharged fome Cannon, to give Notice of their Arrival ; and Book I. ne History of VIRGINIA. and having fitted out two Boats, Captain Cooh and Captain  Spicer went aftiore, but found no Man, nor the Sign of  any, that had been there lately. The next Day, they  prepared to go to Roanoke \ but the Wind being hard  at North-Eaft, one of the Boats, in pafling a Bar, was half  filled with Water, and the other overfet. Captain Spicer^  with fix more, were drowned ; but four, who could fwim  a little, and did not truft themfelves to their Legs on the  Shoals, but kept in deep Water, were faved by the Care  and Dexterity of Captain Cooke in the other Boat. This  Accident fo difcomfited the Sailors, that they could hardly  be prevailed upon to make any farther Search for the Colony. But indeed, corifidering the Shoals and Dangers, with  their Ignorance and Inexperience of the Coaft, which they  unfortunately happened upon in this their firft Attempt towards a Settlement, it is rather to be wondered, that they  met not with more Accidents and Misfortunes, than they  really did. The Sailors being at .length encouraged by the Forwardnefs and Readineft of their Captains, two Boats more  were fitted out for Hatteras, with nineteen Men. When  Mr. White left the Colony three Years before, they talked  of going fifty Miles up into the Main ; and it had been  agreed between them, that if they left the Place, where  they then were, they fliould write the Name of the Place,  to which they went, on fome Tree, Door, or Pofl: ; and  if they had been in any Diftrefs, they fhould fignify it, by  making a Crofs over it. When they landed therefore, they  founded a Trumpet, but received no Anfwer ; and going up  to the Fire, they found, it was nothing but the Grafs and  fome rotten Trees burning. Then fearching up and down  the Ifland, they at laft found three fair Roman Letters  carved, C. R. O. but without any Sign of Diftrefs ; and  looking farther, they faw CROAT AN, carved in fair  Capital Letters on one of the chief Pofts, but ftill without  the Crofs, as a Sign of Diftrefs. Their Houfes were taken  down ; and an high Palifado built, after the Manner of a  Fort. They likewife found, where their Goods had been  buried ; but many of them had been dug up, and fcattered  about, and all were fpoiled ; yet Mr. White knew and  diftinguiftied feveral,of his own among them. With this  joyful Difcovery, as tkey hoped, of where they were, they  returned to their Ships ; but had like to have been caft  away by a violent Storm, that continued all that Night. The next Morning, weighing Anchor for Croatan,  which was an Indian Town on the South Part of Cape  Look-out^ one of their Cables broke, and carried ofF another  28 Tfe History of VIRGINIA. Book I. I590- ther Anchor with it. But letting go their third, the Ship . ^went fo faft adrift, that flie was very near ftranding. Dif- couraged with thefe Misfortunes, and having but one Anchor left, and their Provifions near fpent, they gave over  all Thoughts of farther Search for the prefent, and determined to go to the Weft-Indies^ to winter and refrelh themfelves (chiefly perhaps with more Spanijh Plunder) and to  return in the Springs to feek their Countrymen. But the  Vice-Admiral was obftinately bent upon going directly for  England; and the Wind being contrary, the reft were  obhg^d, within two Days, to make for the WeJiern-IJlands^  where they arrived the 23d of September^ 159°) ^nd ™^t  with many of the Queen's Ships, their own Confort, and  divers others. But many fufpe£led, that private Intereft  was the chief Occafion of their Failure in this Undertaking;  and that the Riches, gotten from the Spaniards in the WejiIndies^ was the true Reafon of their Return, for which the  Storm only furniflied them with a colourable Pretext.  However it is certain, that the.Aflignees made no farther  Search, nor gave themfelves any other Trouble about. the  Matter ; but thefe poor Souls were bafely deferted by them,  and left a -Prey to the barbarous Savages, neither were they  ever feen or heard of afterwards.  1591. The following Year 1591, Sir Richard Greenvil was  fent, by the Queen, Vice-Admiral to the Lord Thomas  Howard, with feven Ships of War, and a few other fmall  VeflTels, to intercept the Spanijh Plate-Fleet. At the A%ores, this fmall Squadron was furprifed by fifty three Capital  SMps, purpofely fent from Spain ; and Sir Richard Greenvil,  who was unwilling to leave a great Part of his Men, then  on Shore for Water and other Neceffaries, to the Infolence  and Barbarity of the Iflanders, ftaid fo long in getting them  off, that he was hemmed in between the Enemy's Fleet  and the Ifland of Flores. In this dangerous Situation, he  fcorned to ftiew any Signs of Fear, or to owe his Safety to  Flight ; but he bravely bore down upon the Enemy, and  endeavoured to break through them, in which Attenjpt he  maintained a gallant and obftinate Fight, with the beft of  the Spanijh Ships, for fifteen Hours together. He was at  once laid aboard by the St. Philip, a Ship of fifteen hundred  Tons and feventy eight large Pieces of Ordinance, and four  other of the ftouteft Ships in the Spanijh Fleet, full of Men,  in fome two hundred, in fome five hundred, and in others  eight hundred Soldiers, befides Mariners ; and he never had  lefs than two large Galleons by his Side, which, from time  to time, were relieved by frefli Ships, Men, and Ammunition, Yet he behaved himfelf with fuch uncommon Bravery Book I. T:he History of VIRGINIA. 29 very and Condud, that he difabled fome, funk others, and 1501.  obliged them all to retire. Neither did he ever leave the^  Deck, tho' wounded in the Beginning of the clofe Fight,  till he received a dangerous Wound in the Body by a Mufket  Bullet. When he went down to have it drefled, he received another Shot in the Head, and his Surgeon was killed  by his Side. By this time alfo moft of his braveft Men  were flain, his -Ship much di&bled, his Deck covered with  Dead, and Wounded, and fcattered Limbs, and his Powder  fpent to the veiry laft Barrel. Yet in this Condition be ordered the Veflel to be funk, but it was prevented by the  reft of the Officers ; tho' many of the Crew joined with  him, and the Ma-fter-Gunner, if he ^had 'not been reftrained, would have killed himfelf, fooner than fall into the  Hands of the Spaniards. When the 5hip, or rather  Wreck, was furrendered, Sir Richard was carried on board  the Spanijh Admiral, where he died within two Days,  highly admired by <the very Enemy, for his -extraordinary  Courage and Refolution. And when he found the Par^s of  •Death approach, he laid to the Officers, that flood round  him, in the Spanijh Tongue : Here die /, Richard Greenvil, with a jvyful and quiet 'Afind, having ended my Life like  a true Soldier^ that fought for his Country., ^Uetn^ Religion.,  and Honour : Thus fumming up, in ftiort, all the generous  Motives, that fire the Breafts of the truly Brave and Great,  to exert themfelves beyond the common Pitch -of Humanity. And fuch was the gallant End of this noble Gentleman,  who, next to Sir Walter Ralegh., was the principal Perfon  concerned in this firft Adventure of Virginia. He was a  Man eminently fitted to ferve his 'Country, in Peace or  War, by Land or Sea, and was fo deeply rooted in the Affeftion and Efteem of his illuftrious Kinfman, Sir IValter  ■Ralegh, that he honoured his Death with a particular Relation of the AAion 'by his own excellent Pen, which he  •caufed to be immediately;printed the latter End of the fame  Year 1591,' to obviate fome Afperfions, caft upon him by  fome of the Spaniards. The reft of the Englijh Ships  having Sea-Room, fought bravely, and did every thing,  that could be expected from valiant Men, whilft they had  the Advantage- of -the Wind. The Lord Howard was for  even hazarding the whole Fleetin the Refcueof Sir Richard  Greenvi I, znd for charging up to the Place, where he was  engaged. But he was over-ruled by the other Officers,  vwhofe; Prudence is commended even by Sir Walter Ralegh:,  -altho' no Perfon can certainly iky, I ^think, what might  have been I the Event, had fix Ships of War more befides the 30 The History of VIRGINIA. Book I. 1591. the Privateers, fallen upon an Enemy, whom one Ship alone  'had for fo long a time kept in fuch warm Action. When  the Night parted them from the Enemy, they all went off  fafe, and in their Way home took feveral rich Prizes. Sir  Richard's Ship too, the Revenge, of 500 Tons Burthen,  and about 20 Iron Guns, made good her Name. For a few  Days after fhe foundered at Sea, and drowned two hundred  Spaniards, who had been put aboard to carry her to Spain.  But Sir Walter Ralegh, being, by the above-mentioned  Aflignment, eafed in fome Meafure of the Undertaking of  Virginia, was foon engaged by his a£tive and enterprifing  Genius in other Adventures and Difcoveries. He contributed generoufly towards the Difcovery of the North-Weji  Paflagej and other things' of the like Nature. But having  loft his Royal Miftrefs's Favour, by debauching one of her  Maids of Honour, whom he afterwards married, he undertook in Perfon, in the Year 1595, the Voyage and Difcovery of Guiana, a rich Country up the River Oronaque, in  South America. After his Return, he wrote a moft excellent Difcourfe upon his Expedition, in which his chief Aim  was to engage the Queen and Nation in the Profecution of  the Enterprife, and Settlement of the Country. But all  his Reafons were overpowered by the Envy of fome great  Men to his Perfon and Merit ; and altho' he was reftored  to the Queen's Favour, yet he could never get any thing  done to EfFeft in this important and judicious Delign.  However he never quitted it himfelf, but fent twice immediately after, to make farther Difcoveries, and to keep up  the good Difpofitions of the Natives towards the Englijh.  Even after his Fall, and when he was in the Tower, he  found Means to continue this Defign ; and his laft Voyage  thither, after his Releafe, with the fatal Confequences of  it, is too well known, to need a particular Relation here.  Neither was he, notwithftanding the AiEgnment, negligent  or forgetful of the Colony, which had been feated in Virginia upon his Account. For he fent five feveral Times, to  fearch after, and relieve them ; and laft he difpatched  Samuel Mace, of Weymouth, in March 1 602. But he, like  all the reft, performed nothing, but returned with idle  Stories and frivolous Allegations. However, thefe Efforts of Sir Walter were only intended to recover and bring off thofe poor People, and no  ways in Profecution of his firft Defign of fettling a Colony. So that all Thoughts of Virginia were abandoned,  and the Projeft lay dead for near twelve Years, when it  was revived by Captain Bartholomew Gofnold, who undertook a Voyage thither, and fet Sail from Dartmouth, on the Book I. "We History 0/ VIRGINIA. the twenty fixth of March 1602, in a fmall Bark, with  thirty two Men. He kept as far North as the Winds would  permit, and was the firft that came in a diredl Courfe to  America, On the nth of May^ being about the Latitude of forty  three, they made Land, on the Goaft of New-England, as  it hath been fince called. But as all this Continent bore  the Name of Florida, till the Difcovery of the Englijh in  1584, fo afterwards all that Tracft of Country, from 34 to  45 Degrees of Northern Latitude, was called Virginia, till  from different Settlements it got different Names. The  Land was low ; the Shore white Sand, and rocky, yet overgrown with fair and ftately Trees. Coming to an Anchor,  eight Indians, in a Shallop, with Maft and Sail, came boldly  on board them. By their Signs, and by the Shallop and  other things, which they had, they judged, that fome Bifcayneers had been fifliing there. But finding no good Harbour, they weighed, and flood to the Southward into the  Sea. The next Morning, they found themfelves embayed  with a mighty Head-land ; and going to the neighbouring  Hills, they perceived it to be Part of the .Continent, almoft  environed with Iflands. Here, in a few Hours, they caught  more Cod, then they knew, what to do with ; from whence  the Place obtained the Name of Cape-Cod. And they thence  alfo concluded, that a good Fifliery might be found there,  in the Months oi March, April, and May. Soon after they went to the Iflands, and anchoi-ed near  one of them. They found it four Miles in Compafs, without Houfe or Inhabitant. In it was a Lake, near a Mile in  Circuit ; and the reft fo overgrown with Vines, which covered all the Trees and Buflies, that they could fcarce pafs  through them. They likewife found Plenty of Strawberries, Rafberries, Goofberries, and divers other Fruits in  Bloom, and therefore called the Ifland Martha'^ Vineyard.  They then vifited the reft of the Ifles, and found them repleniflied with the likg Produfts. One they named Elizabeth's IJland, in Honour to their ancient Sovereign, in which  they planted Wheat, Barley, Oats, and Peafe, which fprung  up nine Inches in fourteen Days. From hence they went  to the Main, where they flood for fome time raviflied at  the Beauty and Delicacy of the Country. But foon after  returning to Elizabeth's IJland, they fpent three Weeks in  building a Houfe, in a fmall Ifland of about an Acre of  Ground, which flood in the Midfl of a large Lake of frefli  Water, about three Miles in Circumference. They faw feveral of the Natives, with whom they  made mutual Prefents, and had fome fmall TraiKck. They were 'The History of VIRGINIA. Book I.  were of an excellent Conftitution of Body, aftive, ftrong,  healthful, and very ingenious, as divers of their Joys tefti^  fied. The bafer Sort would fteal, but thofe of better Rank  were very civil and juft. Not one of the EngUJh was afr  fefted with any Sicknefs ; bMt they rather grew more healthy and ftrong, notwithftanding their bad Diet and Lodging.  Twelve had refolved to ftay ; but, confidering how meanly  they were provided, they were at laft all obliged to leave  this Ifland, not without much Sorrow and Reluiftancy, and  arrived at Exmouth the 23d of yuly.  1603. The Beginning of the next Year, died that ever-memo^  rable and glorious Princefs, Queen Elizabeth, and was fuc^  ceeded by King James VI. of Scotland. He was fcarce  warm in his Throne, before, as a Prefege of his future weak  and inglorious Reign, he confined Sir Walter Ralegh in the  Tower, for a moft myfterious and inextricable Plot. This  great Man, as he was the firft Undertaker and Mover of  thefe Difcoveries, is ufually looked upon as the Founder and  Father of our Country. And indeed we are proud to own  for fuch, a Perfon of his diftinguiflied Merit and Parts,  who was one of the brightcft Ornaments of his Age and  Country, highly in the Favpur and Efteem of Queen Elizabeth, and afterwards the Sacrifice of her mean and pufillanimous Succeflbr. But yet it muft be confeffed, that his  Adventurers touched but once, aijd then flightly, on our  Country ; but ftill kept on in the fame unfortunate Tradl,  on the flioaly and importuous Coaft of North-Carolina.  Altho' bis Judgment foon diftinguiflied from the Accounts,  he received, the Advantages of Chefapeake for feating his  ■Capital City of Ralegh ; and had his Orders been followed,  it might perhaps have given a quite different Turn to the  Affairs of the Colony. For it woultf not only have freed  them from the Hazards and Difficulties, they encountered  on that dangerous Coaft, and every where have fupplied  them with fafe and convenient Harbours, but would have  naturally led them to the Search a|}d Difeovery of one .o|f  the moft commodious Countries perhaps in the World, for  •Shipping and Veffels. The fame Year 1603, by the Perfuafions of Mr.  Richard HacMuyt (a curious and inquifitive Gentleman, and  foon after a Prebend of Wejiminjler, who publifhed the  noted CoUedlion of Voyages and Travels) the Mayor and  Aldermen, with moft of che Merchants of Brijiel, raifed a  Stock of a thoufand Pounds, and fitted out two Veffels.  But firft they obtained the Leave and Permiilion of Sir  Walter Ralegh, as Proprietor of the Country, to make  Difcoveries in Virginia. Martin Pring was made Captain,  Book I. The History 0/ VIRGINIA. an underftanding Gentleman and able Mariner ; and Robert  Saltern^ who had been with Captain Gojnold the Year before, was appointed his Affiftant and Pilot. But as, for  the moft Part, they followed Captain GofnoW% Courfe,  their Difcoveiies were nothing extraordinary or different  from his. But anotlier Bark was this Year fent from London^ under the Command of Captain Bartholomew Gilbert^ who  had likewife been with Captain Gojnold. After fome fmall  Trade in the Weji-Indies^ they fell in with the Coaft of  America in about 37 Degrees of Northern Latitude ; and  fome Authors fay, they run up into Ghejapeake Bay, where  the Captain, going afhore, was killed with four of his  Men. This ftruck fuch a Damp and Difcouragement into  the reft, that they immediately weighed Anchor, and returned to England^ without any further Attempt or Difcovery. Two Years after. Captain George Weymouth was fent by iSoj.  the Earl of Southampton and the Lord Arundel of Warder^  to make Difcoveries on the Coaft of Virginia. He intended to the Southward of 39 ; but was forced by the Winds  farther Northward^ and fell among fome Shoals in 41 Deg.  20 Min. But having happily difengaged themfelves, on the  1 8th of May they made Land. It appeared to be a main  high Land, but they found it an Ifland of fix Miles in  Compafs. From thence they could difcern the Continent  and very high Mountains ; and coafting among the Iflands,  adjoining to the Main, they found an excellent Harbour.  They dug a Garden the twenty fecond of May ; and among  their Seeds, they fowed Barley and Peafe, which grew up  eight Inchfes in fixteen Days ; altho' they judged the Mould  much inferior to what they found afterwards on the Main.  On the 30th of May., the Captain with thirteen more, went  to view and difcover the Continent ; and having found a  fair River, running up into the Country, they returned  back to bring in the Ship. What River this was, and  what Part of the American Coaft they fell upon, is difficult  to determine exadlly. For their neglefting to tell us what  Courfe they fleered, after they were difengaged from the  Shoals, renders it doubtful, whether they fell in with fome  Part of the Maffachufet's Bay ; or rather farther Southward,  on the Coaft of Rhode-IJland., Naraganjet^ox ConneSiicut ;  altho' I am moft inclined to believe, this River was either  that of Naraganfet or ConneSiicut ; and the Ifland, what is  now called Block-IJland. However it is certain, that Oldmixon, (the Author of the Book, entitled. The Britijh Empire in America) according to his ufual Cuftom, is here  T D moft  7/&£- History o/ VIRGINIA. Book 11. moft egregioufly bewildered and loft. For" after having,  injudicioufly enough, determined the fmall Ifland they firft  made, of fix Miles in Compafs, to be Long-IJland, on the  Coaft of New-Tor k, he immediately after, with ftill greater Abfurdity and Grofnefs, calls this the River of Powhatan, now James River, to the Southward, as he lays, of  the Bay of Chefapeake. When Captain Weymouth returned aboard, he found,  that the Indians had contrafted an Acquaintance with his  Crew ; that they had had fome fmall Trade together ; and  that there was much outward Shew of Kindnefs and Civility between them. For as the Englijh intended to inhabit  their Country, and as it was the chief Defign of the noble  Adventurers, who had fent them, to propagate Chriftianity  among thofe barbarous People, they ufed them very kindly ;  and exchanging Hoftages, would fometimes lie amore with  them, and they fometimes aboard with the Englijh. At  laft they were very preffing with the Captain, to go to the  Main, to trade with their Balhabes, or chief Lord. He  accordingly manned his Boat with fourteen Hands, and attended them. But having plainly difcovered their Treachery, and that it was only a Stratagem to cut them ofF,  he feifed five, and ever afterwards treated them with great  Civility, but never more trufted them. Having fpent fome time in founding all the Ifles,  Channels, and Inlets, and found four feverul Ways of bringing a Ship into the Bay, they at laft ran theirs twenty fix  Miles up the River. They found, it flowed eighteen Feet,  was a Mile wide forty Miles from the Mouth, had a bold  Channel from fix to ten Fathom deep, and every half Mile  beautiful Coves and Harbours, fome of them to contain an  hundred Sail of Veflels. The Land was very rich, trending all along in an equal Plain, neither mountainous nor  rocky, but verged with a green Border of Grafs ; and the  Woods were large 'and tall, and delightfully watered with  many frefli Springs and Rivulets. Leaving their Ship, they  went feven Miles higher than the fait Water flowed, and  then marched towards the Mountains. But the Weather  was fo hot, and the Fatigue fo great, that having eredled  a Crofs, they willingly returned to their Ship. Soon after,  they failed for England, and arrived at Dartmouth the i8th  of July; carrying with them the five Indians, taken by  the Captain, whereof one was a Sagamo, or Commander,  and three others, Perfons of Figure and Diftindlion in their  own Country. THE 35  THE HISTORY OF  V I R G I N I A, BOOK II. ^^^^ A P T A I N Bartholomew Gofmld had made a  ^ ^ Voyage to the Northern Parts of Virginia^ in  ^ C ^ the Year 1602, as hath been before related.  ^^^^ He was fo wonderfully pleafed with the Plea5e;5«^5fl? fantnefs and Fertility of the Places he faw,  that, after his Return to England^ he made it his Bufinefs  to foliicit all his Friends and Acquaintance, to join with  him in an Attempt to fettle fo delightful a Country. After  fome Years fpent in vain, he at laft prevailed with Captain John Smithy Mr. Edward-Maria Wingfield^ the Rev.  Mr. Robert Hunt^ and divers others, to join in the Undertaking. But fettling Colonies is an Enterprife of too great  Burthen and Expence for a few private Perfons ; and therefore, after many vain Projects, they applied themfelves to  feveral of the Nobility, Gentry, and Merchants^ and by  their great Charge and Induftry, recommended their Scheme  fo efFecStually to them, that they came into it very heartily.  And firft. Letters patent were obtained from King  James I. bearing Date the loth of April, 1606, to Sjr Thomas Gates, and Sir George Somers, Knights, Richard Hackluyt. Clerk, Prebendary of Wejiminfter, Edward-Maria  Wirigfield, with others unnamed, for the Southern Colony ;  and to Thornas Hanham, and Ralegh Gilbert, Efqrs, William Parker, and George Popham, Gentlemen, and others  D 2 unnamed, 1606.  rhe History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book IL unnamed, for the Northern Colony. By this Charter, all  that Tra£b of Country, from 34 to 45 Degrees of North  Latitude, which then went under the common Name of  Virginia, was divided into two Parts ; called the Firft Colony and the Second. The Firft or Southern Colony was  defigned for the City of London, and fuch as would adven^  ture with them, to difcover and chufe a Place of Settlement,  any where between the Degrees of 34 and 41. The Second or Northern Part, was appropriated to the Cities of  Brijiol, Exeter, Plimouth, and the Wejlern Parts of England, and all thofe, that would adventure and join with  them, to make their Choice, any where between the .Degrees of 38 and 45 ; provided, there fltould be at leaft an  hundred Miles Diftance between the two Colonies. For  each of them was to extend fifty Miles from the Place of  their firft Habitation, each way along the Coaft. But I  fliall make no Abftra(ft of this Charter, having caufed it to  be printed at large in the Appendix, to which I refer the  Reader. But befides this Charter, the King gave divers Articles,  Inftru(Sions, and Orders, under his Sign Manual, and the  Privy Seal of England, dated the 20th of November, 1606 ;  wherein he eftablifhes and ordains a Council, under - the  Name of the King's Council for Virginia. This confifted  of the following Perfons ; Sir William Wade, Lieutenant  of the Tower of London, Sir Thomas Smith, Sir Walter  Cope, Sir George More, Sir Francis Popham, Sir Ferdinando  Gorges, Sir "John Trevor, Sir Henry Montagu, Recorder of  the City of London, and Sir William Romney, Knights j  John Dodderidge, Sollicitor General, and Thomas Warr,  Efqrs; "John Eldred, of the City of London, Thomas fames,  of Brijiol, and "James Bagg, of Plimouth, in the County of  Devon, Merchants. But thefe being foon found too few,  and by Reafon of the Diftance of their Habitations from  each other, difficult to be got together in any competent  Number, his Majefty, by an Ordinance dated the 9th of  March following, augmented this Council with Sir Thomas  Challenor, Sir Henry Nevil, Sir Fulke Grevil, Sir John  Scot, Sir Robert Manfel, Sir Oliver Cromwell, Sir Morris  Berkeley, Sir Edward Michelborne, Sir Thomas Holcroft, Sir  Thomas Smith, Clerk of the Privy Council, Sir Robert Killigrew. Sir Herbert Croft, Sir George Copping, Sir Edwin  Sandys, Sir Thomas Roe, and Sir Anthony Palmer, Knights,  nominated to him by and on the Behalf of the firft Colonyand with Sir Edward Hungerford, Sir John Mallet, Sir John  Gilbert, Sir Thomas Freake, Sir Richard Hawkins, and Sir  Bartholomew Mitchel, Knights j Thomas Seamer, Bernard Greenvil, Book IL The History of VIRGINIA. Greenvil, and Edward Rogers^ Efqrs ; and Matthew Sutdiff'e,  Do6lor of Divinity, and afterwards Dean of Exeter^ nominated to him by and on the Behalf of the fecond Colony. In this laft: Inftrument, there was a Diftinftion and Seperation made of the two Councils ; but in the former of  the 20th of November, Sir William Wade, and the reft,  were conftituted his Majefty's Council for both Colonies,  for all Matters that fhould hz^^^n m Virginia, or any the  Territories of America, between 34 and 45 Degrees of  North Latitude, according to the Purport and Tenor of  the Letters patent : That they fhould have full Power  and Authority, at the Pleafure, and in the Name of his  Majefty, his Heirs, or Succeflbrs, to give Directions to  the Councils, refident in America, for the good Government of the People there, and for the proper ordering  and difpofing all Caufes within the fame, in Subftance  as near to the Common Law of England, and the Equity  thereof, as might be ; referving to his Majefty, his Heirs  and Succeflbrs, a Power to increafe, alter, or change  the faid Council, at their Will and Pleafure : And that  this his Majefty's Council in England, fhould nominate  and "appoint the firft Members of the feveral Councils,  to be refident in the Colonies. "^^That the faid Councils, refident in the Colonies, or  the major Part of them, fhould chufe one of their own  Body, not being a Minifter of God's Word, to be Prefident of the fame, and to continue in that Office by the  Space of one whole Year, and no longer : And that it  fhould be lawful for the major Part of the faid Councils,  upon any juft Caufe, either of Abfence or otherwife, to  remove the Prefident, or any other of the Council \ and  in Cafe of Death or fuch Removal, to eledl another into  the vacant Place : Provided always, that the Number of  each of the faid Councils fhould not exceed thirteen.  " That the faid Prefidents, Councils, and the Minifters,  fhould provide, that the true Word and Service of God  be preached, planted, and ufed, not only in the faid Colonies, but alfo, as much as might be, among the Savages bordering' upon them, according to the Rites and  Do£brine of the Church of England.  " That they fhould not fufFer any, to withdraw the  People of the faid Colonies from the Allegiance of the  King, his Heirs, or SuccefTors ; but fhould caufe all  Perfons fo offending, to be apprehended and imprifoned,  till full and due Reformation, or if the Caufe fo required,  fhould fend them to England, with all convenient Speed,  there to receive condign Punifhment. D 3 " That •The History of VIRGINIA. Book II. " That all Lands, Tenements, and Hereditaments,  fliould be had, inhabited, and enjoyed, within the faid  Colonies, as the like Eftates are held and enjoyed, by  the Laws in England. . " That Tumults, Rebellion, Confpiracy, Mutmy,  and Sedition, together with Murder, Manflaughter, Inceft. Rapes, and Adultery, committed within any of the  Degrees aforefaid, (and no other Offences) fliould be  puniflied by Death without Benefit of Clergy, except in  Cafe of Manflaughter, to which Clergy fliould be allowed: And that the faid Prefidents and Councils, within  their feveral Limits and Precinfts, fliould have full Power  and Authority, to hear and determine concerning the  faid Offences, in Manner and Form following ; viz. by  a Jury of twelve honeft and indifferent Perfons, returned  by proper Officers, . and fworn upon the Evangelifts,  who fliould, according to the Evidence given, upon their  Oath, and according to the Truth in their Confciences,  convidl or acquit the feveral Perfons fo accufed, and  tried by them : That every Perfon who fliould voluntarily confefs the faid Offences, or fliould ftand mute, and  refufe' to plead, or make diredl: Anfwer, fliould be, and  be held as fully convifted of the fame, as if he had been  found guilty by the Verdift of the twelve Jurors aforefaid : That the faid Prefidents and Councils, or the Major Part of them, within their feveral Precincfts and Limits, fhould have full Power and Authority, to give  Judgment of Death upon every fuch Offender, without  Benefit of Clergy, except in Cafe of Manflaughter only :  And that no Perfon, fo adjudged or condemned, fhould  be reprieved, but by the Confent of the faid Prefident  and Council, or the major Part of them ; nor fhould  receive full Pardon, or be abfolutely difcharged from the  faid Offences, but by the Pardon of the King, his Heirs,  or Succeffors, under the Great Seal of England : And finally, that all Perfons, offending as aforefaid, within  the Degrees abovementioned, but out of the Precindls  of their own Colony, fhould be tried and puniflied in  their proper and refpedlive Colony. " That the faid Prefidents and Councils, within their  feveral PrecincSs and Limits, fhould have Power and Authority, to hear and determine all other Wrongs, TrefpaflTes, and Mifdemeanors whatfoever ; and on fufficient • Proof upon Oath, fhould refpedtively punifli the Offen- • ders, either by reafonable corporal Punifliment and Im- • prifonment, or elfe by awarding fuch Damages, or other  ■ Satisfadlion, to the Parties aggrieved, as to them, or the " more Book 11. The History of VIRGINIA. " more Part of them, fhould feem fit and convenient : And  " that the faid Prefidents and Councils flvould have Powder  " to punifti all Manner of Excefs, through Drunkennefs  " or otherwlfe, and all loitering, idle, and vagrant Per" fons, within their refpeftive Precinfts, according to their  " beft Difcretions, and with fuch convenient Punifliment,  " as they, or the moft Part of them, fhould think fit :  " That thefe judicial Proceedings fhould be made fumma" rily and verbally, without Writing, till they came to the  " Judgment or Sentence, which fhould be briefly regiflred  " into a Book, kept for that Purpofe, together with the  " Caufe, for which the faid Judgment or Sentence was  " given, fubfcribed by the faid Prefident and Council, or  " by fuch of them as gave the Judgment. " That for five Years, next after their landing on the  " Coafl of Virginia, the faid feveral Colonies, and every  " Perfon thereof, fhould trade altogether in one Stock, or in  " two or three Stocks at mofl, and fhould bring all the Fruits  " of their Labours there, with all their Goods and Com" modities from England or elfewhere, into feveral Maga" zines or Storehoufes, for that Purpofe to be eredted, in  " fuch Order, Manner, and Form, as the Councils of the  " refpeftive Colonies, or the more Part of them, fhould  " prefcribe and dire£l: : That there fhould be annually cho" fen by the Prefident and Council of each Colony, or the  " major Part of them, one Perfon of their Colony, to be  " Treafurer or Cape-Merchant of the fame, to take Charge  " of, and to manage, all Goods and Wares, brought into,  " or delivered out of, the faid Magazihes ; upon whofe  " Death, voluntary Refignation, or Removal for any juft  " and reafonable Caufe, it fhould be lawful for the faid  " Prefident and Council, to eledt any other, or others, in  " his Room :^ That there fhould alfo be defied, by the  " faid Prefident and Council, two others (or. more, if need  " be) Perfons of Difcretion ; the one to enter into a Book,  " kept for that Purpofe, all Goods, Wares, and Merchan" difes, brought into ; and the other, to charge, in a like  ■" Book, all taken out of the faid Magazines or Storehoufes;  " which Clerks fhould continue in their Places, only at the  " Will of the Prefident and Council of their refpeftive Co" lony : And laftly, that every Perfon of each of the faid  " Colonies, fhould be furnifhed with NecefTaries out of the  " faid Magazines, for the Space of five Years, by the Ap" pointment, Direftion, and Order, of the Prefident and  " Council of their refpecftive Colonies, or of the Cape" Merchant and two Clerks, or the major Part of them. D 4 " That "The History of VIRGINIA. Book II. " That the Adventurers of the Firft Colony fhould  " chufe, out of themfelves, one or more Companies, each  " confifting of three Perfons at the leaft, to refide in or  " near London, or at fuch other Place or Places, as the  " Council for that Colony, .for the time being, or the moft  " Part of them, during the faid five Years, fliould think  " fit : In the fame Manner, that the Adventurers of the  " Second Colony fliould chufe the like Companies, to be  " refident at or near Plimouth, or at fuch one, tviro, or  " three other Places or Ports, as the Council for that Co" lony fliould think fit : And that thefe minor Companies  " fliould, from time to time, take Care and Charge of  " the Trade, and an Account of all the Goods, Wares,  " and Merchandifes, that fliould be fent from England to  " their refpedtive Colonies, and brought from the Colonies  " into England, and of all other Things, relating to the  " Affairs and Profits of their feveral Companies. " That no Perfon fliould be admitted to abide or re" main in the faid Colonies, but fuch as fliould take, not  " only the ufual Oath of Obedience, but alfo the Oath,  " prefcribed in the laft Seffion of Parliament, holden at  " Wejlmtnjler in the fourth Year of his Majefl:y's Reign,  " for due Obedience to the King, his Heirs, and Succef" fors. " That the Prefidents and Councils of the faid Colo" nies, or the major Part of them, fliould have Powder to  " conftitute, make, and ordain, from time to time, Law^s,  " Ordinances, and Officers, for the better Order, Go" vernment, and Peace of their refpeftive Colonies ; pro" vided neverthelefs, that thofe Ordinances and Conftitu" tions did not touch any Party in Life or Member ; And  " that the faid Law^s and Ordinances fliould fland and con" tinue in full Force, till the fame fliould be otherwife  " altered or. made void by the King, his Heirs, or Suc" ceflbrs, or by his Majefl:y's Council in England for Vir" ginia, or by their own Council, there refident : Provided  " always, that the faid Alterations fliould ftand with, and  " be in Subftance confonant to, the Laws of England, or  " the Equity thereof. " That all Perfons fliould kindly treat the favage and  " heathen People in thofe Parts^ and ufe all proper Means  " to draw them to the true Service and Knowledge of  " God, and that all jufl: and charitable Courfes fliould be  " taken with fuch of them, as would conform themfelves  " to any good and fociable Traffick, thereby the fooner to  " bring them to the Knowledge of God, and the Obe" dience of the King, his Heirs, and Succeffors, under fuch " fevere Book II. "The History of VIRGINIA. " fevere Pains and Punifliments, as fhould be inflidted by  *' the refpeftive Prefidents and Councils of the feveral Co*' lonies. " That as the faid Colonies fliould, from time to  *' time, encreafe in Plantation, the King, his Heirs, and  " Succeffors, fliould ordain and give fuch Order, and fur" ther Inftrudlions, Laws, Conftitutions, and Ordinances,  " as by them fliould be thought fit and convenient : Prd" vided always, that they be fuch as might ftand with, and  " be confonant to the Laws of England, or the Equity  " thereof. "And laftly, that his Majefty's Council in England  " for Virginia, fhould take fuch Oath, as fliould be limit" ed and appointed by the Privy Council ) and each Coun" fellor, refident in the Colonies, fliould take fuch Oath,  " as fliould be prefcribed by the King's Council in England  " for Virginia : And that thefe, as well as all future Or" ders and Inflirudiions of the King, his Heirs, or Succef" fors, fliould be tranfmitted over to the feveral Councils,  " refident in the faid Colonies, under the legal Seal of the  *' King's Council in England for Virginia." These Articles contain feveral Things of an extraordinary Nature ; which Sir John Randolph, in the Sketch,  he has left of the Beginning of his Hifl:ory of Virginia, promifed afterwards to animadvert upon. , I am no Lawyer,  and therefore fliall not prefume to enter deeply into the  Matter. I ftiall only tranfiently remark, that, notwithftanding the frequent Repetition of the Laws of England,  and the Equity thereof, his Majefty feems, in fome things,  to have deviated grofly from them. He has certainly made  fufficient Provifion for his own defpotic Authority ; and  has attributed an extravagant and illegal Power to the Prefidents and Councils. For he has placed the whole Legiflative Power folely in them, without any Reprefentative of  the People, contrary to a noted Maxim of the Englifls  Conftitution ; That all Freemen are to be governed by Laws,  made with their own Confent, either in Perfon, or by their  Reprefentatives. He has alfo appointed Juries only in Cafes  of Life and Death ; and has left all other Points, relating  to the Liberty and private Property of the Subjedt, wholly  to the Pleafure and Determination of the Prefidents and  Councils. He has indeed, agreeably to the DiiSates of his  own Nature, been exprefs enough with Refpeft to Rebellion, Confpiracy, and other Offences immediately againfl  the Magiflrate ; but then he has been very fparing in all  other criminal Matters. For altho' he has made Adultery  punifhable with Death, contrary to the Laws of England,  « ■' and Th History of VIRGINIA. Book II. and contrary to a greater, the Law of the Gofpel, in the  noted Determination of our B. Saviour, concerning the  Woman taken in Adultery ; yet he has paffed over all the  feveral Species of Robbery, Burglary, and Felony, w^th  other Crimes, capital by the La.ws of England, and declared, that none, but thofe there fpecified, fliould be fubje£t  to the Punifliment of Death. However, furnifhed with thefe Powers and Authorities, the Firft or Southern Colony, which ftill retains the  Name of Virginia, was undertaken and begun by feveral  Nobleman, Knights, Gentlemen, Merchants and Citizens,  in and about London; and they chofe Sir Thomas Smith,  a very eminent and wealthy Merchant of London, their  Treafurer, to have the chief Management of their Affairs,  and to fummon and prefide in all Meetings of the Council  and Company in England. He had been the chief of Sir  Walter Ralegh's Affignees, and was either now, or foon  after, Governor of the Eajl-Jndia Company ; and had alfo  been fent, two Years before, his Majefty's Embaffador to  the Emperor of RuJJia. And next, having provided two  Ships and a fmall Bark, they committed the Tranfportation of the Colony to Captain ChriJlopTjer Newport, who  was efteemed a Mariner of Ability and Experience on the  American Coafts. For he had fourteen Years before. Anno  1592, with much Reputation and Honour, conducted an  Expedition againft the Spaniards in the Weji-In^es ; where,  with three Ships and a fmall Bark, he took feveral Prizes,  plundered and burnt fome Towns, and got a conllderable  Booty. T o him therefore, by an Inftrument, bearing Date the  lOth of December 1 606, under the legal Seal of the Council, they gave Power to appoint all Captains, Soldiers, and  Mariners, and to have the fole Charge and Command of  the fame, and of the whole Voyage, from the Date thereof, till they fhould land on the Coaft of Virginia ; and in  Cafe of his Death, the feveral Captains of the Ships and  Bark were ordered and impowered, to proceed and carry  them to the Coaft of Virginia aforefaid. To Captain Newport, Capt. Bartholomew. Gofnold, and Captain John Ratcliffe, they alfo delivered feveral Inflj-uments, clofe fealed  with the Councils Seal, which they, the Survivors, or Survivor of them, ihould, within twenty four Hours after  their Arrival on the Coaft of Virginia, and not before, open  and unfeal, and publifh the Names of the Perfons, therein  fet down, who fliould be declared and taken to be his Majefty's Council for that Colony: That the faid Council  fliould immediately proceed to the Choice and Nomination of Book II. TAe History 0/ VIRGINIA. 43 of a Prefident, who fhould have two Votes in all Matters 'fi°6of Controverfy and Queftion, where the 'Voices happened ^-~~y~— '  to be equal ; and fhould have full Power and Authority,  with the Advice of the reft of the Council, or the greater  Part of them, to govern, rule, and command, all the  Captains and Soldiers, with all other Perfons whalfoever of  the faid Colony ; And that the Prefident, immediately  upon his Eleftion, fhould, in the Prefence of the Council,  and of twenty others of the principal Adventurers in the  Voyage, to be by the Prefident and Council called thereto,  take his Oath, according to a Form prefcribed, to bear true  Allegiance to the King, and for the Performance of his  Duty in the Place and Office of Prefident; after which he  fhould adminifter the like Oath to each of the Council particularly. And finally, Captain Newport was commanded,  with fuch a Number of Men, as fhould be affigned him by  the Prefident and Council, to beftow two Months in the  Search and Difcovery of the Rivers and Ports of the Country, and to give prefent Order for the lading the two Ships  (the Bark being defigned to remain in the Country) with  fuch principal Commodities and Merchandife, as could there  be had and found, and to return with the (aid Ships, full  laden, bringing a particular Account of every thing, by  the laft of May following, if God permit. To these Orders the Council added other Inftruftions,  by way of Advice, concerning their ftri<9: Obfervation of  the above-mentioned Ordinances by the King's Majefly,  delivered to them under the Privy Seal; concerning the  Choice of a Place, and the Manner of feating themfelves ;  the necefTary Orders and Methods of Difcovery ; their  Caution before, and Behaviour towards, the Natives ; with  various other Counfels and Diredtions for the better conducing themfelves and the Enterprife. And as the Council  in England vftre ever follicitous and intent on the Difcovery  of the South-Sea, as the certain and infallible Way to immenfe Riches, they were commanded, if they happened to  difcover divers navigable Rivers, and among them any, that  had two main Branches, if the Difference was not great,  to make Choice of that, which tended moft towards the  North-tVeJi ; fince the other Sea, as they judged, would  be fooneft found that Way. And they were to difcover, if  they could, whether the River, on which they feated, fprung  out of the Mountains or out of Lakes.- For if it rofe from  any Lake, it was likely, that the PafTage to the other Sea  would be the more eafy, and that out of the fame Lake  they might find fome other Stream, running the contrary  Way, towards the Eaji-India, or South-Sea. And they conrk History <?/ VIRGINIA. Book If. concluded laftly and chiefly, that the Way to profper and^  ' obtain Succefs was to make themfelves all of one Mind, for  their own and their Country's Good, and to ferve and fear  God, the Giver of all Gopdnefs, fince every Plantation,  which he did not plant, would certainly be rooted out. All thefe Orders and Inftrucaions being put into a  Box, they fet Sail from Blackwali the 19th of December  1606 ; but were kept fix Weeks on the Coaft of England  by contrary Winds. Even then they neglefted the Council's laft falutary Advice, concerning Unity and Concord  among themfelves. For they began to fall into fuch Factions and Difcords, as would have ruined the whole Voyage,  had not Mr. Hunt^ their Preacher, by his prudent Coniixdt and pious Exhortations, allayed their Fury and Dif"  fenfion. That good Man, altho' he was fo fick and weak  the whole Time, that iew expetfted bis. Recovery, and had  the additional Aggravation of being the principal Objeft of  their Malice and Reproach, yet bore all with the utmoft  Meeknefs and Patience, And he never betrayed the leaft  feeming Defire to leave the Bufinefs, altho' his Habitation  was but twenty Miles from the Downs, but preferred the  Service of God and his Country, in fo good a Voyage, before all other private Refpe£l:s or Confiderations whatfoever.  1607. As foon as they got clear of the Coaft of England, they took the old Rout by the Canaries, where they watered*  Here their Quarrels and DilTenfidns grew fo high, that  Captain Smith was feized and committed clofe Prifoner. It  was fuggefted by Mr. Wingfield and fome others of the chief  among them, who envied his Repute and Intereft with the  Company, that he intended to murder the Council, ufurp  the Government, and make himfelf King of Virginia ; and  this, they pretended, would be attefted and proved againft  him by feveral of his Confederates, who were difperfed in  all the three Ships. Upon thefe fcandalous Suggeftions, he  was fufpefted, and kept in clofe Confinement thirteen  Weeks, From the Canaries they went to the WeJi~Indies ;  where having traded with the Natives, and ftaid three  Weeks to refrefh themfelves, they fteered away Northward,  in Search of Virginia. The Mariners had pafled their  Reckoning three Days, and yet found no Land ; which fo  diflieartened the Company, that Captain Ratcliffe, Commander of the Bark, was urgent to bare up the Helm, and  return for England. But a violent Storm, obliging them  to hull it all Night under their bare Poles, drove them providentially, beyond all their Expeftations, to their defired  Port. For the next Day, being the 26th of Jpril 1607, they  Book IL 'The Hibtory 0/ VIRGINIA. they made a Coaft, which none of them had ever feen.  The firft Land, they^ drfcried, they called Cape-Henry, in '  Honour to the Prince of Wales ; as the Northern Cape  was named Cape-Charles, after the Duke of Tark, King  yames's fecond Son at that time, and afterwards King  Charles I. of England, Thirty Men went afliore on CapeHenry, to recreateand refrem themfelves^ but they were  fuddenly aflaulted by five Savages, who wounded two of  them very dangeroufly. Within thefe Capes they found a Country, which,  according to their own Defcri.ption, might claim the Prerogative over the mofl: pleafasnt Places in the known World,  for large and majeftic navigable Rivers, for beautiful  Mountains, Hills, Plains, ValMes, Rivulets, and Brooks,  gurgling down, and running moft pleafantly into a fair Bay,  encompafled on all Sides, except at the Mouth, with fruitful and delightfome Land. In the Bay and Rivers were  many Iflands, both ^reat and fmall, fome woody, othersplain, but moft of them low and uninhabited. So that  Heaven and Earth feemed never to have agreed fcetter, to  frame a Place for Man's- commodious and delightful Habitation, were it fully cultivated and inhabited by induftrious  People. The Night of their Arrival, the Box was opened, and  the Orders for Government read. In them Ednuard-Maria  TVingfield, Bartholomew Gofnold, John Smith, Chrtflopher  Newport, John Ratcliffe, John Martin, and George Kendall, were appointed of the Council. They were employed, till the 13th of May, in feeking a Place for their Settlement ; and then they refolved on a Peninfula, on the  North Side of the River Powhatan, about forty Miles from  the Mouth. After which, Mr. Wingfield was chofen Pre- Edioardfident, the Council fworn, arid an Oration made, why Maria  Captain Smith was not admitted of the Council, as the Z^'"rY f  reft. But befides thefe Gentlemen and Mr. Hunt, tbeiir  Chaplain, there came over another Perfon of very great  Diftindlion and Quality. This was the Honourable Mr.  George Percy, of the ancient Family of the Percies, fo renowned in Story, and Brother to the Earl of Northumberland. Neither did his. Aftions here difgrace the Nobility of  his Birth. For he juftly obtained the Reputation of 'being  a Gentleman of great Honour, Courage, and Induftry.  He feems to have come merely a Volunteer upon the Expedition, and bore no Pofl:; or Office of Government ;  which might perhaps have proceeded from the Cloud, under which his Brother;, the Earl of Northumberland, then  lay. For on fome diftant Surnaifes, and upon Account of Mr. 46 1607. EdivardMaria  Wmgfidd  Prefident. l^he History of VIRGINIA. Book II. Mr. Percy^ his Kinfman, who was concerned in that Treafon, the Earl was fufpeaed to have been privy to the  Gun-powder Plot; and was therefore thrown into the  Tower, where he lay above twelve Years, was fined thirty  thoufand Pounds Sterling in the Star-Chamber, and underwent much hard Ufage. And befides Mr. Percy, there  were Anthony Gofnold, Captain Gabriel Archer, Nathaniel  Powel, Kellam Throgmorton, William Smithes, Richard  Frith, and divers others of Note in this firft Plantation.  And Mr. Thomas Studley was elefted the firft Cape-Merchant, or Treafurer, of the Colony. Having pitched upon a Place to fettle, they called it  James-Town, in Honour of his Majefty then reigning, and  every Man fell to work. The Council contrive the Fort ;  and of the reft, fome cut down and clear away the Trees,  to make a Place to pitch their Tents ; fome get Clapboard,  to relade the Ships ; whilft others were employed in making  Gardens and Nets, and providing other Neceffaries and  Conveniences. The Indians often vifited them kindly,  which was a great Satisfadlion to them. For the Prefident's  Jealoufy would admit of no Exercife at Arms, nor any  other Fortification, but the Boughs of Trees caft together  in the Form of a half Moon, by the extraordinary Pains  and Diligence of Captain Kendall. And foon after Newport and Smith, with twenty others, were fent to difcover  the Head of the River Powhatan, which, from King James,  was afterwards called James River. They paffed by divers  fmall Habitations ; and in fix Days arrived at a Town,  called Powhatan, confifting of about twelve Houfes, pleafantly feated on a Hill, on the North Side of the River,  with three fertile Ifles before it. This Place I judge to be  either Mrs. Mayo's, or elfe Marring'^ Plantation ; and it  was the principal Seat, by Inheritance, of Powhatan, Emperor of the Country. To this Place they found the River  navigable ; but within a Mile higher, by reafon of the  Rocks and Ifles, there was no PaflTage for a fmall Boat ; and  this they called the Falls. They were kindly treated by  the People in all Parts ; but being returned to James-Town,  they found feventeen Men hurt, and a Boy flain, by the  Indians ; and had not a Crofs-bar Shot from the Ships happened to ftrike a Bough from a Tree among them, which  frighted, and made them retire, the Englijh had been all  cut oS, being fecurely at Work, and their Arms in dry  Fats. After this the Prefident permitted the Fort to be palifadoed, the Ordinance to be mounted, and the Men to  be armed and exercifed. For many and fudden were the  Aflaults and Ambufcades of the Indians ; and the Englijh, by  Book 11. "fhe History 0/ VIRGINIA. by their diforderly ftraggling were often hurt, whilft they,  by the Nimblenefs of their Heels, efcaped, Altho' Captain Newport was named of the Council, ■^''^f''yet was he .only hired for their Tranfportation, and was to jyi^tfM  return with the Ships. The time of his Departure ap- Prefident.  proaching. Captain Smith's Enemies pretended, out of  Tendernefs and Compaffion to him, to refer him to the  Council in England^ to receive a Reprimand, rather than  by puftiing on their Accufation, to endanger his Life, or  utterly deftroy his Reputation. But he, being a Man of  high Spirit, and confcious of his Innocency, fcorned their  Charity, and defied their Malice ; and behaved himfelf in  the whole Affair with fuch Clearnefs and Prudence, that  all the Company perceived his Integrity, and their Envy and  Injuftice. Infifting therefore upon his Trial, the Perfons,  fuborned to accufe him, accufed their Suborners; and altho' many Falfhoods were alledged againft him, yet were  they all fo plainly difproved, that it raifed a general Refentment in the Hearts of the Audience againft fuch unjuft  Commanders, and the Prefident was condemned to pay  him two hundred Pounds, in Reparation of the Injury.  In Confequence hereof, all the Prefident's Effefts were  feized in Part of Satisfadlion ; but Smith generoufly prefented them to the pubUck Store for the Ufe of the Colony.  Soon after their Heats and Animofities were appeafed hy  the good Docftrine and Exhortations of Mr. Hunt, who  procured Captain Smith to be admitted of the Council ; and  the next Day, they all received the Communion, in Confirmation of their Peace and Concord. The Day after,  being the 15th of yune, the Indians voluntarily fued for  Peace, and Captain Newport fet Sail for England, leaving  an hundred Perfons behind him in Virginia. The Colony, being now left to their Fortunes, fell into  fuch a violent Sicknefs, that within ten Days fcarce ten among them could either go or ftand. This was chiefly  owing to the Difference of their Diet. For whilft the  Ships ftaid, either by Way of Traffic, or for Money, or  Love, they got a daily Proportion of Bifcuit and other Provifions from the Sailers, who always abounded even to  Luxury and Profufion. But now they were all reduced to  the common Kettle ; which contained the Allowance of  half a Pint of Wheat, and as much Barley, boiled with  Water, for a Man a Day. And this, having funked for  fix and twenty Weeks in the Ship's Hold, contained nothing fubftantial, being only Bran, with as many Worms  as Grains. The Council in England, but efpecially Sir  Thomas Smith, their Treafurer, were juftly charged with much  <ng! History of VIRGINIA. Book IL much Cruelty and Inhumanity for thefe fcanty and ill' conditioned Provifions ; which Management however continued, more or lefs, the whole time of that Gentleman's  mn field Adminiftration of the Affairs of the Company and Colonyi  Prendent.' This unwholefome Food, together with their continual  Toil and Labour in the Extremity of the Heat, carried ofF  fifty of the Company by September ; in which Number was  Captain Gafnold, the firft Mover and Proje£tor of the whole  Bufinefs. The reft, that furvived by the Care of Captain  Smith, and the Skill and Diligence of Mr. nomas PFotton,  their Surgeon-General, fubfifted on Crabs and Sturgeon,  till September. But the Prefident, all this while, had felt neither Want  nor Sicknefs. For he had embezzled the public Oatmeal,  Sack, Aqua-vita, Beef, and Eggs, and had- lived in great  Plenty and Elegance. Soon after, having projected an  Efcape to England in the Bark, it raifed fuch Indignation  in the reft, that they depofed him, and eledled Captain  John Rat- John Ratcliffe in his Room. Kendall was likewife at the  cliffe Prefi-^^g jj^jg dt%raced, and removed from the Council, for  ^"'" being concerned in thefe male Praftices of the Prefident. And now, when all their Provifions were fpent, the Sturgeon gone, and no Profpedt of Relief from any Quarter  left, God wrought fo wonderful a Change in the Hearts of  the Indians, that they brought fuch Plenty of their Fruits  and Provifions, as no Man wanted. Newport was gone, Gofnold dead, and Wingfield and  Kendall in Difgrace ; neither w'ere their Places fupplied by  the Ele(9:ion of any others, according to the Authority  given. So that the whole Government and Power of the  Council now refted in the new Prefident, Martin, and  Smith. But the Prefident and Martin, being little efteemed  or beloved, of weak Judgment in Dangers^ and lefs Induftry in Peace, at firft very candidly and wifely permitted  every thing to Smith's Management, who was peculiarly  fitted for conducing fuch an Enterprife, by a good Judgment, undaunted Courage, and an invincible Induftry and  Refolution. He immediately fet about the building of  "James-Town ; and by good Words, fair Promifes, and his  own Example (himfelf always bearing the greateft Share  of the Labour and Fatigue) he pufhed on the Work with  fuch Vigor and Diligence, that he had, in a fhort time,  provided moft of them with Lodgings, negleiting any for  himfelf. After which, finding the Autumn Superfluity of  the Savages begin to decreafe, he refolved to fearch the  Country for Trade. The Want of the Language and a  fufficient Power, with Cloathing for his Men and other Ne- Book II. =r6^ History ?/• VIRGINIA. 49 Neceflaries, were infinite Impediments to this Defign, but 1607- no Difcouragemeilt to his bold and adventurous Spirit. <• ■ For with five or fix more, he went down the River, in a J- Ra'cW'  Shallop, to Kicquotan ; where at firft they fcorned them, as " ^  poor famifhed Creatures, and would offer, in Derifion, a  Handful of Corn, or a Piece of Bread, for their Swords,  Mufkets, or Cloaths. But Smith, finding, that nothing  was to be had by Trade and Courtefy, ventured to exceed  his Commiffion, and entered upon fuch Meafures, as Neceflity and the Exigency of his Case required. And therefore, having difcharged his Mufkets among them, he ran  his Boat afhore ; at which the Indians all fled into the  Woods. Then marching up to their Houfes, they faw  great Heaps of Corn. But Smith with much ado reftrained  his hungry Soldiers from immediately feizing it ; expelling,  the Savages would return to aiTault them, as it foon after  happened. For fixty or feventy of them, fome painted black,  fome red, fome white, and fome party-coloured, ifTued out of  the Woods, finging. and dancing, and making a moft hideous Noife, with their Okee borne before them. This was  an Idol, made of Skins, flrufFed with Mofs, and all painted  and hung with Chains and Copper. For there was no  Place in f^irginia found fo barbarous and void of Humanity, in which they had not a Religion, Deer, Bows, and  Arrows. In this Savage Manner, being armed with Clubs,  Targets, Bows, and Arrows, they charged the Englijh^  who received them fb warmly with a fecohd Volley of  Mufkets, loaded with Piflol Shot, that down fell their God,  and feveral of them lay fprawling on the Ground. The  reft fled again into the Woods, and foon after fent one of  their Priefts, to redeem their God and offer Peace. Smith  told him, if only fix would come unarmed, and load his  Boat with Corn, he would not only reftore their Okee, but  would be their Friend, and give them Beads, Copper, and  Hatchets befides. Which was agreed to, and performed to  the Satisfaction of both Parties. And then they brought  him Venifon, Turkies, Wildfowl, Bread, and whatever  elfe they had, finging and dancing in Sign of Friendfhip,  till he departed. And in his Return up the River, he difcovered the Town and Country of Warrafqueake. After his Return to James-Town, he made feveral  Journies by Land, and difcovered the People of Chickahominy. In one of thefe, Wingfield and Kendall, feeing  all things at random in Smith's Abfence, and the Company's Scorn of the Prefident's Weaknefs and Martin's  never-mending Sicknefs, took Advantage of the Occafion,  and combined with the Sailers and others, to regain their  9 E former 50 The History of VIRGINIA. Book IL 1607. former Authority, or at leaft to feize the Bark, which ' » ' Smith had fitted for a trading Voyage, and in her to efcape j.Ratcliffe^^^ go for England. But Smith, leturmng unexpe<aedly,  Ptefident. ^.^j^ ^^^j^ Difficulty prevented their Defign. For he was  obliged to turn the Cannon of the Fort upon them, and fo  force them to ftay or fink in the River ; which Adtion coft  the Life of Captain Kendall. And not long after, their  new Prefident Ratcliffe and Captain Gabriel Archer intended  to abandon the Country; but their Projeft was likewife  reftrained and fupprefled by Smith, The Spaniards was never more greedy of Gold, thaiL he was of Provifions ; neither did the reft defire more eagerly to abandon the Country, than he to keep it. And therefore, having found  Plenty of Corn up the River Chickahominy, he went a trading Voyage thither, and was received by hundreds of Indians, who ftood in divers Places with Bafkets, expecting  his Coming. And now the Winter likewife coming on,  the Rivers were fo covered with Swans, Geefe, and Ducks,  that they daily feafted with good Bread, Virginia Peafe,  Pumpions, and Paflimmons, and with Fifli, Fowl, and divers Sorts of wild Beafts, as fat as they could well eat  them. So that none of their humourfome and tuftafFety  Sparks (as Smith calls them) were any longer difcontented,  or defirous to go to England. But Captain Smith's Activity and Induftry, in difcovering the Country, and providing for the Colony, could  not fcreen him from the vain Exceptions and Murmurs of  many Idlers at 'James-Town. He was cenfured by fome,  and even taxed by the Council, of being too remifs and  negligent in difcovering the Head of Chickahominy River,  And therefore foon after, with much Labour in cutting  away Trees and clearing a Paflage, he went up as far, as  his Barge could pafs. And then leaving her in a broad  Bay, beyond the Reach of the Indians Shot, he himfelf,  with two Englijh more, and two Indians, proceeded higher  up in a Canoe. When he left the Barge, he ordered, that  none fliould go afhore, till his Return. But he was not  long gone^ before his diforderly and ungovernable Crew  difobeyed this Command, and thereby gave the Indians an  Opportunity of furprifing one George Cajfen ; and indeed  narrowly efcaped being all cut ofF to a Man. For Opechancanough. Brother to Powhatan, and King of Pamunkey^  a fubtle and favage Barbarian, was there with three hundred  Bowmen. And after having extorted from Cajfen, which  Way his Captain was gone, he put him to Death in a moft  cruel and barbarous Manner, and then went in Purfuit of  Smith, Captain  Book II. The History 0/ VIRGINIA. Captain Smith had got up twenty Miles higher, ;  mong the Swamps and Marlhes at the Head of the River ; "  and leaving the Canoe to the Care of Robin/on and Emry, 5^- ^"''''ff*  his two Men, he himfelf was gone to kill fome Provifions.  Opechancanough firft happened on the two Men, afleep, as  it was fuppofed, by the Fire ; and (hooting them full of Arrows, flew them. And then they traced the Captain ; who,  finding himfelf befet, bound an Indian^ whom he had for  his Guide, to his Arm for a Buckler," and received their  Attack fo fmartly with his Fire-Arms, that he foon laid  three dead upon the Spot, and fo wounded and galled divers  others, that none of them cared to approach him. He  himfelf received a flight Wound in the Thigh, and had  many Arrows fticking in his Cloaths, but without any great  Hurt. Having the Indians thus at bay, he endeavoured to  flieer off to his Canoe ; but regarding them, as he went,  more than his Way, he fuddenly flipped up to his Middle  into an oozy Creek. Altho' he w^s thus hampered, yet none  of them durft come near him, till, being almofl: dead with  Cold, he threw away his Arnis and furrendered. Then  drawing him out, they carried him to the Fire, where his  Men were flain, and carefully chafed his -benumfced Limbs.  For this Winter, 1607, was extremely cold in Virginia^  as it was likewife remarkable for an extraordinary Froft in  Europe. When Smith was a little recovered, he aflced for their.  Captain, and being fhewed Opechancanough, he prefented  him with a round Ivory double compafs Dial. They wondered greatly at the playing of the Fly and Needle, which  they could fee fo plainly, and yet not touch, becaufe of the  -Glafs, that covered them. But when he explained by it  the Roundnefs of the Earth, the Skies, the Sphere of the  Sun, Moon, and Stars, with other furprifing and unheard  of Doftrines to them, they all ftood amazed. Yet within  an Hour after, they tied .him to a Tree, and drew up in  Order to flioot him. But the King holding up the Compafs in his Hand, they all laid down their Arms at once.  And then, with much Triumph, and in martial Order,  they conducted him to Orapakes, which was a hunting  Town and Seat^ lying on the upper Part of Chickahominy  Swamp, on the North Side, belonging to, and much frequented by Powhatan and the Irtiperial Family, on Account  of the Abundance of Game, it afforded. In their March,  they drew.themfelves all up in File ; and Opechancanough, being in the Midft, had the Englijh Swords and Mufkets  carried before him. Captain Smith came next, led by three  great Savages, holding him faft by each Arm ; and on either E 2 Side  fhe History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book II. Side went fix in File, with their Arrows notched. When  they arrived at the Town, the Women and Children ftood  J- R'"i:lif' Hznng at a human Creature, fo unlike whatever they had  Prefident. j^gf^^g fggj, . ^nd the Soldiers, that had taken him, performed their military Exercife, throwing themfelves with  great Dexterity into their War-Dance, with ftrange Diftortions and antic Poftures, finging and yelling out frightful and inharmonious Notes and Screeches. But they treated  Smith here very kindly, and feafted him with that Formality and Abundance, that he fufpefted, they intended to  fatten and to eat him. In the midft of thefe melancholy  Thoughts and Surmifes, one of them, in Return for fome  Beads and Toys, which "Smith had given him at his firft  Arrival, brought him his Gown j which was of flngulaf  Service to him, and a very feafonable Defence againft the  exceffive Coldnefs of the Seafon. But whilft his Mind was thus taken up with imaginary  Deaths, he had like to have met a real one. For a Man  came violently upon him, and would have flain him for  the Death of his Son, had he not been prevented by his  Guard. Whether this was one of thofe, that were wounded, when Smith was taken Prifoner, or whether he -was  dying a natural Death, which they, through Ignorance  and Superftition, attributed to fome Sorcery in Smith, is  not eafy to be determined. However., they carried him  to recover the poor Man, breathing out his laft. Smith  told them, he had a Water at yames-Town, that would do  it, if they would let him fetch it. But they had more Senfe  than to permit that, or to truft him out of their Hands. They were now making the greateft Preparations they  could, to aflault James-Town. To this End they defired  Smith's Advice and Affiftance ; and, as a Reward, promifed  him Life, Liberty, Land, and Women. But he reprefented to them the extreme Danger and Difficulty of the Attempt ; and defcribed the Springing of Mines, great Guns,  and other warlike Engines, in fuch a Manner, as exceedingly frighted and amazed them. And then he perfuaded  fome of them to go to James-Town, under Pretence of  fetching fome Toys ; and in Part of a Table-Book, he informed them at the Fort, what was intended, and direfted  them, how to behave and affright the Meffengers, and without fail, to fend him fuch Things, as he wrote for. Within  three Days, the Meffengers returned, through as bitter  Weather as could be, for Froft and Snow ; and were greatly aftonifhed themfelves, as well as all that heard it, how  Smith could divine, or the Paper fpeak. For all things  were delivered them, and had happened at James-Town, according as he foretold. All Book II. T-&e History 0/ VIRGINIA. 53 All Thoughts of an Attack upon James-Town being 1607. therefore laid afide, they led Smith in Show and Triumph *^-> ' about the Country. And firft they carried him to thofe, J. RatcUffc  that dwelt on Toughtanund, or as it is now called, Pamun- P«''<i"=n'key River. For the main River, which is fince named- Tork  River, was then called Pamunkey ; altho' the Country of  Pamunkey, over which Opechancanough was King, lay in  the Fork of the River, and his chief Seat was nearly, where  the Pamunkey Town now is. From the Toughtanunds they  led him to the Mattaponies^ the Piankatanks, the Nantaughtacunds^ on Rappahanock, and the Nominies, on Patowmack  River. And having pafled him. over all thofe Rivers, they  brought him back, through feveral other Natibns, to Opechancanough's Habitation at Pamunkey ; where, with frightful Howlings, and many ftrange and hellifh Ceremonies,  they conjured him three Days, to know, as they told him,  whether he intended them well or ill. After this, they  brought him a Bag of Gunpowder, which they judged to  be a Grain, fpringing out of the Earth, as other Grains  did ; and therefore they carefully preferved it, intending to  plant it the next Spring, as they did their Corn. And then  he was invited, and feafted, in a fumptuous Manner, by  Opitchapari, fecond Brother to Powhatan, and next Heir to  all his Dominions. But here, as in all other Places, none  of them would touch a Morfel with him ; altho' they  would feaft very merrily upon what he left. At laft they  conducSed him to Werowocomoco, where Powhatan., the  Emperor, was. Wermuocomoco lay on the North Side of  Tork River, in Glocejier County, nearly oppofite to the  Mouth of Queen's Creek, and about twenty five Miles below the Fork of the River. It was at that Time Powhatan's principal Place of Refidence ; altho' afterwards, not  admiring the near Neighbourhood of the Englijh, he retired  to Orapakes. Powhatan himfelf was a tall, well-proportioned Man, of  a four Afpedl, and of a very ftrong and hardy Conftitution  of Body. His proper Name was Wahunfonacock ; and he  had that of Powhatan, froni the Town fo called, near the  Falls of "James River, which was the chief Seat and Metropolis of his hereditary Dominions ; and he feems to have  removed to Werofwocomoco for Conveniency, after he had  extended his Conquefts far North. For his hereditary  Countries were only Powhatan, Arrohattack, about twelve  Miles lower down, which hath fince been corrupted to  Haddihaddocks, Appamatock, Youghtanund, Pamunkey, and  Mattapony ; to which may be added, Werowocomoco, and  Kijkiack, or as it hath fince been called, Cheefecake, be- E 3 tween 54 "fhe History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book II. 1607- tween Williamjburg and York. All the reft were his Con- ■ . ■ quefts ; and they were bounded on the South hy. James Ri- y. Ratclifft yej.^ ^jtj, all its Branches, from the Mouth to the' Falls,  Prefident. ^^j ^^ ^^^^^^ ^j^^ Country, nearly as high as the Falls of  all the great Rivers, over Patowmack even to Patuxen in  Maryland. And feme Nations alfo on the Eajiern Shore,  owned Subjection to him. Thefe Dominions defcended,  not to his Sons or Children, but firft to his Brothers,  whereof he had three, Opitchapan, Opechancamugh, and  ' Catatajigh ; and then to his Sifters, according to their Seniority ; and after them to the Heirs male or female of the  eldeft Sifter, and fo of the reft, but never to the Heirs of  the Males. He lived in great barbaric State and Magnificence.  He ufually had about his Perfon forty or fifty of the talleft  Men, his Country afforded ; which Guard was, after this  time, encreafed to two hundred, on Account of the £ngli/h. Every Night, upon the four Corners of his Houfe  were placed four Sentinels, each a flight Shot from the  other ; and every half Hour, one from the main Guard  hollowed, fliaking his Finger between his Lips, and every  Sentinel was obliged to anfwer from his Stand. If any failed,  an Officer was immediately fent, who beat him extremely.  At all his ancient Inheritances, he had Houfes, fome of  them thirty or forty Yards long ; and at every Houfe, Provifion for his Entertainment, according to the Seafon. He  kept as many Women, as he pleafed ; and when he laid  down, one fat at his Head, and another at his Feet ; but  when he was up, one fat on his right Hand, and another  on his left. And as he was weary of them, he beftowed  them on fuch of his Servants, as had moft pleafed him, or  beft deferved them at his Hands. Altho' both himfelf and People were very barbarous,  and void of all Letters and Civility, jyet was there fuch a  Government among them, that the Magiftrates for good  Command, and the People for due SubjecSion, excelled  many Places, that would be counted very civil. He had  under him above thirty inferior Kings or Werowances, who  had Power of Life and Death, but were bound to govern  according to the Cuftoms of their Country. However, his  Will was, in all Cafes, their fupreme Law, and muft be  obeyed. They all knew their feveral Lands, Habitations,  and Limits to fifli, fowl, or hunt in. But they held all of  their great Werowance, Powhatan ; to whom they paid  Tribute of Skins, Beads, Copper, Pearl, Deer, Turkies,  wild Beafts, and Corn. All his Subjecfts reverenced him,  not only as a King, but as half a God ; and it was curious to  Book II. "The History of VIRGINIA. to behold, with what Fear and Adoration they obeyed him. For at his Feet, they prefented whatever he- commanded ; and a Frown of his Brow would make their greateft Spirits 5'- Ratc/ife tremble. And indeed it was no Wonder ; for he was very ^^"'' terrible and tyrannous in punifhing fuch, as offended him, with Variety of Cruelty and the moft exquifite Torture. W HEN Smith was prefented to him, he was about fixty  Years of Age, fomething hoary, and of a favage Majefty  and Grandeur, _He (at before a Fire, upon a wooden  Throne, like a Bedftead, clothed with a great Robe of  Racoon Skins, and with a Coronet of Feathers about his  Head. On either Hand, fat a young Wench, of about fixteen or eighteen Years of Age ; and along each Side of the  Houfe,, a Row of Men, and behind them, as many Women, painted and adorned in their bell Manner. When  Smith entered, all the People gave a Shout ; and the Qiieen  of Jppamatox was appointed to bring him Water to wafli  his Hands, and another brought a Bunch of Feathers, inftead of a Towel, to dry them. After that, having feafted  him in their beft Manner, a long Confultation was held ;  at the Conclufion of which, two great Stones were brought  before Powhatan^ and Smith was dragged to them, and his  Head laid thereon, in order to have his Brains beat out with  Clubs. But Pocahontas, the King's darling Daughter,  when no Entreaty could prevail, got his Head into her  Arms, and laid her own upon it, to fave his Life. Whereupon Powhatan was perfuaded to let him live, to make  himfelf Hatchets, and her Bells, Beads, and Copper. For  the King himfelf would make his own Robes, Shoes, Bows,  Arrows, and Pots ; and would hunt, plant, and do every  thing elfe, like the reft ; and therefore they thought him  of all Occupations, as well as themfelves. And befides this  furprifing Tendernefs and AfFe<£tion oi Pocahontas, who was  at that Time about twelve or thirteen Years of Age, Captain Smith received rnany Services from Nantaquaus, the  Emperor's Son, He was a Youth of the comelieft and moft  manly Perfon, and of the higheft Spirit and Courage, of  any in the Court of Powhatan ; and he embraced Smith's  Iritereft with much Warmth and Heartinefs, and did him  many Afts of Friendftiip and Kindnefs. Two Days after, Powhatan, having difguifed himfelf  in the moft frightful Manner, he could, caufed Captain  Smith to be carried to a great Houfe in the Woods, and  there to be left alone on a Mat by the Fire. J^ot long after,  from behind a Mat, which divided the Houfe, was made  the moft doleful Noife, he had ever heard ; and then Powhatan, with about two Hundred more, as frightful as him- E4 felf. 56 The History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book II. 1607. felf, came to him, and told him, they were now Friends, , 'and he fhould immediately go to James-Town, to y. Ratcliffe ieni. him two great Guns and a Grindftone ; for which he  Prefident. ^^^jj gj^^ jjj^ jj,g Country of Capahowftck, and ever after  efteem him, as his Son Nantaquaus. Captain. Smith piit  little Confidence in his Words, and expefted every  Minute, even till he got to James-Town, to be put to one  Kind of Death or other. But Powhatan fent hiffl o/F  immediately, with twelve Guides ; and having lodged  that Night in the Woods, he arrived the next Morning  early at the Fort. And thus Captain Smith, after feven Weeks Captivity,  returned to "James-Town, with the Advantage of being much  improved in the Knowledge of the Country and their Language. He ufed his Guides with the utmoft Kindnefs ; and  fhewed Rawhunt, Powhatan's trufty Servant, two DemiCulverins and a Mill-ftone, to carry to their Matter. Their  Weight was fufEcient to deter them from the Attempt ;  but when they faw him difcharge them, loaded with Stones,  among the Boughs of a great Tree, hung with Icicles, the  Terror of the Report, and the Ratling of the Boughs and  Ice, fo frighted the poor Savages, that they ran away, half  dead with Fear. But having regained fome Conference  with them, he gave them fuch Toys for themfelves, and  fent Powhatan, his Women, and Children, fuch Prefents,  as gave a general fatisfa<Stion. A T James-Town every thing was in Confufion, and the  ftrongeft were preparing once more to run away with the  Bark. But Smith, with the Hazard of his Life, forced her  the third time, to ftay or fink in the River. And the next  Day, feveral combined with the Prefident, to put him to  Death by the Levitical Law, for the Lives of Robinfon and  Emry, whom, they faid, he had led to their End, and  was confequently the Author of their Death. But he quickly took fuch Order with thofe Lawyers, that he laid them  by the Heels, till he fent fome of them Prifoners to England.  And then, by his Relation of the Plenty, he had feen among the Natives, efpecially at Werowocomoco, and of the  State and Bounty of Popuhaian, till then unknown, he very  much appeafed their Fears, and revived their dead Spirits.  And Pocahontas, with her Attendants, ever once in four or  five Days, brought him fo much Provifion, as faved the  Lives of many, who muft otherwife have periflied with  Hunger. Several others alfo of the Natives repaired daily  to the Fort, with fuch Provifions, as fufficiently ferved  them from Hand to Mouth. Part they always brought  Smith, as Prefents from their Kings or Pocahontas ; and he, as Book- 11. «^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. 57 as their Market-Clerk, fet the Price upon the reft. So 'So?- much had he aftoniflied and enchanted thofe poor Souls, ' r~ — whilft their Prifoner, that they efteemed him, as a Demi- J- ^"t^W'  God, and were ready, at his Beck, to do, whatever he "^^ *"'"  commanded. And the God, who created all things, they  knew, he adored as his God, and would, in their Difcourfe, call him the God of Captain Smith. And this their high Opinion was much increafed by the  Arrival of Captain Newport, whom Smith, among them,  called his Father, nearly about the time, that he had foretold» For the Treafurer and Council in England fent two  Ships, the latter End of this Year, with a Supply of Provifions, and an hundred and twenty Men. Thefe came,  well furnifljed with all things, that could be imagined neceflary, as Captain Smith tells us. But however, we muft  always make fome Allowance in his Account of thefe things.  For he was a very great Friend to Sir Thomas Smith ; and  we fliall fee hereafter, from feveral authentic Papers, but  efpecially from a Reprefentation of our General Affembly,  among the Records in the Capitol, that that Officer was  moft fcandaloufly negligent, if not corrupt, particularly in  this Matter of Supplies. One of thefe Ships was commanded by Captain Newport, the other by Captain Francis  Nelfon, an honeft Man and expert Mariner. But fuch  was the Lewardnefs of his Ship, that altho' he was within  Sight of Cape Henry, yet by contrary Winds and ftormy  Weather, he was driven oiF the Coaft, and forced to the  Weji-Indies, to repair his Mafts, and to get a Recruit of  Wood and Water. But before this, the Prefident and  Council fo much envied Smith's Efteem among the Natives,  altho' they all equally participated of the good EfFecSs of  it, that to raife their Credit and Authority above his, they  would give them four times as much for their Commodities,  as he had appointed. And now, out of Joy for the Arrival of this firft Supply, and to gratify the Mariners, they  gave them free Liberty to trade, as they pleafed. So that  in a fhort time, what was before bought for an Ounce of  Copper, could not be had for a Pound. To which Captain  Newport's profufe Prefents to Powhatan were added, and  gave the finifhing Blow to their Trade. They ferved indeed to entertain and keep up the high Idea of Newport's  Greatngfs, which Smith had raifed in Powhatan, and made  him very delirous to fee him. Accordingly the Bark was prepared, and a great Coil there was at James-Town to fet him off. Captain Smith and Mr. Matthew Scrivener, a difcreet and under- ftanding Gentleman, newly arrived and admitted of the jQ Council,  rhe History of VIRGINIA. Book II. Council, attended him with a Guard of thirty or forty  ' chofen Men. When they came to Werowocomoco, NewJ. Ratcliffc pgff began to entertain many Fears and Sufpicions of TreaPrefident. ^j^^^.^^ g^^. g^-^j^^ ^j^j^ twenty Men, undertook to encounter the worft, that could happen ; and going afliore,  was kindly conducted by two or three hundred. Indians to  the Town. Powhatan ftrained himfelf, upon this Occafion, to the utmoft of his Greatnefs to entertain them, with  great Shouts of Joy, Orations, and Proteftations, and with  the moft fumptuous and plentiful Banquet, he could provide. He fat on a Bed of Mats, with a Pillow of' Leather  embroidered with Pearl and white Beads ; and was cloathed  in a Robe of Skins, as large as an Irijh Mantle. At his  Head and Feet, fat a handfome young Woman; and on  each Side the Houfe, twenty of his Concubines, with their  Heads and Shoulders painted red, and a great Chain of white  Beads about each of their Necks. Before them, fat his  chief Men^ in the like Order ; and above forty Platters of  fine Bread flood in two Files, on each Side of the Door.  Four or five hundred People attended, as a Guard ; and  Proclamation was made, that none, upon Pain of Death,  fhould prefume to do the Englijh any Wrong or Difcourtefy. And thus did Smith and he fpend the Day, in a kind  Renewal of their former Acquaintance, and in feafting,  and feeing them dance and fmg, and play their other Feats  of Humour and Aflivity. And that Night, the Englijh  were quartered and lodged by Powhatan. The next Morning, Newport came afhore, and they  fpent three or four Days more in feafting, and dancing, and  trading. In all which time, Powhatan behaved himfelf with  fuch Loftinefs and State, and yet with fo much Difcretion,  that they could not forbear admiring • hi^ natural Parts and  Underftanding. Scorning to trade, as his Subjects did, he  told Newport^ that he efteemed him a great Werowance,  as well as himfelf; that it was not agreeable to their Dignity to trade, in that pedling Manner, for Trifles ; and  that therefore, if he would lay down all his Commodities  together, he would chufe, what he liked, and give him  their Value. Smithy who was their Interpreter, and knew  Powhatan'^ Difpofition, told the Company, his Intent was  only to cheat them. But Newport, thinking to out-brave  this ftately Barbarian in Oftentation and Greatnefs, and by  his Bounty to obtain from him, whatever he pleafed, accepted the Condition. And then Powhatan, having taken  what he liked, valued his Corn at fuch a Rate, that they  had not four Bufhels, for what they expedted twenty Hogfheads. This bred fome Diftafte between the two Englijh Captains ;  Book 11. rhe History of VIRGINIA. Captains. But Smith, fmothering his Diflike before the  Savages, glanced feveral Trifles in the Eyes of Powhatan, ''  who foon fixed his Fancy on fome blue Beads. He was a J- ^tcUffe  long time importunate to have them ; but Smith valued " ^"'^  them fo much the higher, and told him, they were compofed of a rare Subftance of the Colour of the Skies, and  were not to be worn by any, but the greateft Kings in the  World. This made him the more eager and mad for them ;  fo that, for a Pound or two of blue Beads, he drew from  him two or three hundred Bufliels of Corn, and yet parted  in good Friendfliip. Upon this Voyage Newport gave  Powhatan a Boy, named Thomas Savage, whom he called  his Son ; and Powhatan gave him Namontack, a Servant of  his, of a flirewd and fubtle Capacity. From IVerowocomoco they went to Pamunkey, where  they were feafted in like Manner by Opechancanough.  Smith fitted him alfo, at the fame Rates, with blue Beads ;  which, by this Means, grew into fuch Eftimation, that none  durft wear them, but their great Kings, or their Wives and  Children. At length weighing from thence, they returned  to James-Town ; where this new Supply of Corn being  lodged with the reft, their Store-houfe was by fome Accident fired, and fo the Town, which, being, thatched with  Reeds, burnt with that Fiercenefs and Violence, as foon  confumed their wooden Fortifications, with their Arms,  Apparel, and Bedding, and much private Goods and Provifion. The good Mr. Hunt loft all his Library, with every  thing elfe, that he had, except the Cloaths o'n his Back ;  yet no one ever heard him murmur or repine at it. Notwithstanding this unfortunate Accident, i6og.  they had yet a tolerable Stock of Oatmeal, Meal, and Corn,  had not the Ship loitered fourteen Weeks in the Country,  when {he might as well have been gone in fourteen Days.  For they thereby -helped to confume a great Part of the  Colony's Store, and near all the Provifions, fent to be landed. When they departed, they left them, what little they  thought proper to fpare ; which they were glad to receive,  and make up an Account, highly commending their Care  and Providence, left they fhould difcourage the Council at  home from fending any more. Yet thofe Perfons, who  had either Money, fpare Cloaths, Credit for Bills of Exchange,' Gold Rings, Furs, or any fuch valuable Commodities, were always welcome to this floating Tavern. Such  was their Necellity and Misfortune, to be under the Lafh  of thofe vile Commanders, and to buy their own Provifions  at fifteen times the Value ; fuffering them to feaft at their  Charge, whilft themfelves were obliged to faft, and yet dare 6o T-&^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book II. i6og. dare not repine, left they fliould incur the Cenfure of being — v-^ faaious and feditious Perfons. By thefe Means and Ma- y. Ratcliffe nageinent, the Colony was rather burthened than relieved, Prefident. ^^ ^^^ ^^^ Charge of this Ship ; and being reduced to Meal and Water, and expofed, by the Lofs of their Town, to the moft bitter Cold and Froft, above half of them died. Smith indeed and Scrivener endeavoured to corre(9: all A- bufes, and to put things into a better Pofture ; but they could do nothing to Effedl, being overpowered by the Pre- fident and his Party, who had long before this laid afide their Deference to Smith's Judgment and Management, About this time alfo, there fprung up a very troublefome Sedl of Gold-finders, which was headed by Captain  Martin, and warmly embraced by Newport. There was  no Thought, no Difcourfe, no Hope, and no Work, but  to dig Gold, wafh Gold, refine Gold, and load Gold. And  notwithftanding Captain Smith's warm and judicious Reprefentations, how abfurd it was, to negle<5l other things of  immediate Ufe and Neceffity, to load luch a drunken Ship  with guilded Duft ; yet was he over-ruled, and her Returns tnade in a Parcel of glittering Dirt, which is found  in various Parts , of the Country, and which they very  fanguinely concluded to be Gold-Duft. And in her they  fent home Mr. Wingfield and Captain Archer, to feek fome  better Place of Employment m- England. For they had  affumed many empty Titles of Offices here, as Admirals,  Recorders, Chronologers, Juftices of the Peace and of the  Courts of Plea, with other fuch idle and infignificant Pretenfions. And now Martin and the Prefident, carrying all things,  as they pleafed, by their Faction, lived in great Splendor  by the Sale of the Store's Commodities, as if they had been  their proper and hereditary Revenue. And the Spring approaching, Captain Smith and Mr. Scrivener prepared Fields  for Corn, and applied themfelves to rebuild James-Town,  and repair the Church, Store-houfe, and Fortifications.  But whilft they were all bufily engaged at their feveral Labours, Captain Nelfon, who had been driven off the Coaft,  as was before faid, and as they all thought, loft, unexpeftedly arrived, to their great Joy. He had been very  careful and provident, and had fed his Company on what  he* got at the Weji-India Iflands ; fo that the Provifions  he now landed, joined to their former Store, were fufficient  to fupport them half a Year, according to their prefent  Allowance. He himfelf alfo frefely imparted, whatever he  had ; and by his fair and generous Behaviour, he got the  Good-word and Love of the whole Colony. And the Prefident, Book II. rhe Hi sroKY of VIRGINIA. 6i fident, to fend fome good News by this Ship, ordered i6°8- Captain Smith, with fixty able Men, to difcover the Coun- r— -^ try of the Afanacah, or as they were afterwards called, the 5'- R^'c^if'  Manakin Indians ; a Nation above the Falls of "jfamesRiver, not fubjeift to Powhatan, but profeft Enemies to  him and his Dominions. For that ftrange Blood-thirftinefs,  and, as it were, judicial Infatuation, of warring againft  and exterminating each other, which at prefent infefts our  Indians, and has been the Caufe of the utter Extirpation of  moft of the Nations on this Continent, was even then rooted in their Nature, and may be obferved in the oldeft Accounts, that we have of them. However as it was the  Time of planting Corn, and this Ship was to be difpatched.  Captain Smith thought thofe arid other things more urgent  at that time, and therefore deferred the Difcovery, till he  could perform it with lefs Charge and more Leifure. When Newport left the Country, Powhatan prefented  him with twenty Turkies, and in return demanded twenty  Swords, which were immediately fent him. Afterwards  he prefented Captain Smith with the like Number; b'ut  having no Swords in Return, he was . highly offended, and  ordered his People to take them by Stratagem or Force.  So that they .became infufferably troublefome and infolent,  would furprife the Englijh at their Work, and feife their  Swords at the very Ports of James-Town. The Prefident  and Martin, who now bore the Sway, would keep their  Houfes, or do any thing, rather than tranfgrefs a ftrift Command from England, not to offend them. But at length  they happened to meddle with Captain Smith, who gave  them a rough Encounter, hunted them up and down the  Ifland, and feifed feven, whom he whipped and imprifoned. By this and other fmart Proceedings, he brought them  to Submiffion ; and they unanimoufly confeffed, that they  adled by Powhatan'% Direction, in order to get Swords from  the Englijh, to cut their own Throats ; and they likewife  difcovered, how, where, and when, this Defign was to be  put in Execution ; all which was confirmed by many concurrent Circumftances. But Powhatan, finding, that things  went not according to his Defire and Intent, fent Pocahontas with Prefents, to excufe himfelf for the Injuries done by  fome of his ungovernable Captains ; and he defired their  Liberty for tMlfe time, with Affurances of his Love and  Friendfllip for ever. And Smith having given them a proper Corredtion, delivered them to Pocahontas^ ; for whofe  Sake alone he pretended to fave their Lives, and give them  their Liberty. Thus, without the Death of one Man, he  retrained their Infolence, and brought them into fuch per- fea 62 I'be History, of VIRGINIA. Book II. 1608. feft Fear and Obedience, that his very Name was fufficient ' . ■ to fright them ; whereas before they had fometimes Peace J. Ratcliffe ^nd War twice in a Day, and feldom a Week pafled without  Prefident. ^^^^ Treachery or Ambufcade. But the peaceable Council were highly offended at thefe Proceedings, and expoftulated warmly with him for his Rafhnefs and Cruelty. There, had been a Difpute between Martin and Smith,  whether this Ship fhould be laded with Cedar or Dirt.  But her Freight being concluded to be Cedar, flie was, by  the Diligence of her Captain and Smith, quickly difpatched.  In her Captain Martin, being always fickly and unferviceable, and having his Head full of the idle Whimfy of a  Gold Mine, was moft willingly admitted to return to England. In thefe two Ships, befides Mr. Scrivener, came  Walter Rujfel, Doftor of Phyfick, Richard Fetherjlone, and  fome others of Note. And whilft Nelfon and Smith were  fengaged in loading the Ship, Mr. Scrivener was neither idle  nor flow in carrying on the Works of yames-Town. But  the Prefident's Prodigality and State went fo deep, and was  fo fenfibly felt in their fmall Store, that he and Smith were  obliged to bind him and his Parafites to the Rules of Proportion. On the fecond of fune Captain Nelfon fell down the  River, and was accompanied to the Capes by Smith, who,  in an open Boat of about three Tons Burthen, together  with Dr. Rujfel and thirteen more, was going to difcover  Chefapeake Bay. Parting with the Ship at Cape Henry,  they flood over to thofe Iflands, which were then called,  after him their firft Difcoverer, Smith's Iflands. The firft  People, they faw, were two grim and flout Indians on  Cape Charles, with long Poles, like Javelins, headed with  Bone. They flernly demanded, what they were, and  what they wanted ; but grew afterwards more kind, and  direfted them to Accomack, the Habitation of their Werowance. This King treated them very kindly, and was the  comliefl, moft proper, and civil Indian, they had met with.  They fpoke the Language of Powhatan, and at that time  lay under the Misfortune of a ftrange Mortality, which  they attributed to a Miracle. Pafling on from thence, they  coafled it along, and fearched every Inlet and Bay, that  feemed proper for Harbours or Habitations ; and many  Harbours they found for Tmall Veffels, but*hone fit to receive large Ships. Then fpying many Iflands out in the  Bay, they bore up for them ; but before they could reach  them, there rofe such a Gufl of Thunder, Lightning,  Wind, and Rain, that with great Difficulty they efcaped  being foundered. Thefe Iflands they named RufePs IJlands, aftef Book II. rhe History of VIRGINIA. 63 after Dr. Rujfel; and they are the fame with thofe, now '608. called Tanger IJlands. Being in Want of Water, and find- . — -' ing none in thefe Iflands, they were obliged to follow the 7- ^"'^W'  next Eaftern Channel, which brought them into the River ^" "'™''  Wightecomoco^ which is the River now called Pokomoke.  The Northern Point, at the Mouth, they called Watkins's  Point, and a Hill, on the South of Pokomoke Bay, KeeFs  Hill, after two of the Company. Running up the River,  the Natives at firft threatened, with great Fury, to aflault  them ; but at laft became very tradable and kind. They  dug in feveral Places, and fearched their Habitations, yet  could get but little Water, and that mere Puddle. Yet  fuch was^ their Diftrefs two Days after, that they would  have refufed a Quart full of Gold for a Pint of that Puddle. Departing from thence, they found on a high Point  of Land, which they called Point Player, a Pond of frefti  Water, but fo exceedingly hot, that they fuppofed it to be  fome Bath. Then ftanding over to fome other Iflands,  there arofe fuch another Thunder-GufI:, that their Maft  and Sail was blown overboard, and fuch mighty Waves  over-racked their Boat, that they could fcarce, with much  Labour in bailing out the Water, keep her from finking.  Two Days they ftaid among thefe Iflands, aRd becaufe of  the Gufts and Storms, that then happened, they called the  Place Limbo ; but they are the fame, which have fince been  named PFats's IJlands. -Having repaired the Lofs of their  Sail with their Shirts, they flood over again to the Eaftern  Shore, and fell in with a pretty convenient River, then  called Cufcarawock. This is, what is laid down in our prefent Charts by the Name of Wighcocomoco, by whatever  Accident that Name hath {hifted, in Procefs of Time, from  Pokomoke River to this. Here the Natives oppofed them  very furioufly ; but leaving fome Toys in their Huts, they  brought fome of them over at laft, to be very fpnd and  obliging. On this River lived the Nations of Sarapinagh,  Naufe, Arfeck, and Nantaquagk, who were the beft Merchants, and greateft Traders of all the Indians of this  Country. They had the fineft Furs, and made large  Quantities of the beft Roanoke ; which was a Sort of white  Bead, that occafioned as much Diflenfion among thofe  Barbarians, as Gold and Silver among Chriftians. They  told the Englijh of, and highly extolled, a great Nation,  called the Majfawomecks ; in Search of whom they returned again, by Limbo, into the Bay. And finding the Coaft  of the Eaftern Shore, nothing but ftiallow, broken Ifles,  and for the moft Part without frefh Water, they ftood away from  The History of VIRGINIA. Book 11. from thence acrofs the Bay, bearing a little upwards, and  ' fell in on the Weftern Side, above the Mouth of Patuxen  J. Ratcliffe River, againft fome high Clifts, which they called RiccartTs  Prcfident. qj^j-^^^ YroTD. hence they failed thirty Leagues farther  Northward, without finding any Inhabitants. The Coaft  was all along well watered, but very mountainous and barren, except the Vallies, which were rich and fertile, but  extremely thick wooded, and therefore abounded in Wolves,  Bears, Deer, and other wild Beafts. They pafled by many  Coves and fmall Streams. The firft they found navigable  for a Ship, they called Bolus River, becaufe the Clay, in  many Places under the Clifts, grew up in red and white  Knobs, like Gum out of Trees, and they concluded it to  be Bole Armeniac and Terra Sigillata. This River, by it's  Situation and Bearings, muft be the fame with Patapfco in  Maryland. And now Captain Smith's Crew, who at firft feared nothing fo much as his too hafty Return, began to be very  much foiled and fatigued. They had laid twelve or fourteen Days in that open Boat, were often tired at the Oars,  and their Bread was fpoiled and rotten with the Rain ; io  that they we're very importunate with him to return. But  he reminded them of the memorable Refolution of Sir  Ralph Zff»i?'s*Company, in the Difcovery of the River Mo—  ratuc, who infifted on his going forward, as long ^s they  had a Dog left, which, being boiled with SafTafras Leaves,  would afford them a rich Repaft in their Return. And he  told them, what a Shame it would be, to oblige him to  return, with fo much Provifion, as they then had, when  they could fcarce fay, where they had been, or give any Account of what they virere fent to difcover : That they could  not deny, but he had fhared with them, in the worft of  what was paft ; and he was willing, to take to himfelf the  worft Part of what was to come : That it was not likely,  any thing worfe fliould befal them, than what had already  happened ; and that to return was as dangerous, as to proceed. He therefore advifed, them, to refume their loft  Courage ; for he was determined not to defift, till he had  feen the Majfawomecks, found Patowmack, or traced the  Head of the Bay. But after this, they were detained by the  • Wind and Weather three Days ; which added fuch a Difcouragement, that three or four fell fick, whofe Diffatiffaftion and piteous Complaints at laft prevailed with him  to return. On the 1 6th of June, they fell in with the Mouth of  Patowmack. Their Fears being now gone, and Men recovered, they all agreed to take fome Pains in the Difcovery of Book II. rhe History of VIRGINIA. 65 of that feven-mile broad River. For altho' Smith had been i6°8carried over it in his Captivity, yet he knew it not again by ^— ~/— '  the Mouth. For thirty Miles they found no Inhabitants ; ?■ RatcUffe  but afterwards were conduiSted, by two Savages, up a little " ' °"'"  bayed Creek, towards Neminy, where they difcovered the  Woods laid with Ambufcades, to the Number of three or  four Thoufand Indians, ftrangely grimmed and difguifed,  and making a horrible fliouting and yelling. They made  many Bravadoes, and Smiti prepared, with as great feeming Willingnefs, to encounter tl^em. But commanding  fome Mufkets to be difcharged on Purpofe, the grazing of  the Bullets on the Water, together with the Report and  Eccho of the Woods, fo frighted and amazed them, that  they threw down their Arms, and became very kind and  hearty Friends. They owned, they were commanded to  betray that Party of Englijh, by the Direction of Powhatan, who was defired fo to do, by fome difcontented  Perfons at James-Town, becaufe Captain &w?'if A* obliged them  to ftay in the Country againft their Will. They afterwards  went up the River, as high as they could with their Boat ;  and were received in fome Places kindly, and in others in a  hoftile Manner. Up a fmall River, then called ^uiyough,  which I take to be Patowmack Creek, was a Mine like  Antimony. In this the Indians dug, and wafhing away the  Drofs in a clear. Brook, which ran by, they put up the Remainder in little Bags, and fold it all over the Country, to  deck their Bodies, Faces, and Idols ; which made them  look like Blackamores, dufted over with Silver. Newport  had carried fome of thefe Bags home, and affured them,  that they were found, upon Trial, to contain half Silver.  Being therefore very eager after this Mine, they obtained  Guides from Japazaws, King of Patowmack, who lived at  the Mouth of that little River, and went up to it ; but all,  they got, proved of no Value. Towards the Falls of Patowmack, they met feveral Parties of Indians in Canoes,  loaded with the Flefli oi Bears, Deer, and other wild  Beafts, which ■ they generoufly imparted to them ; and in  divers Places, they faw that Abundance of Fifh, lying with  their Heads above Water, that their Barge driving among  them, for Want of a Net, they attempted to catch them  with a frying Pan. But they found that a bad Inftrument  to catch Filh. From Patowmack they fet Sail for Rappaianock, or as  it was by many called, Tdppahanock River ; where the Captain intended to vifit his Captivity-Acquaintance. But their  Boat, b.y Reafon of the Lownefs of the Tide, ran aground  on fome Shoals, at the Mouth of that River, where they  11 F fpied 66 The History of VIRGmiA. Book. IL i6o«- fpied many Fifh, lurking in the Sedge. The Captain diverted ^"^ — V 'himfelf by nailing them to the Ground with his Sword ; and y. Ratcliffi the reft betaking themfelves to the feme Sport, they took more  Prefident. j,-^ j^ ^^ Horn, than they could eat in a day. But Captain  Smith, taking from his Sword a Fifti, Kke a Thornback,  with a long Tail, in the Midft of which was a poifoned  Sting, of two or three Inches Length, bearded Kke a Saw  on each Side, flie ftruck her Sting into his Wrift an Inch  and a half. No Blood or Wound was feen, but only a little blue Spot ; yet fuch was the Extremity of Pain, and his  Hand, Arm, and Shoulder, were fo fwoln in four Hours  Time, that they all, with much Sorrow, expedied his  Death, and prepared his Grave in an Ifland by, as he himfelf directed. But it pleafed God, by the Application of an  Oil, which Dr. Rujfel had with him, his Torment was fo  eafed and aflwaged before Night, that to the great Joy of  the Company, he eat of the Fifli for his Supper. And in  Memory of this Accident, they called the Ifte Stingray Iflund, after the Name of the Filh. Their Provifions being near fpeot, and being alfo deterred by this Misfortune, they fet Sail immediately for  James-Town ; and pafling by the 'Mouths oi Piankatank and  Pamunkey Rivers, they arrived the next Day at Kicquotan.  From thence they proceeded up to Warrafqueake ; where  trimming their Barge with painted Streamers, and other fuch  Devices, they were taken for a Sfanijh Frigot at JamesTown, where they arrived the 2ift of July. There they  found the lafl: Supply of Men all fick ; and of the refl:, fome  lame, fome bruifed, and all in a Tumult and Uproar againft  the unreafonable Pride and Cruelty of the Prefident, whom  they would as ftrangely^have tormented with Revenge, had  it not been for this feafonable Arrival of the Difcovery  Barge. He had riotoufly confumed the Store, and had  greatly harraffed and fatigued the People, in building an  unneceflary Houfe of Pleafure for himfelf in the Woods.  But their Fury was much appeafed, by the good News of  this Difcovery, and by the Hopes, from fome miftaken Interpretation of the Savage's Account, that our Bay reached  to the South-Sea, or fomewhere near it ; but above all, by  the depofmg Rafdiffe, and Captain Smith'^ taking the Government upon himfelf.  John Smith ^^**^ fubftituted his good Friend Mr. Scrivener, who  Prefident then lay exceeding ill of a Calenture, in the Prefidency ;  Mat. Scri. and having fettled all things to his own, and the People's  Prefident"" Satisfadtion, he ftaid but three Days at James-Town. For  the 24th of July, he fet forward, with twelve Men, to finifh the Difcovery of the Bay. They were detained two Book II. the HisTORj of VIRGINIA. 67 or three Days at Kicqmtan, by contrary Winds, where i6o8they were kindly entertained and feafted by the King, and ^~" — ■r^"''  in Di'verfion fired feveral Rockets, which greatly terrified ^"'^ *""  and aftoniftied the poor Savages^ From thence thiey ^^a-^'"^^^^  chored, the firft Night, at ^Stingray Ifland ; and the next  Day, crofling the Mouth of P»tau)mack^ they hafted to  the River Bohs. A little beyond that, they found the Bay  divided into four Streams, all which they fearched, as far  as they could fail. Two of them they feiund inhabited, the  Rivers Sufquefahanotk^ and Tockwegh, fince called Sajfafras  River. In croffing th« Bay,, they met feven or eight Ca•noes, full of Mqffawanucis^ a great and powerful NatioH  of Indians inhabiting upon fome of the Lakes of Canada,  and the Original perhaps of thofe, at prefent known by the  Name of the Senecas or Six Nations. They were at thai  Time profeft Enemies, and a great Terror, to- the Nations  dwelling on the upper Part of our Bay, and had then been  at War with the 'Teciwoghs. After mutual Threats of Affault between them and the Englijh, they were at laft induced to go on board the Barge ; and by interchangeable  Prefents becoming good Friends, they departed without  farther Intercourfe or Converfation. The next Day, enterir^ the River Tackwoghy they were  invironed with a Fleet of Canoes, full of armied Men. But  coming, tO' a Parley, and the Ttckwoghs, feeing the Majfawomeek Arms, which they had prefented to the Knglift) the  .Day before, and which the Englijh made them; believe,  they had taken in War,, they were foon reconciled, and  condu<&ed them to their Town. It was pallifadoed round,  mantled with the Barks of Trees, had Scaffolds, like  Mounts, and was breafted very formally. The Men, Women, and Children did their utmoft to exprefe their Affection ; and welcomed them with Songs,. Dances,. Fruits,  and Furs, and with whatever elfe they had. Here they  faw many Hatchets, Knives, and Pieces of Iron and Brafs,  which, they told them, they had from the Sufquejahanrnks,  a mighty Nation, dwelling on the chief of the four Branches at the Head of the Bay, two- Days Journey above the  Falls of that River. They prevailed with two Tockwvtghs  to go and invite fome of the Sufquefahanocks ta them. In  three or four Days, fixty of thofe gigantic People came  down, with Prefents of various Kinds ; and the Wind being  two high for their Canoes, five of their chief Werowances  came boldly on board the Englijh Barge,, and croffed the  Bay to Tockwogh. • This Nation of the Sufquefahanncks could mufler about fix Hundred figJitiHg Men, aad lived in palli^doed F 2 Towns, 68 ^be HisTORT < VIRGINIA. Book II. i6og. Towns, to defend themfelves againft the Majfawomecks^ ' .—^ their mortal Enemies. They were very large, well-^ro- Mat. &W- portioned Men, and appeared like Giants to the Englijh  p^'^gj^^'"" and other Indians; yet feemed of an honeft and fimple Difpofition, and were fcarcely reftrained from adoring the Englijh^ as Gods. And their Language and Attire were very  fuitable to their Stature and Appearance, For their Language founded deep, and folemn, and hollow, like a Voice  in a Vault. Their Attire was the Skins of Bears and  Wolves, fo cut, that the Man's Head went through the  Neck, and the Ears of the Bear were faftened on his Shoulders, while the Nofe and Teeth hung dangling down upon  his Breaft. Behind was another Bear's Face fplit, with a  Paw hanging at the Nofe. And their Sleeves, coming down  to their ElboWs, were the Necks of Bears, with their Arms  going through the Mouth, and Paws hanging to the Nofes.  One had the Head of a Wolf, hanging to a Chain, for a  Jewel } and his Tobacco Pipe was three Quarters of a Yard  long, carved with a Bird, a Deer, and other Devices at  the great End ; which was fufficient to beat out a Man's  Brains. They meafured the Calf of the largeft Man's Leg,  and found it three Quarters of a Yard about, and all the  reft of his Limbs were in Proportion ; fo that he feemed  the ftatlieft and moft goodly Perfonage, they had ever beheld. His Arrows were five Quarters long, headed with  the Splinters of a white chryftal-like Stone, in Form of a  Heart, an Inch broad, and an Inch and half, or more, long.Thefe he carried at his Back, in a Wolfs Skin for his Quivef, with his Bow in one Hand, and his Club in the other.  The Manner of the Englijh was daily to have Prayers  with a Pfalm ; at which Solemnity thofe poor Barbarians  wondered greatly. Prayers being done, the Sufquefahanocks  held a Confultation ; and then began in a very paffionate  Manner to hold up their Hands to the Sun, with a moft  frightful Song. Then embracing Captain Smith, they began to adore him in like Manner. He rebuked them for  it ; but they perfifted, till their Song was finiflied. After  which, with a ftrange furious Adlion, and a difmal Voice,  they began an Oration of their Love ; which ended, they  covered him with a large painted Bear's Skin. One ftood  ready with a great Chain of white Beads, weighing fix or  feve^ Pounds, which he hung about his Neck. The others  had eighteen Mantles, made oT divers Sorts of Skins fewed  together ; all which, with many other Baubles, they laid at  his Feet, ftroaking their Hands about his Neck, for his Creation to be their Governor and Proteaor. They promifed  him Aids of Men and Viftuals, and even offered all, that they Book II. r-&e History 0/ VIRGINIA. 69 they had, if he would ftay with them, to defend and re- »6o8.  venge them on the Majfawomecks. But he was obliged to ^— >'- — '  leave them at Tockwogh, very forrowful for his Departure ; ^"'■Scnyet promifed to vifit them again the next Year. They prefident.  knew nothing of Powhatan and his Territories, but the  Name ; and they informed the Engltjh, that their Hatchets  and other Commodities came originally from the French of  Canada. Having fearched all the Rivers and Inlets, worth  Note, they pafled down the Bay, naming all the remarkable Head-lands and Places after fome of the Company or  their Friends. On the River Patuxen they found the People tradable and civil above all others. They, as well as  the Patowmacks^ were very urgenj with , Smith to revenge  them on the Majfawomecks^ which he promifed to do, but  was afterwards crofled in his Purpofe. For depending upon  the Afliftance and Provifions of thofe two Nations, and of  the Sufquefahanocks, he was very willing to hazard his Perfon in the Expedition ; and therefore, after his Return, he  petitioned the Council for forty Men, to effedl fuch a Conqueft and Difcovery. But the Council, envying his Induftry and Succefs, and deterred perhaps alfo by .the Difficulty of the Undertaking, refufed to rifque the Lives of fo  many Men, in fo long and fo dangerous an Enterprife. In the Difcovery of Rappahanock River, they were  kindly received and entertained by the People of Moraughtacund. Here they met with an old Friend and Acquaintance, one 'Mofco^ 2l lufty Indian of JVighcocomoco on the  River Patowmack. They fuppofed him fome Frenchman's  Son, becaufe, he had a thick, black, bufliy Beard, and the  Indians^ {e\diOTS\ have any at all. And he was not a little  proud of this, and to fee fo many of his Countrymen. He  was very officious and ufeful to the Englijh ; and advifed  them, by all Means not to pafs over to the Rappahanocks,  who would certainly kill them for being Friends with the  Moraughtacunds^ who had lately ftolen three of their  King's Women. But thinking, he only faid this to fecure  their Trade to his Friends, they crofled the River to the  Rappahanocks. There, under. pretence of Trade, they were  invited up Rappahanock Creek, where they had laid an Ambufli ; and after a fmart Skirmifli, in which many Indians  were flain and wounded, the Englijh came oiF Vidlors without the leaft Hurt. Having driven them up into the Woods,  they feized three or four Canoes, full of Commodities,  which, with fome Arrows, they had gathered up, they  prefented to Mojco for his Kindnefs. And he, on his Part,  received them in the moft triumphant Manner, and in the F 3 beft  T&e History of VIRGINIA. Book II.  beft martial Order under Arms, that he could procure of  the Maratightacunds.  Matt.Scri- They fpent the reft of the Day in fitting up their  PrefidMt.*" ^^^t with a Breaft-work of Majfawomeck Targets, which  they had received from them, as Prefents, at the Head of  the Bay, and which had been of fingular Ufe in the Battle  with the Rappahanocks.. They were made of finall Twigs^  woven together fo firmly with ftrings of wild Hemp and  Silk-grafs, that no ArroW could poffibly pierce them. The  next Morning, they fet Sail up the River ; and Mofca followed ailong the Shore, and at laft defired to go with them  in the Boat. As they paffed by Pifacack, Mauhopeakcy and  Meeuppom, three Towns, fituate on the North Side of the  River, on h^h, white, clay Clifts, with a tow Marfh over  againft them, and the River but narrow (the Place, where  the Brijid Works now are) thirty or forty Rappahanocks  had fo difguifed tbemfelves with Branches, that diey took  them for little Buiilies, growing in the Sedge, They faw  their Arrows often ftrike againft the Targets, and drop  into the River ; and at laft Mofco, falling flat on his Face  in the Boat, cried out ; The Rappahanoeks. They soon perceived them to be the Bufhes in the Sedge, which at the  firft Volley fell down. And when they 1^ paCed about  half a Mile further, they again fhewed themfelves^ fimgii^  and dancing very merrily. But they were kindly treated  by the reft of the Nations to the Falls, and they even ufed  their utmoft Intereft with Mofco^ to bring the Englijb to  them. Between Secoheck^ on the South, and MaffawUck^  on the North Side of the River, there was a fmall Mand or  two, which made the River broader, than ordinary. Here  Mr. Rkhard Fetherftme.^ one of their Comipany died ; who^  from his firft coming to the Country, had behaved himfelf honeftly, valiantly, and induftrioufly . They buried him in a Uttle  Bay, which they then called Fetherjiane's Bay, with a Volley  of their Arms. But the reft of the laft Supply, who had, on  the Expedition, been miferahly fick and harraied with their  Seafoning, had by this time perfetaiy recovered their Health.  The next Day, they &iled up as high, as their Boat  cotild go, fetting up CroiTes, and carving their Names on  the Trees ; which they conftantly did at all the higheft  Places, they went to. As tkey ranged about at the Falls^  the Sentinel faw an Arrow fall by him; and giving the Akrni, they perceived about an hundred nimble Indians^  flapping from Tree to Tree, and letting fty their Arrows as  faft, as they could. But after half an Hour's Skirmifli, they  aill vanifhed as fuddenly, as they came. As the Englijh. returned firomi the Purfiiit, they found an ln£an, lying as dead,  Book II. ri>e History of VIRGINIA. dead, {hot in the Knee. Mofco, who had been of great  Service in the Battle, was as furious to beat out his^  Brains, as ever Dog was againft a Bear. But protedling ^""^ *"■  him from his Rage, and carrying him to the Surgeon, who pj^jen""  attended to cure the Captain's Hurt of the Stingray, he  was within an Hour fo far recovered, that he both eat and  fpoke. He was Brother to the King of HaJJininga^ one  of the four Nations of the Mannahocks. Thefe were a People, dwelling above the Falls of Rappahanock^ Neighbours to,  and in ftriiSl: Friendfhip and Alliance with the Manakim againft Powhatan and his Territories. For the Manakins  were not con£ned to one Place or Town, as is vulgarly  thought, but fpread all that Country, from a ftnall Diflance  above the Falls of yames River up to the Mountains, in feveral Towns ; and they were the Heads or Chiefs of the  League and Confederacy of the upland and mountain Indians  againft the Power and Tyranny of Powhatan. Thefe  Mannahocks^ their Neighbours and Allies, lived on fmall  Streams, in a hilly Country, chiefly by hunting ; and were  then come down to fifh zt.MohaJkahod, a fmall hunting  Town, on the North Side of the Falls of Rappahanock^ and  the Boundary between them and the Nantaughtacunds, a  large Nation on the navigable River, below the Falls. The  Englijb afked their Prifoner ; Why they had endeavoured  to deftroy them, who came to them in Peace, to feek their  Friendfliip. He anfwered, that they heard, the Englijh  were a Beople, come from under the World, to take their  World from them. Being afked ; how many Worlds, he  knew, he faid, he - knew none but that, which was under  the Sky, that covered him, and which confiflred of the  Powhatans^ the Manakins^ and the Majfawomecks. And  he told them, that the laft dwelt on a great Water, had  many Boats, and fo nxany Men, that they warred on all  the World befides. After many other Queftions concerning the Country, efpecially beyond the great Mountains, to  which he could give no fetisfaftory Anfwers, they prefented  him with fome Toys, and perfuaded him to go along with  them. But he prefled them much to ftay the coming of  the Mannahock Kings, who, for their good Ufage to hinx,<  fliould be their Friends. And notwithftanding Mofco's eager  Reprefentations to be go^e^ they refolved to ftay till Night,  preparing themfelves to entertain, whatever fliould come. All this while the King of HaJJininga was feeking the  reft, and held a long Confultation, what to do. When the  Englijh had weighed, and were gone, they followed them  all Night, yelling, and hollowing, and ftiooting their Arrows,  and would come to no Terms or Difcourfe. But in the F 4 Mornr&e History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book 11. Morning, being brought to a Parley, Amoroleck, the Priforier, held a long Difcourfe with them. He told them, how  good the Englijh were, and how kindly they had ufed him ;  that they had a Patowmack with them, that loved them as  his Life, and would have flain him, had they not prevented  it ; and that he might have his Liberty, if they would be  Friends ; to which he advifed them by all means, fince to  do them any Hurt was impoffible. Upon this they all hung  their Bows and Quivers upon the Trees ; and one came  fwimming aboard with a BoW tied on his Head, and another with a Quiver of Arrows. Having prefented them to  the Captain, he ufed them very kindly, and told them, that  the other three Kings fhould do the fame, and then the  great King of his World fliould be their Friend. This was  no fooner demanded, than performed ; and fo going afhore  on a low morafs Point of Land, thofe four Kings came,  and received Amoroleck. And after many mutual Civilities  and Prefents, the Englijh de'^arted, leaving four or five  hundred Mannahocks, finging, and dancing, and making  loud and barbarous Rejoicings.. I N their Return down the River they vifited all their  Friends, who rejoiced much at their Viftory over the Mannahocks. By their Intreaty, Captain Smith was induced to  make Peace with the Rappahanocks ; upon Condition, that  they fhould prefent him the King's Bow and Arrows, and  not offer to come armed, where he was ; and that they  fhould be Friends with the Moraughtacunds^ his Friends,  and give their King's Son a Hoftage for the Performance.  Accordingly, the King's of Nantaughtacund and Pifafack  met the Englijh at the Place, where they firft fought.  There the King of Rappahanock prefented his Bow and Arrows, and performed all, they demanded, except the delivering his Son. For having no other, he faid, he could  not live without him ; and he offered in his Stead, to give  up the three Women, which the Moraughtacunds had  ftolen from him. This was accepted ; and the Women  being brought. Captain Smith prefented each of them with  a Chain of Beads. Then caufing the King of Rappahanock,  of Moraughtacund, and Mofco to ftand before him, he bid  the King of Rappahanock take her, he loved befl, Moraughtacund to chufe next, and to .Mofco he gave the third.  And thus was the Peace concluded and celebrated with  feafting, finging, and dancing. And Mofco, to exprefs his  Love to the Englijh, changed his Name to Uttafantafough,  which fignified in their Language, Stranger, and was the  Name, by which they called the Englijh. And then all  the Indians, promifing to be always their Friends, and to plant  Book 11. Tbe History of VIRGINIA. plant Corn purpofely for them; and the Englijh, on their  Side, to provide Hatchets, Beads, and Copper for them ; ^  they departed, giving them a Volley of their Fire-Arms, ^"".Scriwhich they returned with as loud Shouts and Cries, as their prefident.  Strengths could utter. That Night they anchored in the River Piankatank,  and difcovered it, as high as it was navigable. But the  People were gone out to hunting, except a few old Men,  Women, and Children, that were tending their Corn. Of  thefe they obtained a Promife of Part, when they fliould  fetch it ; as they had likewife done of all the Nations,  where-ever they had been. Going from thence to Point  Comfort, they where in a Bay on the South of the  Mouth of York River, then called Gofnold'i Bay, furprifed,  in the Night, with fuch a fudden Guft of Thunder and  Rain, that they never expedied more to fee James-Town.  But difcerning the Land by the Flafhes of Lightening, they  avoided fplitticg on the Shore ; till, by the Help of the  fame Light, they found Point Comfort, where they landed,  and refrefhed themfelves the reft: of the Night. Having difcovered fo many Nations at a Diftance,  they thought it highly proper and neceflary to know their  near Neighbours, the Chefapeakes and Nandfamonds, of  whom they had, as yet, only heard. Therefore fetting Sail  for the Southern Shore, they entered a narrow River, then  called Chefapeake, but "now Elfaheth, on which the Town  of Norfolk ftands. It had a good Channel, but fome Shoals  about the Entrance. They failed up fix or feven Miles,  and faw two or three little Garden-plots with Houfes, and  the Shores overgrown with the largeft Pines, they had ever  feen in the Country. But neither feeing, nor hearing any  People, and the River being very narrow, they returned  back, and coafled the Shore towards Nandfamond, which  they found to be chiefly Oyfter-Banks. At the Mouth of  Nandfamond, they fpied fix or feven Indians, making their  Weirs, who presently fled. But the Englijh went a'fhore,  and threw divers Toys, where they were workings and fo  departed. They were not gone far, before the Indians returned, and began to fing, and dance-, and call them back.  One of them came voluntarily into their Boat, and invited  them up the River to. his Houfe, which was in a little  Ifland, where (as well as on the main Land againft it) they  faw many and large Corn-fields. He treated them with  great Civility, and they in return, prefented him, his  Wife, and Children, with fuch Toys, as highly pleafed •  them. By that time the others being come, invited them  higher up the River, under Pretence of going to their  12 Houfes  The History of VIRGINIA. Book II.  Houfes likewife. But they foon found, that they only intended to decoy them up into the Narrows of the River,  where the whole Nations of the Nanfamonds and Chefapeakes  were in Ambufh to receive them. Having difcovered the  Treachery, they made the beft of their Way down into  the Open, amidft the Shot of three or four Hundred Indians, which they returned from their Muikets with fuch Effedl, that they foon made them glad to take Shelter behind  the Trees. Above an hundred Arrows ftuck in their Breaftwork of Majfawomeck Targets, and about the Boat, yet  none was hurt. Only Anthony Bagnall, the Surgeon, was  fliot in his Hat, and another in the Sleeve. Having gained  the Open againft the Ifland, they feized on all their Canoes,  and refolved, upon Confultation, to burn every thing on the  Ifland at Night. In the mean while, they began to cut to  Pieces their Canoes ; at the Sight of which the Indians threw  down their Arms, and fued for Peace ; which the Englijh  granted, on Condition, they would bring thqir King's Bow  and Arrows, with a Chain of Pearl ; and fhould, when  they came back again, give them four hundred Ba&ets of  Corn, Otherwife thdy threatened, to break all their Canoes, to burn their Houfes and Corn, and to deftroy all,  that they had. To thefe Conditions the Indians molt joyfully agreed ; and flocking down in great Numbers with  their Bafkets, they foon loaded the Boat with Corn, and  fo parted good Friends. And thus having viewed and reconnoitred all the Places  on the Bay, one of the fineft perhaps and moft commodious  Countries in the World, which Nature feems to have formed for one noble and complete Dominion, but which is fince  unhappily divided by the large Grant to the Lord Baltimore.,  and having paffed about three thoufand Miles, according to  their own Computation, in that fmall and open Boat, and  in the Midft of many barbarous and favage Nations, they  returned with Joy and Triumph to James-Town, -wheie  they arrived fafe the 7th of September, 1608. There they  found Mr. Scrivener, and feveral others, well recovered ;  fome fick ; many dead ; the late Prefident a Prifoner for  Mutiny ; and the Corn, by Mr. Scrivener's honeft Diligence,  gathered ; but the Provifions in the Store much injured by  the Rain. But whilft Captain Smith and others were thus induftrioufly engaged in making good this Settlement, the Second  or Northern Colony, granted by the Letters patent to the  Town of Plimouth and others, was embraced and undertaken by feveral Perfons of Fortune and Diftinftion, and  particularly by Sir John Popham, Lord Chief- Juftice of England.  Book II. "fhe History of VIRGINIA. gland. He was a Gentlemen of one of the greateft Families  in the We^ of England, but is memorable to all Pofterity '  for his infamous Partiality and Injuftice in the Trial of Sir ^"'^ *"■  Walter Ralegh. However, he was a Perfon, at that Time, p'endlr"  of great Power and Intereft, and in high Efteem with many for Wifdom and Virtue ; and having procured Men and  Money, he fent Captain George Popham, as Prefident, Captain Ralegh Gilbert, as Admiral, and many other Gentlemen in feveral Pofts and Offices, with an hundred Men, to  poflefs and fettle the Country. They fet Sail from Plimouth, the laft oi May, 1607, and fell in with fome Iflands,  then called Monahigan. From thence they proceeded to  the Continent, and fettled upon a very barren and rocky  Coaft, at the Mouth of Sagadahock^ a large navigable River,  which muft be either the River Saco in New- England, or  elfe St. fuan in Acadia. But that Winter was fo extremely cold and frozen, that they could not range much abouf,  nor fearch the Country ; and their Provifion was fo fcanty,  that they were obliged to fend all, except forty £ve of theijr  Company back. Captain Popham, their Prefident, died  foon ; and not long after, they were informed by the Ships  that brought them Supplies, of the Death of the two principal Promoters and Supporters of the Undertaking, the  Lord Chief-Juftice Popham, and Sir fohn Gilbert. This  laft Gentleman, who was Brother, or perhaps rather Nephew, to the famous Sir Humphry Gilbert, before-mentioned, was chofen Prefident of the Council for the Northern Colony. His Brother, Captain Ralegh Gilbert, Admiral of this Colony, fucceeding to his Efi:ate, was obliged  to return to England, to enter upon his Inheritance, and  take Care of his Affairs. And the reft alfo, being doubtful  of proper Affiftance and Encouragement, and having no  Profped: in the Country, but of the moft extreme Mifery  and Famine, all returned to England this Year 1608. And  thus was this Plantation begun and ended in one Year ; and  that vaft Grant, in which lay large Trafts of fine and noble Country, was ftigmatized in the Grofs, and defpifed,  as a cold, barren, mountainous, and rocky Defert. About this Time alfo. Captain Henry Hudfon difcovered Long-IJland, New-York, Hudfon's River, and the  Parts adjacent. As the Englijh were bufily employed in  their own Difcoveries and Settlements, he could hope for  but little Advantage from his own Country ; and therefore  he applied himfelf to the States-General of the United Provinces, and fold this important Difcovery to them. But  this Sale was always excepted againft by the Englijh, as the  Difcovery was made by his Majefty's Commiffion, and the Sale  •The History of VIRGINIA. Book II. Sale paffed without the King's Confent, xo whom, of Right,  ' all new Lands and Difcoveries belong. However, the Dutch ■ crept in by Degrees, built new JmJIerdam, and other Towns, ■ ftrongly fortified themfelves, planted, and became a flourifliing Colony. Doctor Whitgift, Arch-Bifliop of Canterbury, a Man  of a mild and gentle Difpofition, having died four Years before this, was fucceeded in that high Preferment by Dr.  Richard Bancroft, a Perfon of a quite different Temper.  He had very high Notions with Relation to the Government  of both Church and State; and was accordingly a great  Stickler for, and Promoter of, the King's abfolute Power, and  failed not to take all Occafions, to oblige the Puritans to con  form to the Church of England. This Prelate's Harflinefs  and Warmth caufed many of that People to take the Refolution this Year of fettling themfelves in Virginia, and fome  w'ere adtually come off for that Purpofe. But the Archbiftiop finding, that they were preparing in great Numbers  to depart, obtained a Proclamation from the King, forbid^  ding any to go, without his Majefty's exprefs Leave. And  this was the more readily granted, as the Court mortally  hated that Se£t, and were now afraid, that they would become too numerous and too powerful in Virginia.  John Smith \ n Virginia, on the lOth of September, by the Eleftion of  Prefident. jj^g Council, and the Requeft of the Colony, Captain Smith  was invefted with the Government ; which, till then, he  would by no Means accept, tho' often importuned to it.  And now the building of Ratcliffie's Palace was flopped, and  Works of more immediate Ufe and Neceflity undertaken.  The Church was repaired ; the Store-houfe new covered ;  and a Place made ready for the Reception of the Supplies,  they daily expedied from England. The Fort was reduced  into Form ; the Order of the Watch was renewed; the  Troops trained at each Setting of. the Watch; and the  whole Company every Saturday exercifed, in the Plain towards the IVeJi, which was prepared for that Purpofe, and  called Smithfi'eld; where fometimes above an. hundred Indians would ftand in Amazement, to behold how a File  would batter a Tree, where the Prefident had made them  a Mark to fhoot at. And now being the Time of gathering  Corn, and of Plenty among the Indians, the Boats were trimmed for Trade, and fent out under the Command of Lieutenant Pifrry. But in their Way, meeting Captain Newport -with.  the fecond Supply, he brought them back to James-Town. Captain Newport was in reality an empty, idle, interefted Man ; very fearful and fufpicious in Times of Danger and Difficulty ; but a very great and important Perfon Book II. T-6^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. 77 in his own Talk and Conceit. He had, by the Advantage i*°8of gbing to and fro, gained fo much upon the Ear and'"' — r—'  Confidence of the Council and Company in England, that 7'>'" Smith  whatever he propofed, was, for the moft part, concluded  aijd refolved on. And upon this Voyage, he obtained a  private Commiffion, not to return without a Lump of Gold,  a Certainty of the South-Sea, or one of the loft Company,  fent out by Sir Walter Ralegh. Befides, he brought an  exprefs Command, to difcover the Country of the Manaiins, with a Barge, for Conveniency of Carriage, to be  taken into five Pieces, which they were to carry beyond  the Falls, to convey them to the South-Sea. He likewife  brought over a Crown for Powhatan, with Orders for his  Coronation, and Prefents of a Bafon and Ewer, Bed, Bedftead, Cloaths, and other coftly Novelties ; which ftately  Kind of Court had this bad Effedl, that it made him value  himfelf too much, and overrate his Favour, which they had  before much better for a plain Piece of Copper. In this  Voyage came over many Perfons of Diftinftion ; Captain  Peter Wynne, and Captain Richard Waldo, two old Soldiers  and valiant Gentlemen, both appointed of the Council; Mr.  Francis Weji, Brother to the Lord Delawarr ; Ralegh Crojhaw, John Rujfel, John Codrington, Daniel Tucker, Mr.  Hunt, Thomas Foreji, and others, to the Number of feventy Perfons. In this Ship likewife arrived Mrs. Foreji, and  Anne Burras, her Maid, the firft Englijhwomen ever in this  Country. And eight Poles and Germans were fent, to make  Pitch, Tar, Glafs, Mills, ^and Soap-Afties ; which, when  the Country was replenifhed with People and Neceflaries,  would have done exceedingly well, but in that their infant  State, they were only a Burthen and Hindrance to the reft,  who were fufficiently puzzled and employed to find Subfiftance for themfelves. Captain Smith, whofe Mind was folid and provident,  and plainly forefaw the ill Confequence of fpending that Time  in thefe Projefts, which ought to be employed in the fpeedy  Difpatch of the Ship, and in trading and laying, in a Store  of Provifions for the Year, was much mortified and perplexed with thefe Orders, and ftrenuoufly oppofed their Execution in Council. But Newport undertook to freight the  Bark of twenty Tons with Corn, in going and returning  from the Manakins ; and to obtain another Load for her of  Powhatan, from Werowocomoco. He alfo promifed a large  Proportion of VicSuals from the Ship ; which he was fo far  from performing, that the Colony was obliged to fpare him  three Hogfheads of Corn to victual him homeward. In  fliort, he reprefented Smith's Oppofition, as a mere Device, to  'The History of VIRGINIA. Book II. to hinder his Journey, that he might himfelf efFe£t the Dif- ' covery ; and he faid, that his Cruelty to the Indians might John Smith ^eii be a Means to hinder thefe Defigns, and to make them Prefident. ^^^j^ Revenge. Smith's Opinion being therefore over-ruled by the unanimous Voice of the Council, all other Works and Defigns were laid afide, and an hundred and twenty chofen Men appointed for Newport's Guard on the Expedition. But Smithy to clear himfelf of thefe Sufpiciohs, and to  fhew, that the Indians were not fo defperate, as was pretended by Newport^ and how willing he was to affift, as  far as he could, undertook himfelf to carry their Meflage  to Powhatan, and to invite him to "James-Town to receive  his Prefents. And taking with him only Captain Waldo,  and three more, he went acrofs by Land, about twelve  Miles, to Werowocomoco, where he paffed the River in an  Indian Canoe. Powhatan, being thirty Miles off, was immediately fent for ; and in the mean time, Pocahontas and  her Women entertained him with a ftrange Mafk and  barbarian Piece of Revelry, and feafted them with all the  favage Dainties, tbey could devife. The next Day, Powhatan came, and Smith delivered his Meflage, together with  Namontack, his Servant, whom he had fent to England.  And he defired him to come to his Father Newport, to receive his Prefents, and to enter upon Meafures for their  effeftual Revenge againft the Manakins. To this that fubtle Barbarian anfwered : That if their King had fent him any  Prefents, he alfo was a King, and that was his Land : That  he would fay eight Days, to receive them : That Newport  ought to come to him, and not He to go to their Fort, which  was too foolijh a Bait to be taken : That as to the Manakins,  he could revenge his own Wrongs ; and for any fait Water  beyond the Mountains, he told him, that all the Relations, they  had received from his People, were falfe. Whereupon he  began to draw Plots upon the Ground, according to his  Difcourfe, of all thefe Regions. Many other complimental Difcourfes pafled between them ; and fo Smith returned  with this Anfwer to fames-Town. Hereupon the Prefents were fent round by Water,  and the Captains went acrofs by Land, with a Guard of fifty  Men. All being- met at Werowocomoco, the next Day was  appointed for his Coronation. Then the Prefents were  brought ; his Bafon and Ewer, Bed and Furniture, were  fet up ', and his Scarlet Cloak and Apparel, with much ado,  put on him, being perfuaded by Namontack, that they would  not hurt him. But a great Coil and Trouljle there was to  make him kneel, to receive his Crown. He neither knew  the Majefty of a Crown, nor the Meaning of bending the Knee, Book 11. r.6^ History of VIRGINIA. 79 Knee, which obliged them to ufe fo many Perfuafions, »6o8. Examples, and Inftruflions, as tired them all. At laft, by -^ ' leaning hard on his Shoulders, he ftooped a little, and three, J"''" ^'"''^  being ready with the Crown, put it on his Head; when, *"'"  by the Warning of a Piftol, the Boats were prepared with  fuch a Volley of Shot, that the King ftarted up in a horrible Fright, till he faw, all was well. Then recollecfting  hlmfelf, to return their Kindnefs, he gave his old Shoes and  Mantle to Captain Newport ; and finding him determined to  difcover the Manakins^ he did his utmoft to divert him from  his Purpofe, and refufed to lend him either Men or Guides,  except Namontack. And fo after fome flight Compliments  on both Sides, in Requital for his Prefents, he gave Newport  a Heap of Ears of Corn, which might contain feven or eight  Bufhels, and as much more was purchafed in the Town,  with which they returned to the Fort at "James-Town. Immediately upon their Return, Captain Newport,  with an hundred and twenty chofen Men, led by Captain  Waldo, Lieutenant Percy, Captain Wynne, Mr. Weji, and  Mr. Scrivener, fet forward for the Difcovery of the Manakins ; leaving the Prefident at the Fort, with eighty or ninety  weak and fickly Men, to load the Ship, Arriving at the  Falls, they marched by Land about forty Miles, and found  a very fair, fertile, well-watered Country. Two Towns  of the Manakins they difcovered, fituate on the South Side  of the River. The People ufed them neither well nor ill ;  yet for their Security, they took one of their petty Kings,  and led him bound, to condufl them the Way. In their  Return, they fpent fome Time in fearching for Mines, having with them one William Callicut, a Refiner, for that  Purpofe. From the Cruft of Earth, which they dug, he  perfuaded them, that he extra£ted fome fmall Quantity of  Silver. With this poor Trial, they returned down the  fame Path, they went, to the Falls ; where the Indians  feigned, that many Ships were come into the Bay, to kill  the Englijh at James-Town. But as for their Corn, they  had hid it in the Woods, and could by no Means be induced  to trade. And being thus deluded and difappointed, they  returned to James-Town, half fick, and all complaining,  being fadly harrafled with Toil, Famine, and Difcontent. No fooner were they landed, but the Prefident difperfed  as many, as were able, fome to make Glafs, and others  for Pitch, Tar, and Soap-Aflies. Leaving them at the Fort  under the Councils Care and Overfight, he himfelf carried  thirty about five Miles down the River, to learn to cut  down Trees, make Clapboard, and lie in the Woods. Among thefe he chofe Gabriel Beadle and John Rujfel, two fine 8o r-6^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book II. 1608. fine and proper Gentlemen of the laft Supply. Thefe "^ — r^^were, at firft, ftrange Diverfions for Men of Plfeafure. John Smith Yet they lodged, eat, and drank, worked or played, only Prefident. ^^ jj,g Prgfident himfelf did ; and all things were carried fo  pleafantly, that within a Week they became Matters, and  thirty or forty of fuch voluntary Gentlemen, would have  done more in a Day than an hundred of the reft, who muft  be driven to it by Compulfion. Being inured to Labour by  thefe means, they foon made it their Delight, to hear the  Trees thunder, as they fell ; and afterwards became very  hardy, ufeful, and refolute Men, efpecially Mr. Rujfel.  But the Axes often bliftering their tender Fingers, they  would, at every third Stroke, drown the Eccho, with a  loud Volley of Oaths. To remedy which Sin, the Prefident ordered every Man's Oaths to be numbered, and at  Night, for every Oath, to have a Can of Water poured  down his Sleeve ; which fo waftied and drenched the Offender, that in a ftiort time, an Oath was not heard in a  Week. In the mean while, Mr. Scrivener^ Captain Waldo^ and  Captain Wynne^ at the Fort, each, in their feveral Way,  carefully regarded their Charge. But when the Prefident  returned, feeing the Time confumed, and no Provifions  got, and that the Ship lay idle at a great Charge,  and did nothing, he immediately embarked in the Difcovery Barge, taking with him eighteen Men and another  Boat, and leaving Orders with the Council, to fend  Lieutenant Percy after him, with the next Barge, that arrived at the Fort. Going into Chickahominy, the Indians  were furly, and knowing his Wants, with much Scorn and  Infolence refufed to trade. But the Prefident, perceiving,  it was Powhatan's Policy to ftarve the Englijh, told them,  that he came not fo much for Corn, as to revenge his own  Captivity and the Death of his two Men ; which he pretended to attribute to them. And fo, landing his Men,  and making ready to charge them, they immediately fled.  Soon after they fent Ambafladors, with Corn, Fifh, Fowl,  and whatever elfe they had, to make their Peace. Their  Corn being that Year but bad, they complained extremely  of their own Wants, yet freighted their Boats with an  hundred Bufhels, and in like manner Lieutenant Percy's,  that not long after arrived. Returning to James-Town, the  Colony was much pleafed and revived by this feafonable  Supply. Yet fuch was the Malice and Envy of fome, that  they had rather hazard a Starving, than that Smith's Endeavours fhould prove fo much more efFediual, than theirs.  And Newport and Ratcliffe had projected, not only to de- pofe Book II. "The History of VIRGINIA. 8l pofe him, but to keep hitn out of the Fort ; under Pre- 'So*tence, that, being Prefident, he had left his Place and the ^— y-~-^  Fort, without their Confent. But their Horns were tooJohn Smith  (hort, and they themfelves narrowly efcaped a greater  Mifchief. All this while, their old Tavern, the Ship, made as  much of all them, that had either Money or Ware, as  could be defired. By this time, they were become >perfedl  on all Sides, the Sailers, the Soldiers, and the Indians ; and  much more Care was taken, to maintain their private and  pernicious Trade, than to provide things neceffary for the  Colony. Newport and his Mariners had fo many private  Faftors at the Fort, that in fix or feven Weeks, of two or  three hundred Axes, Hoes, Pick-axes, and other Infliruments for the Ufe of the Colony, fcarce twenty could be  found ; and for Pike-heads, Powder, Shot, or any, thing  elfe they could fteal, they knew well, how to convey them  fecretly, to trade with the Indians for Furs, Balkets, young  Beafts, and other fuch-like Commodities. So that, altho'  Virginia afforded no Commodities for thofe, who were at  the Expence of the Settlement, yet thefe Men found Means,  by thefe indirefl: Methods, of driving on a very profitable  Trade. And thus, by their falfe Excufes, Informations,  and Advices in England^ and by their unlawful Trade here,  the Adventurers were coufened, and the Aftion almoft  overthrown. Upon this Account therefore, as well as under Pretence, that his Orders were, not to return, without  a Lump of Gold, a Certainty of the South-Sea, or one of  Sir Walter Ralegh's loft Company, the Prefident had once  determined to fend away the Ship, and to ohYigt Newport  to ftay one Year in the Country, to learn to fpeak of his  own Experience. But upon his Submiflion and Acknowledgment, this Punifhment was remitted, and he was fuffered to return to England in the Ship ; where, it is not to  be doubted, but that he reprefented Matters in the worft  Light. It is certain, that the Treafurer and Council in England  were greatly difappointed in their Hopes. For they expected, upon their Difcoveries in America, to have fpeedy Re^  turns, in Gold and Silver, and fuch other rich Commodities, as the Spaniards found at their firft Arrival. But Virginia is not a Country of Mines. It is formed by Nature  for producing all the Neceffaries, or even Elegancies of  Life, to as high a Degree, as perhaps any other Country  whatfoever. It lies under the fame Clime, as fopie Parts  of Spain, Italy, and Sicily, and is a Country of Plenty and  Abundance ; and therefore, in the End, is more valuable,  18 G and 82 The History of VIRGINIA. Book 11. 1608. and even richer, than thofe Regions j which abound in Gold V ■ and Silver. The Truth of this is confirmed by Experience ; John Smith and it is an undeniable Maxim in Politicks, that CommoPrefident. jj^j^^ ^^ ^j^^ g^^ Neceflity, or fuch as are of abfolute Ufe  for our Subfiftance and the Support of Life, have a much  greater real and intrinfic Value, than thofe, which only  receive an imaginary Worth, by Compadt or Agreement,  and are wholly defigned, as a Gage, or Meafure, of the  real and intrinfic Value of other Commodities. The true  Riches therefore, and Power of every Country, depend  upon the plentiful Production of Corn, Stocks, Cloathing,  and other fuch Commodities of the firft Neceflity ; the  Want of which can, by no means, be fupplied by ever fo  great an Abundance of Gold and Silver. But the- Want of  them, on the contrary, may be, and often have been, fupplied, by flamped Leather, Tallies, Shells, Paper, or other  fuch arbitrary Reprefentations. But altho' thefe Necefl~aries of Life are of this greater real Value, yet they are not  to be had at once. Previous Preparations by Culture, Manufacturing, Stocks, and other Improvements, are necefllary ;  which often require a long Time, to bring them to any  tolerable Degree of PerfeSion. And the Englijh^ when  they firfl: came to Virginia^ happened upon a Land, juft as  God had made it, little planted, manured or improved.  The Inhabitants were an idle, improvident, vagabond People ; knowing nothing of Gold and Silver, and other valuable Commodities ; and carelefs of every thing, but juft  from Hand to Mouth. But however free they might be from Blame, the  Council in England were certainly very much fretted with  the Difappointment, and by this Ship, wrote the Prefident  a very angry Letter. They complained of the vain Hopes,  they had been fed with, and very fmall Proofs ; and of  their Factions and filly Projedls about dividing the Country,  concerning which the late Prefident and his Faction had  written fome idle Story to the Earl of Salijbury, at that  time chief Minifter of State. And they threatened, unlefs  the Charge of this Voyage, amounting to about two thoufand Pounds, was defrayed by the Ship's Return, they  fliould be deferted, and left to remain here, as baniftied  Men. To this Letter Captain Smith gave a very plain and  foldierly Anfwer by the Ship, which was at length difpatched, with the Trials of Pitch, Tar, Glafs, Frankincenfe, and Soap-Aflies, and with what Wainfcot and Clapboard could be provided. In it he endeavoured to lay open  to them the Caufes, that kept them from laying fuch a  Foundation, as might have given better Satisfaaion ; and advifes Book II. 'ne History of VIRGINIA. 83 advifes them againft expecting any profitable Returns at 1608. prefent. He declares his own Integrity and Sincerity to-* y ' wards them, and warns them againft fome Perfons, who J"^!! ^»"''*  caufed them to believe much more, than was true. He '^' °"''  tells them, that their Direftions by Newport had been followed, altho' he himfelf was direftly againft them, as they  were very prejudicial and to the imminent Hazard of the  whole Colony, which was then, when it was too late, generally confeffed. He complains of Newport, expofes the  Vanity and ill Confequences of his Projefts, his Lingering in  the Country, the good Cheer and Luxury of him and the Sailers,  and their Embezzlement of the publick Stores. ■ For of the  two thoufand Pounds, which this Ship coft them, he affures them, that the Colony had not Received the Value of  an hundred Pounds. He blames Ratcliffe, Jrcher, and  others, as the Authors of their Factions and Difturbances ;  and tells them, that he had fent Ratcliffe, a counterfeit Impoftor, whofe right Name was Sicklemore, home, left the  Company ftiould cut his Throat. And he judicioufly infifts upon their fending ufeful Labourers and proper Tradefmen for their prefent Condition ; and upon providing, firft  of all. Food, Lodging, and fuch other Neceflaries, as  were abfolutely requifite for -their Being and Subfiftance,  before they went on any other Projedls of Gain or Curiofity, for which they were no ways fitted, in their prefent  weak and infant Condition. At the fame time, he fent  them two Barrels of fuch Stones, as he thought contained  fome Kind of 'Ore, with Notes, fignifying in what Places  he found them. And to ftiew, he could make as large a  Difcovery, as Newport's of the Manakins, for lefs Charge,  than he fpent them at every Meal, he fent them a Map of  the Bay and Rivers,, with a Relation annexed, of the Countries, and of the Nations, that dwelt upon them. And  this indeed was done with fuch wonderful exadtnefs, as  fhewed him to have travelled far, and feen much ; and it  has ever fince been the Original, from which all later Maps  and Defcriptions of Virginia have been moftly copied. And now the Ship being gone, the grand Remoca and  Obftacle to all neceffary Bufineis, the Colony began to look  about them. The Profpeft was difmal, and they were all  in the utmoft Confternation, expedling nothing elfe but the  moft extreme Famine. However to make up, in fome  meafure, their loft Time, Mr. Scrivener had been fent, before Newport's Departure, with the Bark and Barges to  Werowocomoco. There he found the Indians more ready to  fight, than to trade. But his Vigilancy prevented their  Plots ; and by the Means of Namontack, he got three or G 2 four 84 T/6^ History of VIRGINIA. Book II. 1608. four Hogflieads of Corn, and as much Pocones, a red Root, ■ , 'at that time efteemed an excellent Dye. Meeting Newport John Smith at Point Comfort, he returned to the Fort ; and the PrefiPrefident. ^^^^^ j^jj.jj^g j^;^ ^^^ Captain Wynne, fet ofF immediately  for Nandfamond. That Nation at iirft denied him, not  only the four hundred Balkets of Corn, they had promifed,  but any Trade at all. They excufed themfelves on Account of their Corn's being almoft fpent, and becaufe they  were commanded by Powhatan, to keep what was left,  and not to let the Englijh even enter their River. The  Prefident iiiiding, nothing was to be done in the Way of  Peace, refolved to ufe Force. At the firft Onfet, the Indians all fled, without (hooting an Arrow. Then iflarching  up to their Houfes, they fet Fire to the firft, they came to.  When the Indians perceived that, they offered, if they  would make no more Spoil, .to give them half the Corn,  they had. Accordingly, before Night, they loaded theirthree Boats ; and for fparing them this Year, they promifed  to plant Corn purpofely for them the next. With this  they returned to fames-Town, about the Time, that fohn  Laydon was married to Anne Burras ; which was the firft  Chriftian Marriage, that ever was in Virginia. But the  Prefident ftaid not long at the Fort. For he fitted himfelf and Captain Waldo out immediately with two Barges,  and made a Voyage up the River. From Wyanoake, and  all Parts there-abouts, he found the Indians fled'; and therefore hafting up higher, he then firft difcovered the River  and People of Appamatox. The little Corn, they had,  was equally divided ; and the Prefident gave them Copper  for it, and fuch other Toys, as fully fatisfied them. At  the fame time, Mr. Scrivener and Lieutenant Percy went  abroad in Queft of Provifions, but could find nothing. About this time, the Prefident was invited by Powhatan to come to him ; and he promifed to load his Ship with  Corn, provided he would fend fome Workmen to build him  a Houfe, and would give him a Grind-ftone, fifty Swords,  fome Muikets, a Cock and a Hen, with much Copper and  Beads. The Prefident was not ignorant of his Devices and  Subtlety ; yet was unwilling to neglecft any Opportunity of  getting Provifions, and refolved, fooner than fail, to take  him and all his Store by Surprife. To this End, he took  Order with Captain Waldo, whom he knew to be fure in  Time of Danger, to fecond him, if Need required. But  Captain Wynne and Mr. Scrivener did their utmoft to hinder their Projeft. For Scrivener's ftrift Friendfhip with  Captain Smith was now much cooled ; and he was thought  to join with fome others, in a Plot to ruin him in England. But Book II. r/6e History 0/ VIRGINIA. 85 But the Prefident, whom no Eloquence could perfuade to i6°8ftarve, fent off two Englijhmen -before by Land, and four^~ — y— '  Germans, to build the Houfe for Powhatan againft his Ar-^^"*" *""'*  rival. And then, having left Mr. Scrivener his Subftitute,  he fet forward with the Bark and two Barges, manned only  with fuch, as offered themfelves voluntarily to go upon the  Service. In the Difcovery-Barge went himfelf, Mr. Ralegh  Chrejhaw, "John Rtijfel, and feveral other Gentlemen and  Soldiers ; and Mr. William Phittiplace, as Captain, Lieutenant Percy, Mr. Francis Wejl, Mr. Robert Ford, Clerk of  the Council, with many others, went on board the Bark. The 29th of December they left James-Town, being  viftualled only for three or four Days. That Night they  lodged at Warrafqueake, where the Prefident got fufficient  Provifion. The King of that Town did his utmoft to  divert him from feeing Powhatan; but finding, he could  not prevail, he told him, that Powhatan would ufe them  kindly, although he had fent for them only to cut their  Throats. He therefore advifed him, not to truft him,  and to be fure to give him no Opportunity of feizing his  Arms. The Prefident thanked him for his good Counfel ;  and having obtained Guides from him to the Chowanocks, a  Nation dwelling in the Fork of Chowan, between Nottawdy and Meherrin Rivers, he fent Michael Sicklemore, a  very valiant, honeft, and painful Soldier, with Prefents to  that King ; but chiefly to look for Silkgrafs, and to enquire after Sir Walter Ralegh's loft Colony. The next  Night they lodged at Kicquotan, and were detained there  fix or feven Days by the extreme Wind, Rain, Froft, and  Snow. This obliged them to keep their Chrijimas among 1609.  the Savages ; and they were never more merry in their  Lives, lodged by better Fires, or fed with greater Plenty of '  good Bread, Oyfters, Fifli, Flefli, and Wildfowl. Departing thence, they arrived on the 12th of January, thro'  various Accidents, at Werowocomoco ; where they found the  River frozen near half a Mile from the Shore. But the  Prefident, running his Barge up, as far as he could by  breaking the Ice, was left by the Ebb upon the oozy Shoals.  In this dangerous Situation, he plunged firft into the River  himfelf; and by his Example, taught them to march, near  Middle deep, a Flight-fliot, through the frozen Ooze.  When the Barge fhould float, he appointed two or three to return her aboard the Bark ; where they, foon after, came into  fuch Diftrefs for Want of Water, that the River being fait,  they were obliged to make frefh Water, by melting the Ice. The Prefident and his Company quartered in the next  Cabbins, they found, and fent to Powhatan for Provifions. G 3 He 86 The History of VIRGINIA. Book II. 1609. He fent them Plenty of Bread, Turkey, and Venifon ; and ' V 'the next Day,"feafted them after his ufual Manner. But yohn Smith },g pretended,' he had not fent for them ; neither had he  Preident. ^^^ Corn, and his People much lefs ; and foon began to  be importunate with them to be gone. But the Prefident  confronting him with the Perfons, who brought the Meffage, he endeavoured to put the Matter oiF with a Laugh,  and afked for his Commodities. But he liked nothing, except Guns and Swords, and valued a Bafket of Corn higher  than a Baflcet of Copper ; faying, he could rate his Corn,  but not the Copper. Captain Smith, feeing his Intent, told  him ; that he had many Ways, to have got Provifions,  but relying on his Promifes, he had neglected all to* fatisfy  his Defire, and had fent his Men to make his Buildings,  whilft his own were undone : That he knew, he had engroffed his People's Corn, and forbid them to trade ; thinking, by confuming Time, to confume them : That as for  Swords and Guns, he had none to fpare ; and that he muft  know, thofe, he had, could keep him from ftarving : Yet  he would neither rob nor wrong him, nor diflblve that  Friendfhip, they had mutually promifed, unlefs conftrained  to it by bad Ufage, The King liftened attentively to this  Difcourfe ; and promifed, that both he" and his People  fliould fpare him, what they could, and that they fliould  receive it within two Days. Bui, fays he, / have fame  Doubt about the Reafon of your coming hither. I am informed from many Hands, that you come, not to trade,  but to invade my People, and to pojfefs my Country. This  makes me lefs ready to relieve you, and frightens my People from bringing in their Corn. And therefore to eafe  them of that Fear, leave your Arms aboard, Jince they are  neediefs here, where we are all Friends, and for ever  Powhatans. In thefe, and many fuch infidious Difcourfes, that Day  was fpent. But Captain Smith afterwards difcovered, that  the Germans, whom he had fent to build Powhatan's Houfe,  finding his Plenty and the Wants of the Englijh, and  thinking it fcarce poflible, that they could efcape both him  and- Famine, had, to gain his Favour, revealed to him all,  they knew, of the State and Defigns of the Englijh, and  advifed him, how to counteract and prevent them. And  this Treachery was the more odious and unfufpedted, becaufe the Prefident had placed one of them, as a Spy upon  Powhatan, being a Man of Judgnient and Refolution, and  therefore thought mofl: proper for that Employ. And as  he was fure of his Wages for his Labour, and had ever  been well ufed, both he and his- Countrymen, there was at that Book II. The History of VIRGINIA. 87 that time little Doubt concerning his Honefty. But whilft 1609. they expefted the coming in of the Country, they wrangled , • Powhatan out of eighty Bufhels of Corn for a Copper Ket- J^"^" ^'"''^  tie ; which the Prefident feeing him much afFe<ft, he told '^"'""^="'him, it was of much greater Value, yet in Regard of his  Scarcity, he would accept that Quantity at prefent, provided he fhould have as much more the next Year, or the  Manakin Country. Both being fatisfied with the Condition,  Powhatan begun to expoftulate the Difference of Peace and  War, \yith Captain Smith, after this Manner. H E told him, with a Vanity ufual to Perfons, who afFedl  to be thought very old, that he had feen the Death of all  his People thrice ; and that not one of thofe three Generations was then living, except himfelf : That "he knew the  Difference of Peace and War better, than any in his  Country : That he was now grown old, and muft die foon ;  and that the Succeflion muft defcend, in Order, to his  Brothers, Opitchapan^Opechancanough, and Catataugh, znd  .then to his two Sifters, and their two Daughters. He wifhed  their Experience was equal to his ; and that Smith's Love  to them might be no lefs, than his to Smith. He afked  him ; Why he would take that by Force, which he might  quickly have by Love ? Why he would deftroy them, that  provided him Food ? and. What he could get by War ?  For they could hide their Provifions, and fly into the Woods ;  and then he muft confequently famifli by wronging his  Friends. He defired to know the Reafon of his Jealoufy,  lirice he faw them unarmed, and willing to fupply his Wants,  if he would come in a friend^ly Manner, and not with  Swords and Guns, as to invade an Enemy. And he told  him, that he was not fo fimple, as not to know, it was  better to eat good Meat, lie well, and fleep quietly with his  Women and Children ; to laugh and be merry with the  Englijh, and being their Friend, to have Copper, Hatchets,  and whatever elfe he wanted ; than to fly from all, to lie  cold in the Woods, feed upon Acorns, Roots, and fuch  Trafh, and to be fo hunted, that he could neither reft, eat,  or fleep. In that Circumftance, his tired Men muft w^ch,  and if a Twig did but break, all would be crying out.  Here comes Captain Smith ; and fo, in this miferable Manner, to end his miferable Life ; which might likewife foon  be Captain Smith's Fate too, through his Raflmefs and Unadvifednefs. He therefore earneftly exhorted him to peaceable Counfels ; and above all infifted, that the Guns and  Swords, the grand Caufe of their Jealoufy and Uneafinefs,  Ihould be removed and fent away. G4 To 88 Tbe History of VIRGINIA. Book II. 1609. To this crafty Difcourfe the Prefident replied : That it ' V ' was the Fafhion of the Englijh, always to wear their Arms, John Smith Jikg their Cloaths ; and that they would, by no Means,  Prefident. ^^^^ ^j^j^ ^^1^x0. : That his People came frequently to JamesTown, and were entertained with their Bows and Arrows,  without any Exceptions : That if the Englijh had intended  him any Hurt, they could long fince have efFedled it, as  was evident to him, and all the World, efpecially confidering the Superiority of their Arms : That altho' Revenge  was always in their Power, yet, out of an Inclination to  Mercy and Friendfliip,- they pafled over the daily Violations of the Peace by h.is Subjedls : And as to hiding his  Provifions, and flying into the Woods, he told him, they  fliould not fo unadvifedly ftarve, as he imagined. For they  had a Rule to find things hidden, beyond his Knowledge.  After much more Difcourfe, they at laft began to trade.  But the King, feeing that his Will would not be admitted  as a Law, and that Smith was obftinate, not to difmifs his  Guard, or difarm his Men, breathed out his Mind once,  more in this Manner, with a Sigh. Captain Smith, / never ufe any Werowance fo kindly as  yourfelf; yet from you I receive the leaji Kindnefs of any.  Captain Newport gave me Swords, Copper, Cloaths, or  whatever elfe I. dejired, ever accepting what I offered him ;  and would fend away his Guns, when requejied. No one refufes to lie at my Fegt, or do, what I demand, but you only.  Of you I can have nothing, but what you value not, and yet  you will have, whatfoever you pleafe. Captain Newport you  call Father, and fo you call me ; but I fee, in fpite of us both,  you will do, what you will, and we muji both Jiudy to humour  and content you. But if you intend fo friendly, as you fay,  fend away your Arms. For you fee, my undefigning Simplicity  and Friendjhip caufe me, thus nakedly, to forget myfelf. The Prefident, perceiving this Barbarian only trifled the  Time to cut his Throat, refolved to treat him in his owi}  Way. He therefore procured the Indians to break the Ice,  that his Boat might come, to fetch him and his Corn ; and  at the fame Time, gave Order for more Men to come afliore, to furprife the King, In the mean while, to protrail the Time, he endeavoured to entertain him with much  fpecious and fallacious Difcourfe ; promifing, the next Day  to quit his Arms, and to fhew, by truflring to his Word,  that he loved and confided in him, as a Father. But whilft  the Ice was breaking, Powhatan conveyed himfelf away,  with his Women, Children, and Luggage. Yet to avoid  Sufpicion, he left two or three of his Women talking with  the Prefident, whilft he fecretly ran oiF, and his Men as fecretly  Book II. The History of VIRGINIA. fecretly befet the Houfe. Which being prefently difcovered, the Prefident iflued forth, with his Piftol, Sword, and "  Target. At his firft Shot, thofe, next him, tumbled one 7'^" Smith  over another ; and the reft fled nimbly off, fome one Way,  fome another. And thus, without any Hurt, only accompanied with Mr. John Rujfel^ he reached the main Body  of his Men. But when the Indians perceived him fo well  efcaped, they ufed their utmoft Art, to excufe and diffemble the Matter. Powhatan fent him a great Bracelet and  Chain of Pearl by an ancient Orator, who told him, that  their Emperor was fled for Fear of his Guns : That knowing, when the Ice was open, there would come more Men  afhore, he had fent thofe Numbers, whom he had aflaulted,  only to guard his Corn from being ftole, which might happen without the Prefident's Knowledge : That altho' fome  were hurt by his Miftake, yet Powhatan was ftillhis Friend,  and for ever would continue fo. And he delired, fince the  Ice was open, that he would fend away his Corn ; and if  he expected his Company, that he would alfo fend away  his Guns, which fo frighted his People, that they were  afraid to bring in their Corn, as he had promifed they  fhould. And then Baflcets being provided for the Englijh^  to carry their Corn to the Boats, thofe Indians kindly offered their Service, to guard their Arms, left they fhould be  ftolen. There was a great Number of goodly, well-proportioned Fellows, painted and grininied, like Devils. But  the very Sight of the Englijh cocking their Matches, and  being ready to charge, made them quit their Bows and Arrows, at Command, to the Guard, and carry down the  Corn upon their Backs. And there was no Occafion to  importune them, to make Difpatch. But Powhatan and the Germans were ftill eager to have  the Head of Captain Smith. For if they could but kill him,  they thought, all would be their own. And therefore, the  Englijh being ftaid by the Ebb till late within Night, the  King fpent his Time in making ready his Forces, to furprife the Houfe and him at Supper. But Pocahontas^ in a  very dark and difmal Night, came alone through the Woods,  and told the Prefident, that great Cheer would be fent them  foon ; but that Powhatan^ with all the Power, he could  make, would come after to kill them all, if thofe, who  brought the Vidluals, could not effeft it with their own  Arms, while they were at Supper. And therefore, as they  tendered their Lives, fhe advifed them to be' gone. The  Prefident would have given her fuch Things, as he knew,  fhe delighted in. But, with Tears running down her  Qheeks, fhe refufed them ; faying, fhe durft not be feen to  " have  The History of VIRGINIA. Book II. have any of them. For fliould her Father know it, it  'would be certain and immediate Death to her. And fo fhe  John Smith ^^n away, by herfelf, as flie came. Within lefs than an  Prefidcnt. ^^^^ ^^^^^^ ^^^^ gjgjjt ^j. (£„ jufty Fellows, with large Platters of Venifon and other Viduals ; and they were very  importunate with the Englijh, to put out their Matches j  pretending, their Smoke made them fick. But the Prefident made them tafte of every Difli ; and then fent fome of  them back to Powhatan, to bid him make Hafte ; for he  was ready for his coming. Soon after came more Meffengers, to fee what News ; and not long after them, others.  And thus was the Time fpent, with equal Vigilancy on both  Sides, but without any farther Hurt. At high Water, the  Englijh departed ; but to oblige Powhatan, they left him,  at his Requeft, Edward Brynton, to kill him Fowl, and  the Germans, who were yet unfufpedled, to finifli his Houfe. They had no fooner fet Sail, but Powhatan returned,  and fent two of the Germans to "James-Tarwn. They pretended to Captain Wynne, that all things were well, and  that the Prefident had Occafion for their Arms; and therefore they defired new ones, with fome fpare Tools, and  fhift of Apparel ; all which were readily granted them.  During their loitering there, by the Promife of Powhatar^s  Favour, and of an Exemption from the Miferies, which  would certainly happen to the Colony, they drew over to  their Confederacy fix or feven more, fuch expert Thieves,  as prefently furniflied them with fifty Swords, eight Mufkets, eight Pikes, and Powder and Shot ; which were  fpeedily conveyed away, by Indians at Hand for that Purpofe. The other German Powhatan kept, as a Pledge ;  whofe Diligence provided him with three hundred Tomahauks, or Indian Hatchets. In the mean time, Edward  Brynton and Thomas Savage, feeing the Germans fo diligent  to accommodate the Indians with Arms, attempted to make  their Efcape to James-Town. But they were apprehended  and brought back, and expeded, every Minute, to be put  to Death. The Prefident and the reft, being arrived at Pamunkey,  were entertained fome Days by the King, with great Feafting and Mirth. The Day, appointed to begin their Trade,  he went afhore with Lieutenant Percy, Mr, Pf^eji, Mr.  Russel, Mr. Behethland, Mr. Crojhaw, Mr. Piwuel, Mr.  Ford, and others to the Number of fifteen ; and going up  to Opechancanough'% Houfe, a Quarter of a Mile from the  River, they found nothing but a lame Fellow and a Boy,  and all the Houfes round abandoned, and ftripped of every  thing. They ftaid not long, before the King came, and after Book II. The History of VIRGINIA. 91 after him feveral of his People, loaded with Bows and.Ar- 1609.  rows. But their Commodities were fo trifling, and thofe"— -v- — '  held at fuch a Rate, that the Prefident began with the^*"^""'*  King, and faid : That the Profeflions of his Tongue were " ™^  proved by his Aftions to be mere Deceit : That laft Year  he kindly freighted his Veffel ; but had how treacheroufly  invited him, with a View to famifh and deftroy him : That  as the King was not ignorant of his Wants, fo neither was  he of the King's Plenty ; of which, by fome Means, he  muft have Part. And he told him, it was highly proper •  and decent for Kings, above all others, to keep their Promife. And therefore, fliewing his Commodities, he offered  him his Choice, and the refl:, he faid, he would proportion  in fit Bargains for his People. Opechancanough feemed kindly to accept his Offer ; and the better to colour his Defigns,  fold them, what they had, at their own Price ; promifing,  the next Day, more Company, better provided. The next Day, the Prefident, with the fame fifteen,  mairched up to the King's Houfe, where they found four  or five Men, newly arrived, with each a great Bafket.  Soon after came the King ; and putting on a ftrained Chearfulnefs, he entertained them in Difcourfe, about the great  Pains he had been taking, to keep his Promife ; till Mr.  Rujfel brought in News, that at leafl feven hundred Indians, well armed, had invironed the Houfe, and befet the  Fields. The Prefident, feeing fome of the Company greatly difmaid at the Thought of fuch a Multitude, told them:  That he was lefs concerned at the Danger and Number of  the Enemy, than at the malicious Reprefehtations, which  the Council, and their open mouthed Minions, would make  to England, of his breaking the Peace : That he, alone,  was once aflaulted by three hundred ; and had it not been  for an Accident, would have made his Way good among  them all : That they were now fixteen, and the Enemy  but feven hundred at the moft. And therefore he defired  them, to fight like Men, and not die like Sheep. For if  they dared to follow his Example, and to do, as he did,  he doubted not, by God's Afliftance, to extricate them out  of the prefent Difficulty and Danger. The Time not permitting any Argument, they all chearfully vowed, to execute, whatever he attempted, or die. But that they might  not fight for nothing, or be even ruined and ftarved by  their Viftory, the Prefident told Opechancanough : That he  faw his Plot to murder hirn, but he feared it not : That  their Men had done no Harm, but by their Dire£tions :  That therefore, if each of his Men would bring a Bafket  of Corn, he would ftake againfl it the Value in Copper, and  'fjbe History of VIRGINIA, Book II. and they two would go over into the Ifland, in the River,  'againft that Place,.and decide the Matter "by fingle Combat :  >*» Smith xhat he fhould have his Choice, and all Advantage of WeaPrefident. ^^^^ . ^^^^ ^j^^^ jjjg Conqueror fhould have all, and be Lord and Mafter over all their Men. But duelling in fair and open Field is not the Manner  of the Indians. Their chief Valour confifts in way-laying  and murdering the unfufpedling and unprovided, or perhaps  the weak and helplefs. Neither had Opechancanough fuch  ■ Regard for the Lives of his Subjefts, as to fave them from  Danger, at the Hazard of his own. He therefore kindly  endeavoured to appeafe the Prefident's Anger and Sufpicion,  by a Prefent at the Door, which he intreated him to accept. This was only to draw him out, where the Bait  was guarded with two hundred Men, befides thirty, which  lay behind a great Tree, fallen acrofs, with each his Arrow notched, ready to flioot. But the Prefident, having  difcovered the Treachery, feifed the King, in the Midft of  his Men, by his long Lock of Hair, and prefented his Piftol, ready cocked, to his Breaft. Thus he led him, trembling and half dead with Fear, among his People ; who  were eafily induced to throw down their Arms, and to deliver the King's Vambrace, Bow, and Arrows ; little  dreaming, that any one durft to ufe their King in that Manner. And now Opechancanough., to refcue himfelf, bellowed his Prefents in ferious Sadnefs ; and his Subjedls, being  upbraided and threatened by the Prefident in a fmart and  angry Speech, mixed with fome Expreffions of Love and  Confidence, caft away their Bows and Arrows, and Men,  Women, and Children, brought in their Commodities.  For two or three Hours, they fo thronged and wearied him,  that he retired into the Houfe to reft, leaving others to  trade, and receive their Prefents. Whilft he was afleep,  fifty of their choice Men, with each an Englijh Sword or  Club in his Hand, and feconded by two or three hundred  more, prefled into the Houfe to murder him. But the Prefident, being waked from his Sleep, by the Noife of the  People and Ihaking of the Houfe, betook himfelf to his  Arms, together with Mr. Crojhaw and fome others ; which  foon made them throng back, fafter than they came. But  Opechancanough and fome of his Ancients, who were kept  Prifoners with him, endeavoured, in a long Oration, to  excufe this Intrufion. The reft of the Day was fpent with  much Kindnefs, the Indians renewing their Prefents, and  feafting the Englijh with their beft Provifions. While thefe things were tranfafting, there happened  an unlucky Accident at the Fort. Mr. Scrivener had received Book II. "The History of VIRGINIA. 93 ceived Letters from England^ which gave him towering i6o9- Thoughts, and made him decline entirely in his AfFeftion and ^"- — t ' Friendfhip to Captain Smith, who ftill regarded and loved ^''*" **"''*  him, as his Brother. This made him more headftrong and  conceited, than was naturally confiftent with his Prudence  and Moderation. And having taken it into his Head to vifit  Hog-IJlamd, he could- not be turned from it, by the Advice  and repeated Entreaties of Captain Waldo and feveral others.  Therefore, taking with him Cgptain Waldo, who was not  to be abfent from the Fort, but to be ready to fecond the  Prefident, if called for, and Mr. Anthony Gofneld, a very  worthy, honeft, and induilrious Gentleman, and Brother  to Captain Bartholomew Gofnold, with eight others, he  went into the SkifF. She was fo overloaded, that flie fcarce  could have lived in calm Weather ; but, in that cold and  boifterous Day, fhe funk, none knowing how or where,  and all aboard were drowned. To advertife the Prefident  of this heavy News, none could be got, till Mr. Richard  Wyjffin undertook it alone. He was encountered with many  Dangers and Difficulties, in all Places, as he palTed. And  at Werowocomoco, not finding the Prefident, and perceiving  fuch Preparations for War, he was certainly aflured, that  fome Mifchief was intended. But Pocahontas hid him for  a Time, and fent thofe, who purfued him, the quite contrary Way. At length, by her. Means and extraordinary  Bribes and Trouble, in three Days Travel, he found the  Prefident at Pamunkey, in the Midft of thofe Broils and  Difficulties. The Prefident, having fworn him to conceal  this unhappy News from the Company, and diflembling  his Sorrow with the beft Countenance, he could, went  fafely aboard at -Night, and left Opechancanough at Liberty,  according to his Promife, and likewife with a Defign, the  better to entrap Powhatan in his Return. Soon after, he went  down the River, having fearched the Countries of Toughtanund (now Pamunkey River) and Mattapon^ ; where the  poor Creatures imparted the little Corn, they had, with  fuch Complaints, and Tears from the Eyes of Women and  Children, as fully fatisfied, and moved them with Compaffion. Powhatan had threatened Death to his Men, if they did  not, by fome Means or other, kill Captain Smith. But  they hated fighting with him, almost as bad as hanging.  And the Prefident, on his Side, was as eager, to furprife  and take that fubtle and perfidious Barbarian. Therefore,  in his Way down the River, there were many Feints and  Strategems, on both Parts, but without any remarkabl Effe<ft. Only the Prefident, with Mr. Wejl and fome others, would  rh^ History of VIRGINIA. Book II. would have been poifoned, had their Art been equal to -their Will. It only made them Sick, and fo worked itfelf y»bn Smith qS^ And thus, through many Dangers and Difficulties, Prefident. ^j^^^ returjied to James-Town ; where they delivered, near 200 lbs. of Deer's Suet, and 479 Bufhels of Corn, to the Cape-Merchant. At James-Touin they found nothing done, but their Provifions fpent, and a great Part of their Tools and Arms  conveyed to the Indians. But altho' what was left by the  Ship was fo rotten with the Rain, and fo mangled' by the  Rats and Worms, that the Hogs would fcarcely eat it, yet  upon calling up their Store, they found a fufficient Provifion for the Year. Wherefore, the Fear of ftarving being  laid afide, the Company was ranged into proper Divifions,  and fix Hours each Day fpent in Work, the reft in Paftime and merry Exercifes. And the Prefident, having called them together, told them: That their late Experience  and Mifery were fufficient to perfuade every one to a prefent Amendment: TJiat they muft not think, that either  his Pains, or the Adventurers Purfes, would for ever maintain them in Sloth and Idlenefs : That he knew, many deferved more Honour, and a better Reward, than was yet  tp be had ; but that far the greateft Part of them muft be  more induftrious, or ftarve : That it was not reafonable,  that the Labours of thirty or forty honeft and induftrious  Men fhould be confumed, to maintain an hundred and fifty  Loiterers : and. That therefore every one, that would not  work, ftiould not eat : That they had often been* fcreened  and protefted, in their Difobedience to his juft and neceffary  Commands, by the Authority of the Council : But that  now, all being either dead or gone, except Captain Wynne  and himfelf, that whole Power refted, in Effe<ft, folely in  him. And therefore, he advifed them, not to feed themfelves up with the vain Prefumption, that his Authority was  but a Shadow, and that his Life muft anfwer for theirs.  For the Letters Patent, and other Powers, would prove  the contrary, and fliould, every Week, be read to them ;  and every one, that offended, might afluredly expe<ft his  due Puniftiment. He alfo made a Table, as a publick Memorial of each Man's Deferts, to encourage the Good, and  to fpur on the reft by Shame. By this, many became very  induftrious; but more were driven to their Bufiness, by  Punifhment, and the Prefident's extraordinary Vigor and  Diligence. As they came down Pamunkey {^\Ticc called. 2^«r/f River)  off of Werowocomoco, the Prefident had fent Mr. Chrojhaw  and Mr. Ford to James-Town, by Land. In their Way, they  Book II. I'he History of VIRGINIA. they met four or five of the German's Confederates, going  to Powhatan ; who to clear themfelves from thofe Gentlemens Sufpicion, that they were running to the Indians, re- 5'"*" *»"''*  turned with them to the Fort, and there continued. But " "**"'"  the Germans, to know the Reafon of their Stay, fent one  of their Company, a ftout young Fellow, difguifed like an  Indian, to the Glafs-houfe. This ftood in the Woods,  about a Mile from James-Town, and was the common  Place of Rendezvous for all their fecret Villany. The Prefident, hearing of this, immediately fent to apprehend this  German. But he being gone, he difpatched twenty good  Shot after, to intercept him in his Return to Powhatan.  They foon brought him back, and notwithftanding his fair  Tale and plaufible Excufes, he was 'thrown into Prifon.  However the Prefident fpared his Life, hoping thereby to  regain his Countrymen. Captain Smith, having fent all his Men after the  German, returned from the Glafs-houfe alone, armed only  with a Faucheon. In his Way he met the King of Pafpahey, z .Man of great Strength and gigantic Stature. At  firfl, he endeavoured to draw the Prefident into his Ambufcade ; but failing in that, he attempted to fhoot him.  But Smith, to prevent it, clofed in and grappled with him.  And the Indian, l^ mere Dint of Strength, bore him into  the River, with a Defign to drown him. Long they ftruggled in the Water, till the Prefident got fuch Hold of his  Throat, that he almoft ftrangled him. And then, having  difengaged himfelf, fo as to draw his Faucheon, the poor  Savage begged his Life, in fuch a pitiful Manner, that he  led him to James-Town, and put him into Chains, where  he continued for fome time, till by the Negligence of his  Keepers, he efcaped. Some Endeavours were ufed to retake him, but, without EfFe£l: ; only the Prefident took two  Indians Prifoners, Kemps and Tujfore, the two mofl exquifite Villains in all the Country. Thefe Men would have  betrayed both King and Kindred for a Piece of Copper }  and had Captain Wynne and Lieutenant Percy, who were  fent upon the Bufinefs with fifty Men, followed their Dirediiions, they would certainly have regained the King, and  been fully revenged for the Injury and Aflault. However,  that this might not encourage them to farther Boldnefs,  they attacked and flew fevera' of the Nation, burnt their  Houfes, took their Canoes and fifliing Weirs, and planted  fome of them at James-Town, and were refolved to profecute them with War, till they were fully humbled and  fubdued. Not  The History of VIRGINIA. Book II. Not long after, the Prefident, pa-fling by Pafpahey in  'in his Way to Chickahominy^ was affaulted by them. But  John Smith ^g fogn 35 thcy kncw him, they all threw down their Arms,  Prefident. ^^j ^^^j ^^^ Peace. Their Spokefman was a lufty young  Fellow, named Okaning, whofe Difcourfe well deferves to  be remembered. He told the Prefident, that the King, his  Mafter, was there prefent in the Company: That they  took him for Captain Wynne, who purfued them in  War, altho' they had never injured him : That if the King  offended him in efcaping from Prifon, he ought to confider,  that the Fiflies fwim, the Fowls fly, and the very Beafts  ftrive to efcape the Snare and live : That therefore, his  Mafter, who was a Man, ought not to be blamed, for  following this neceffary Inftinft of Nature even in brute  Animals. He reminded him of the Pains, his Mafter  took, to fave his Life, when a Prifoner ; and if he had fince  injured him, he was compelled to it, and it had however  been already fully revenged, to their too great Lofs. And  he further told him, if he ftill perfifted in his Refolution to  deftroy them, they muft abandon their Habitation, and fettle fomewhere beyond his Reach ; which would only coft  them more Labour, but would be of worfe Confequence  to the Englijb, who could not well fubfift without their  Corn and Fruits. And therefore he earneftly entreated him  to grant them his Friendftiip, and to permit them to enjoy  their Houfes, and plant their Fields, in Peace and Security.  Concluding, that if he would promife them Peace, they  would truft to his Word ;*but if he proceeded in his Revenge, they would quit the Country. Whereupon the  Prefident promifed them Peace, if they would do no farther Injury, and would bring in Provifions to the Fort.  To which they joyfully agreed, and parted good Friends,  and fo continued, till Smith left the Country. Soon after this, an Indian, who had been imprifoned  at James-Town for Theft, had fo ftifled himfelf, by a Charcoal Fire in a clofe Room of the Prifon, that he feemed to  be dead. But the Prefident, by the Application of Vinegar  and Aqua-vita, brought him to himfelf, which was foon  fpread abroad among the Indians, throughout the whole  Country, as a Miracle ; and it was generally believed, that  Captain Smith could raife a dead Man to Life. And another  at Werowocomoco, having ^ a large Bag of Powder, to  fhew his extraordinary Skill among his Companions, dried  it on the Back of an Armour, as he had feen the Soldiers  at James-Town do. Many ftood peeping over, to fee his  Skill ; till at laft it took Fire, and blew him, with one or  two more, to Death, and fo fcorched and mangled the reft, that Book II. The History of VIRQINIA. 97 that it raifed a vaft Dread and Aftoniftiment in, them, and "6°9'  a .great Adniiration of the Power and Art of the Englijh. '"-"v — ^  Thefe, with fome other Accidents, fo frighted and amazed ^''*" ^'""*  Powhatan and his People, that they flocked frqm all Parts, '"' °" '  and with "Prefents defired Peace ; • returning many ftolen  Things, which had never been demanded, or thought of, by  the Bnglijh. And ever after, during the Remainder of Capt.  Smith's Adminiftration, both Powhatan and his People would  fend back to ytimesr-Town fuch, as had been taken fteaUng, to  receive fheir Punifliment ; and the whole Country became  as abfolutely free and fafe to the Englijh, as to themfelves. And now the Colony purfued their Ijulinefs with Alacrity and Succefs. They made three or four Laft of Tar,  Pitch, and Soap-Afhes } produced a Trial of Glafs ; fimk  a Well in the Fort, of excellent Water, which till then  was wanting ; built about twenty Houfes ; new-coyered  the Church ; provided Nets and Weirs for fifliing ; and to  ftop the Diforders of the Thieves and Indians, they built a  Block-houfe in the Neck of the Ifland, to receive the Trade  of the Indians ; and none, neither Indian nor Chriftian, was  • fuffered tq pafs or repafs, without the Prefident's Order,  Thirty or forty Acres of Ground were broke up and planted.  Of three Sows, in eighteen Months, increafed fixty odd  Pigs i and near five hundred Chickens brought up themfelves, without having any thing given thern. But the  Hogs were tranfported to Hog-Ifland 5 where alfo was built  3 Block-houfe, with a Garrifon, to giye Notice of any  Ships ; and for theif Ejcercife at Jeifure. Tjjnqs, they made  Clapboard and Wainfcpt. In this Tjnie, died Captain  Wynne ; fo that the Government devolved \yholly upon the  Prefident, as it had before in Effeft done, by his having  two Voices in the Council. But this Flow of Plenty and Profperity lafted not long.  For, upon Examination, they found half their Corn rotten,  and the reft confumed by Rats ; which, coming originally  from the Ships, had increafed to incredible Multitudes. So  that all Works were intermitted, ajid, the People fufficiiently  employed to get Provifions. But at firft, the Indians, to  exprefs their Love, brought in an hundred a Day, at leaft,  of Squirrels, Turkies, Deer, arid other wild Beafts ; and  Powhatan fpared them near half his Stock of Corn. But  the Prefident was neverthelefs obliged to detach fixty or  eighty dpw« the River, to live upon Oyfters. Twenty  were fent to the Falls with Mr. PTeJi j and as n>ai^ more  with Lieutenant Percy to Point Comfort, to try for a Fijliery,  But he being very fick, and forely burnt yi^ith Gun-ppwder,  they would not agree in fix Weeks, once to caft out their  16 H Net.  i:he History of VIRGINIA. Book IL Net. Many were billetted among the Indians, who knew,  . 'that they had fuch a commanding Power at James-Town,  >A» 5wVi that they durft not wrong them in the leaft. And in all  Prefident. ^j^j^ ^.^^^ ^f Qiftrefs, they caught more Sturgeon than  could be devoured by Man and Dog. This the induftrious, drying and pounding, would mingle with Caviare,  Sorrel, and wholefome Herbs, and make Bread and good  Meat. Others would gather as much Tuckahoe Root in  a Day, as would make them Bread for a Week. So that,  upon thefe wild Produds, and what they caught,*the deligent lived very well and plentifully. Yet fuch was the infufFerable Sloth and unreafonable  Perverfenefs of far the greater Number, that they would  fooner have periflied, than have been at the Pains to gather  Food. And they were even importunate with the Prefident, to fell their Tools and Iron, nay, their Swords and  Firelocks, and their very Houfes and Ordinance, to the,  Indians for this Trafti. And they took Occafion from hence,  in a very turbulent and clamorous Manner, to infift on the  Neceffity of leaving the Country. But the Prefident, having puniflied one of the worft and moft feditious among  them, called the reft together, and reprefented to them the  extreme Folly and Iniquity of their Proceedings. And he  told them, that if any more were found attempting to run  away to Newfoundland with the Bark, they might affuredly  expe£t the Gallows, as their Fate : That he never had more  from the Store than the worft of them ; for they well knew  and faw, that his extraordinary Allowance, as Prefident,  was conftantly diftributed among the Sick : and. That fince  he found, Neceffity had not Power to force them to gather  the Fruits of the Earth, he was refolved, that they fhould  gather, not only for themfelves, but alfo for the Sick ; and  that whofoever would not gather, every Day, as much, as  he himfelf did, fhould, the next Day, be fet beyond the River, and banifhed from the Fort, as a Drone. This Order  raifed a great Clamour and Outcry ; but it made moft of  them beftir themfelves fo well, that they had Plenty of Food  to eat, and continued very healthy and ftrong. Yet many  of them, imderftanding, how well they were ufed, that  were billetted among the Indians, ran away to Kemps and  Tujfore, their old Prifoners. But Kemps firft made himfelf  Sport with them, fhewing his Countrymen, how he  was ufed, when a Prifoner, and feeding them upon this  Condition, that they, who would not work, fhould not eat ;  and then he carried them back, by Force, to the Prefident.  This deterred many others, who intended to follow ; and  made them content, rather to labour at home, than venture among Book II. rke History of VIRGINIA. 99 amofig the Indians, For the Kings, and better Sort of that i6o9- People, were fo afraid, or fo friendly, that when the En-^ — v ' glijh puniftied fome of their bafer Sort with great Severity, J'^" ^""''*  they would hire them, not to tell it to their Kings or  Countrymen ; left they fhould punifh them again, and fend  them to yames-Totvn, to give full Satisfadtion to the Prefident. About this time, Mr. Sicklemore returned from Chawonock ; but without any Information of Sir Walter Ralegh's  loft Company, or fatisfa<Sory Account of the Silk-grafs.  And the Prefident, to purfue a Point, thought fo neceflary  by the Council in England, fent off Mr. Nathaniel Powel  and Anas Todiill, to the Mangoags, a Nation of Indians,  not fubjeft to Powhatan, dwelling on the upper Branches  of Nottoway, or fome fmall Streams of Roanoke River. He  obtained Guides from the King of the ^uiyoughquohanocks,  a fmall Nation of Indians, feated on the South Side of "James  River, about ten Miles above James-Town. This good  King did ever affedt the Englijh above all others ; and altho' he was very zealous to his falfe Gods, yet he confeffed, that the Englijh God as much exceeded his, as their  Guns did his Bow and Arrows ; and in Time of Drought,  he would often fend Prefents to Captain Smith, to pray  to his God for Rain. His Guides conduced Powel and  Todkill, three Days Journey, into a high Country, towards  the South-Weji ; where they faw, here and there, a Cornfield, by fome little Spring or fmall Brook, but no large  River. The People were,' in all Refpefts, like the reft,  except their Language. They lived chiefly by hunting, and  on Fruits and Roots ; and they trafficked their Skins with  thofe towards the Sea and fatter Countries, for dried Fifli  and Corn. But neither did they here, or ever after, hear  any thing of this Colony, left by Mr. White, in the Ye^1587, on one of the Iflands oi Hatteras. All this while, they employed one William Volday, a  Zwitzer, by Promifes and Pardons to reclaim his Countrymen, the Germans, and one Bentley, another Fugitive. But  this vile Hypocrite, pretending highly to deteft their Villany, hereby got an Opportunity, to convey them every  thing, they wanted, to efFe<9: their Projects, and deftroy  the Colony. With much Devotion they looked for the  Spaniard, to whom they were willing and intended to do  good Service. And finding, the Englijh were obliged to  difperfe themfelves to gather Food, they importuned Powhatan to lend them his Forces ; and they undertook, not  only to deftroy the Hogs, fire the Town, and feize on the  Bark, but to bring moft of the Colony to his Service . and  Subjediion. This Scheme was communicated to many of  their Confederates at the Fort ; but two, whofe Hearts re- H 2 lented loo The History of VIRGINIA. Book II. 1609^. lented at the Horror of the A<a, revealed it to the Prefi'-*-~Y--'-^ dent. He ordered them to keep it ftill a Secret, and to  Jobv Smith draw them into fuch Ambufcades, as he had prepared.  Prefident. g^^ ^^^ ^.j^j^^ taking Air, and coming to the Ears of the  impatient Multitude, they were outrageous to go and deftroy them immediately. Lieutenant Percy and Mr. John  Codrington^ two Gentlemen of high and refolute Spirits,  offered their Service, to go to Werowocomoco^ and td cut  their Throats before the Face of Powhatm. Biil the Prefident cared not to hazard fuch Perfons^ for whom he had  other Employment ; and gave Way to Mr. Wyffin and Serjeant Jeffery Abboty to undertake the Matter. But the  Germans fo blinded Jbbot^ with a fair Tale^ that he relentfed ; and Wyffin^ th6' willing, cared not to attempt it alone.  When Powhatan underftood theil- Bufinefs^ he fent immediately to the Prefident, to inform him, that he neither detained them, nor hindered his Men from executing his  Command. For he neither did, nor would, maintain them,  or any other, to his Difpleafure. But altho' thefe treacherous Foreigners did all-, they could, to faife and incenfe  Powhatan and the Indians againft the Englijh, yet fuch exa£t Intelligence had Captain Smith of their Plots, that their  Machinations were, his greatefl Adv^aiitage and Security!  And if aiiy Commotion had happened, he always had it m  l|is Power to take Revenge. For all the Country now ftood  rnore in Fear of him, than of Powhatan ; and he had fiich  Parties among the bordering Nations, that, out of Love or  Fear, they would have done any thing, he commanded'.  However, not long after, one of the 'Germans returned to  his Duty ; but the other ftill remained with Powhatan. Whilst thefe things were palling. Captain Samuel Arjgall arrived, who was afterwards an adiive Perfon here,  and a noted Governor of the Country. He came to truck  with the Colony, and to fifli for Sturgeon, with a Ship  well furniflied with Wine and other good Provifion. This  Was, at that Time, a prohibited Trade; but he being a  Kinfman to Sir Thomas Smith, the Treafurer, it was connived at and overlooked. The Neceflities of the Colony  obliged them to take his Provifions, by which his Voyage  was loft ; but they revi£tualled him, when their next Supply arrived, and fent him to England with a full Account of • •  the State of their Affairs. By this Ship, they received Letters, which taxed the Prefident for his hard Ufage of the  Natives, and for not returning the Ships freighted. And  now alfo, they firft had an Account of the Alterations in  England, and of the great Preparations and large Supply,  to be fent by the Lord Delawarr, appointed Captain-General and Governor in Chief of Virginia. THE 101  THE HISTORY OF  VIRGINIA. BOOK III.  H E Treafurer, Council, and Company in '^°9England^ were ftill intent upon prefent Gain, """ '  and gaping after the Mines of Mexico and J^^*"J™'* gSt; «K»,^^ Peru frqm their Difcovery ; and upon the  ^Hw^ laft Voyage, not finding that Profit and Return, they expe(fted, they were much difappointed and ©nragedw To this was added Newporfs Account of things, which was certainly not very favourable  to their Coedu£k and Management in Virginia. The Company therefore made Intereft to his Majefty, to grant them  a new Charter, which bears Date the 23d of May 1609,  and contains larger Powers and more ample Privileges, than  the former ; as may be feen in the Original, printed at  large in the Appendix. By this Charter the Power and Authority of the Prefident and Council in Virginia were exprefly abrogated ; and they were ftreightly commanded,  upon their Allegiance, to pay Obedience to fuch Governor or  Governors, as Ihould be appointed by the Council in England.  In Confequence of which Power, the Council conftituted  Sir Thomas Weft., Lord Delawarr, Captain-General of Virgi/nia ; Sir Thomas Gates., his Lieutenant-General ; Sir  George Somers, Admiral j Captain Newport, Vice-Admiral ;  Sir Thomas Dak, High-Marfhal ; Sir Ferdinando fVainman,  General of the Horfe ; and fo, many other Offices, to feveral worthy Gentlemen, for their Lives. H 3 This  i:he History of VIRGINIA. Book III. This new Charter was granted to the Earls of Salifbury, Suffolk, Southampton, Pembroke, and other Peers, to  John Smith ^^^g Number of twenty one; to the Honourable George  Prefident. ^^^^ ^^j Francis Weji, Efqrs; to Sir Humphrey Weld, Lord  Mayor of London, and ninety eight other Knights, exprefly named ; and to Dr. Matthew Sutcliffe, with a great  Multitude more, of Dotftors, Efquires, Gentlemen, Officers, Merchants, and Citizens, together with many Corporations and Companies of London. So many Perfons of  great Power, Intereft, and Fortune, engaging in the Enterprize, and the Lord Delawarr, with the other Gentlemen of Diftinftion, appointed to the feveral Offices, foon  drew in fuch large Sums of Money, that they difpatched  away Sir Thomas Gates, Sir George Somers, and Captain  Newport, with nine Ships, and five hundred People. Thefe  three Gentlemen had, each of them, a Commiffion, who  firft arrived, to call in the old. But becaufe they could not  agree for Place, it was concluded, that they fliould all go  in one Ship, called the Sea-Venture. They failed from England, the latter End of May 1609 ; but the 25th of July,  the Admiral-Ship was parted from the reft of the Fleet, by  the Tail of a Hurricane, having on board the three Commanders, an hundred and fifty Men, their new Commiffion, and Bills of Lading,, together with all Manner of Inftrucftions and Direftions, and the; beft Part of their Provifions. She arrived not, but was foundered on Bermudas,  as fhall be hereafter related. A fmall Catch likewife perifhed in the Hurricane ; but the feven other Ships came fafe.  In them, as Captains, came Ratcliffe (whofe right Name,  as is faid, was Sicklemore) Martin, and Archer, with Captain Wood, Captain Webbe, Captain Moon, Captain King,  Captain Davies, Mr. Ralph Hamer, and divers other Gentlemen, of good Fortune, and eminent Birth. The Prefident, being informed by his Scouts of the Arrival of this  Fleet, little dreamed of fuch a Supply, but fuppofed them,  at firft, to be Spaniards. He therefore put himfelf into the  beft Pofture of Defence, he could ; and being feconded by  the Indians (who, upon this Occafion, (hewed their Friendftiip, and prepared, with great Alacrity, to affift the Englijh with their utmoft Power) they thought themfelves /o  well provided for the Reception of an Enemy, that they  little feared their Coming. Ratcliffe, Martin, and Archer, had bred much Difturbance at Sea, and had paved the Way, for being even more  troublefome afhore. For they had infufed fuch Jealoufies  and Prejudices into the Company againft Captain Smith,  that they mortally hated him, before they had ever feen him. Book III. r-6^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. 103 him. But feveral of better Senfe and Experience among 1609. them, from their firft landing, hearing the general good ' ,— — ■ Report of his old Soldiers, and feeing the Prudence and Up- J'^" Smiih  rightnefs of his Actions, were foon undeceived, and faw "' *"'"  into the MaHce of Ratcliffe and his Faftion. They therefore left their Society, and ever adhered to Captain Smithy  as his firm and faithful Friends. But a great Part of this  new Company confifted of unruly Sparks, packed ofF by  their Friends, to efcape worfe Deftinies at home. And the  reft were chiefly made up of poor Gentlemen, broken  Tradefmen, Rakes and Libertines, Footmen, and fuch  others, as were much fitter to fpoil or ruin a Commonwealth, than to help to raife or maintain one. This lewd  Company therefore were led by their feditious Captains,  into many Mifchiefs and Extravagancies. They aflumed  to themfelves the Power of difpofing of the Government ;  and conferred it fometimes on one, and fometimes on another. To-day, the old Commiflion muft rule ; To-morrow,  the new ; and next Day, neither. So that, all was Anarchy and Diftraftion ; neither were there any Hopes, from  the -prefent Pofture of Affairs, but of the utmoft Mifery  and Confufion. The German alfo, that had returned to the Englijh,  feeing this diftrafted State of things, and hoping for fome  Advantage from it, fled again, with one of his Conforts,  to Powhatan ; to whom he promifed Wonders, at the Arrival of Lord Delawarr. But that fenfible Barbarian,  knowing the Wickednefs and Perfidy of their Nature, replied ; That they, who would have betrayed Captain  Smith to him, would certainly betray him to this great  Lord, to make their Peace. And fo, he ordered his Men,  to beat out their Brains. But Volday, the Zwitzer, made  a (hift to get to England; where purfuading the Merchants,  what rich Mines he had found, and what Services he would  do them, he was well rewarded, and fent back with the  Lord Delawarr. But being found a mere Impoftor, he died  in a moft contemned and miferable Manner. Captain Smith, all this Time of Turbulency and  Diftraftion, was iadly troubled and perplexed, how to proceed. At firft, finding his Authority thus unexpectedly  cancelled and changed, he refolved to leave all, and return  for England. But afterwards, feeing, there was little Hope  of the Arrival of this new Commiflion, and that tis own  was not legally fuperfeded, but by the adiual Produftion of  another, he determined to bear up, and to aft with Vigor  and Refolution. He therefore fet himfelf, with great Courage, and the perpetual Hazard of his Life, to oppofe this H 4 TorThe History of VIRGINIA. Book III. rent of Faaion and Immorality ; and at laft, fo far mafter, •'ed it, that he- caft RatcUffe, Archer, and the other Chiefs,  J„bn Smith into Prifon, till he had more Leifure, to bring them to a  Prefident. ^^j^ ^^^ j^g^j ^j.j^i_ ^nd the better to diffipate the Humours, and to break their Confederacies, he fent Mr. Wejt,  with an hundred and twenty, the beft, he could chufe, to  make a Settlement at the Falls ; and Martin, with near the  fame Number, to Nanfamond ; allowing each their due Proportion of all the Provifions, according to their Number.  And now the Year of his Prefidency being near expired, he  made Captain Martin, who was become more tradable,  Prefident in his Room. But Martin, knowing his own Infufficiency, and the People's Unrulinefs and little Regard  for him, within three Hours, refigned it again to Captain  Smith. For as Ratcliffe had been removed from the Council, and was not again reftored, Martin and Smith were the  only two then in the Country, that could either ele<ft, or be  ele<fted Prefident. And Martin, having thus wifely difengaged himfelf from an Office, which he was then no ways  able to execute or fupport, proceeded to make his Settlement at Nanfamond. That Nation, having been reduced to  Subjeftion and Contribution, ufed him kindly ; yet fuch  were his unreafonable Jealoufy and Fear, that he furprifed the  poor naked King, and his Monuments and Houfes, with  the Ifland, wherein he lived, and there fortified himfelf.  But the Indians, foon perceiving his Fear and Diftra£tion,  ventured to aflault him ; and they killed feveral of his Men,  feleafed their King, and gathered and carried off a thoufand  Bufhels of Corn ; whilft he, in the mean while, never once  offered to intercept them, but fent to the Prefident, then  at the Falls, for thirty Soldiers, 'rtiefe were prefently fent  him, from James-Town. But he fo employed them, that  they did nothing, and foon returned, complaining of his  Tendernefs and Cowardice. And he likewife, leaving his  Company to their Fortunes, came away with them to  fames-Town. The Prefident followed the other Company up to the  Falls, to fee them well feated. But he was furprifed, in  his Way, to meet Captain WeJi,{o foon returning to famesTown ; and he found the Settlement very inconfiderately  made, in a Place, not only liable to the River's Inundation,  but alfo fubjedt to many other intolerable Inconveniences.  To remedy which, he immediately fent to Powhatan, to  purchafe the Place, called Powhatan. The Conditions of  their Agreement were thefe : That the Englijh fhould defend him againft the Manakins : That he fliould refign to  them the Fort and the Houfes, with all that Country, for a Pro- Book III. The History of VIRGINIA. 105 Proportion of Copper : That all Thieves fhould be fent 1609.  thither, to receive their Puniftiment : That every Houfe, *•" — v— '  as a Cuftom, fliould pay the Prefident a Bufhel of Corn, 7'kn Smith  for an Inch fquare of Copper, and a certain Quantity of  Pocones to King fames, for their Proteftion : and. That  they fhould barter, what elfe they could fpare, at their beft  Difcretion. But Captain Weft's Company depended fo  much on the Lord General's new Commiffion, that they  regarded no Perfon or thing. And fuppofing the Manakins' Country reached to the South-Sea, and was all Gold,  they pleafed themfelves with thq vain Conceit, that it was  entirely under their Power and Command, and that none  fliould go thither, but whom they pleafed. They therefore  rejefted the Prefident with Infolence and Contempt. However he ventured, with five Men, to land among them ;  and committed the Heads of the Mutiny to Prifon, till, by  their Numbers, they obliged him to retire. In making off,  he happily furprifed one of theit Boats, with which he returned to the Ship ; and had not the Mariners proved very  tradable and faithful to him, he had. fmall Means and little  Probability of efcaping their Fury. The Indians alfo came to him; complaining, that he ,  had brought them, for Protedlors, worfe Enemies, than  the Manakins themfelves ; that they ftole their Corn, robbed their Gardens, broke open_ their Houfes, beat them,  and kept fev-eral in Prifon; and that, till then, they had  borne all this, out of Love to him, but defired Pardon, if  hereafter they defended themfelves. They Ukewife offered  him their Affiflance, and to fight for him againft them, if  he would lead them on. But having fpent nine Days, to  no Purpofe, in endeavouring to reclaim them, he departed  for fames-Town. The Ship was no fooner under Sail, but  twelve Indians affaulted thofe hundred and twenty in their  Fort. And finding many flraggling abroad in the Woods,  they killed fome, and fo frighted the reft, that their Countrymen in Prifon efcaped, and they went fafely off, with  the Swords and Cloaks of thofe, thsy had flain. But before  the Ship had failed half a League, flie grounded ; which  gave the Prefident an Opportunity of fummoning them^  once more, to a Parley. And now he found them fo  amazed with that filly Affault of the Indians, that they  furrendered themfelves, upon any Terms, to his Mercy.  He therefore laid fix or feven of the chief Offenders by the  Heels ; and feated the reft at Powhatan, the ftrongeft and  moft pleafant Place, he had feen in the Country ; and for  that Reafon, they called it Nonfuch. Here they had dry .  Houfes for Lodgings, near two hundred Acres of Land,  16 cleared  1'hg History of VIRGINIA. Book III. cleared and ready for planting, with a Savage Fort, ready ' built, and prettily fortified with Poles and Barks of Trees, yob« Smith and fufEcient to have defended them againft all the Indians Prefident. j^ the Country. He likewife appeafed the /«^/^«5, making Restitution and Satisfaftion, to each Party, for their former Loffes and Damages. And now, new Officers being appointed, and the Prefident ready to depart, juft at that Inftant arrived Captain  fFeJi; whofe gentle Nature was fo wrought on and abufed,  by Compaffiofi for the Prifoners, and the Perfuafions of the  Mutineers, who alledged, they had only done this for his Honour, that all things were again thrown into Confufion and  Mutiny. But the Prefident, having no Inclination to contend with Mr. TVeJi^ and little Power to curb their Infolence, left them to their Fortunes, and returned to JamesTown. And foon after they abandoned Nonfuch^ and went  back to their firft Settlement at WeJPs-Fort. But paffing down the River, as Captain Smith was  afleep in the Boit, his Powder-bag, by fome Accident, "was  fired; which tore the Flefli from his Body and Thighs,  nine or ten Inches fquare, in a moft dreadful Manner. To  quench the Fire, which fryed and tormented him in his  Cloaths, he leaped overboard, and was almoft drowned, before they could recover him. In this piteous State, he arrived at James'Town ; Where Ratdiffe, Archer., and the  reft of their Confederates, were foon to come to their  Trials. But their guilty Confciences mifgiving them, and  feeing the Prefident unable to ftand, and almoft bereft of  his Senfes by reafon of his Torment, they entered into a  Confpiracy to Murder him in his Bed. But his Heart failed  him, who was to have ^iven Fire to the Piftol. And fo,  being difappointed in this Purpofe, they joined together, to  ufurp the Government, and thereby efcape their Punifliment. In the mean time, the Prefident's old Soldiers, being provoked, beyond all Patience, at their Malice and Sedition, flocked to him, and importuned him to give them  but the Word, and they would fetch the Heads of the boldeft among them, that durft refift his Commands. Yet he  would not fufFer them to bring the Matter to a civil Broil ;  but fent immediately for the Matters of the Ships, and took  Order with them for his Return to England. For there  was neither Chirurgeon nor Chirurgery at the Fort ; and  his Wounds were fo grievous, and Torments fo cruel, that  few expefted, he could live. And he likewife highly refented, and was much chagrined, to fee his Authority fuppreffed, he knew not why ; himfelf and his Soldiers to be  rewarded for their paft Labours and Dangers, he knew not how ;  Book HI. The History of VIRGINIA. how ; and a new Commiffion granted, to they knew not  whom. And befides, he found himfelf unable to follow his '  Bufmefs, fupprefs thofe Facftions, and range the Country 7'^" Smith  for Provifions, as he before intended. And he well knew,  that his own Prefence and Atftjvity were as requifite in thofe  AiFairs, as his Advice and Direftions. For all which Reafons, he refolved upon leaving the Country, and went prefently on board one of the Ships. Captain P^rcy had been, for fome time, in a very The Hon.  bad State of Health, and had taken his Paflage in" one of the GeargcPmy  Ships, to go -to England. But now, upon Smith's Depar-^J' "°^""  ture, many came about him, and by Intreaties and Perfualions, prevailed with him to ftay, and take upon him the  Government. But there" were many others up in Arms,  calling themfelves Prefidents and Counfellors ; feverai of  which began now to fawn upon and follicite Smithy to give  up his Commiffion to them. And after much ado, and  many bitter Repulfes, that their Ruin and Confufion might  not be attributed to him, for leaving the Country without •  a Commiffion, he permitted it to be ftolen, but never could  be induced to refign it into fuch vile Hands. In which he  feems" to have been fomething froward and peevifli. For  iince the old Soldiers, and better Sort of new Comers, had  generally agreed" upon Captain Percy for their Governor, a  Perfon every way fit for the Office, except in Point of  Health, it would have been but reafojiable in him, to have  endeavoured to confirm "him in his Authority, and when  he departed, to have delivered up his Commiffion to him. And thus, about Michaelmas 1609, Captain Smith left  the Country, never again to fee it. He left behind him  three Ships and feven Boats ; Commodities ready for Trade j  the Corn newly gathered ; ten Weeks Provifion in the  Store ; four hundred ninety and odd Perfons ; twenty four  Pieces of Ordinance ; three hundred Mufkets, with other  Arms and Ammunition, more than fufficient for the Men ;  the Indians, their Language, and Habitations, well known  to an hundred trained and expert Soldiers ; Nets for fifhing ;  Tools, of all Sorts, to. work ; Apparel, to fupply their  Wants ; fix Mares and a Horfe ; five or fix hundred Hogs 5  as many Hens and Chickens ; with fome Goats, and fome  Sheep. For whatever had been brought, or bred here, ftill  remained. But this feditious and diftradted Rabble, regarding not any thing, but from Hand to Mouth, riotoufly  confumed, what there was ; and took Care for nothing,  but to colour and make out fome Complaints againft Captain Smith. For this End, the Ships were ftaid three  Weeks, at a great Charge, till they could produce and bring io8 r>&^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book III. '609- bring them to bear. But, notwithftanding their perverfe ' .^ ■ Humours and unreafonable Clamours, Captain Smith was The Hon. undoubtedly a Perfon of a very great and generous Way of  E^^Gover^ thinking, and full of a high Idea of the publick Good and  nor! his Country's Honour. To his Vigor, Induftry, and un- daunted Spirit and Refolution, the Eftablifliment and firm  Settlement of this Colony was certainly owing ; and therefore it may not be unacceptable to the Reader, to have  fome farther Account of his Perfon and Aftions. And this  we are enabled to do the more authenticly, as he hath himfelf, at the Requeft of Sir Robert Cotton^ the famous Antiquarian, left a brief Relation of his principal Travels and  Adventures. H E was born a Gentleman, to a competent Fortune, at  Willoughby in Lincolnjhire, in the Year 1579. From his  very Childhood, he had a roving and romantic Fancy, and  was ftrangely fet upon performing fome brave and adventurous Atchievement. Accordingly, being about thirteen  Years of Age at Schdt>l, he fold his Satchel and Books, and  all, he had, to raife Money, in order to go fecretly beyond  Sea. But his Father dying juft at that Time, he was flopped for the prefent, and fell into the Hands of Guardians,  more intent on improving his Eftate, than him. However,  at fifteen, in the Year 1594, he was bound to a Merchant  at Lynne, the moft confiderable Trader in thofe Parts.  But becaufe he w,ould not fend him immediately to Sea, he  found Means, in the Train of Mr. Peregrine Berty, fecond  Son to the Lord Willoughby^ to pafs into France. Here,  and in the Low-Countries, he firft learnt the Rudiments of  War ; to which Profeflion he was led, by a ftrong Propenfity of Genius. He was afterwards carried into Scotland^  with delufive Hopes, from a Scottijh Gentleman, of being  effeiStually recommended to King yames. But foon finding himfelf baffled in his Expeftations, he returned to Willoughby, his native Place ; where meeting with no Company, agreeable to his Way of thinking, he retired into a  Wood, at- a good Diftance from any Town, and there  built himfelf a Pavilion of Boughs, and was wholly employed, in ftudying fome Treatifes of the Art of War,  and in the Exercife of his Horfe and Lance. But his  Friends, being concerned at fuch a whimfical Turn of  Mind, prevailed with a.n Italian Gentleman, Rider to the  Earl of Lincoln, to infinuate himfelf into his Acquaintance ;  and as he was an expert Horfeman, and his Talent and Studies lay the fame Way with Mr. Smith's, he drew him from  his fylvan Retirement, to fpend fome time with him at  Tatter/all. But Book III. rhe History of VIRGINIA. 109 But Smith's reftlefs Genius foon hurried him again into  Flanders ; where lamenting to fee fuch EfFufion of Chriftian  Blood, he refolved to try his Fortune againft the Turks.  In order to this, he paffed through France^ with Variety  of Adventure and Misfortune, in which he always fliewed  a high and martial Spirit. At Marfeilles he embarked for  Italy. But the Ship meeting with much foul Weather, a  Rabble of Pilgrims, on board, hourly curfed him for a Hugonot, railed at Queen Elizabeth and his whole Nation,  and fwore, they fliould never have fair Weather, as Jong  as he was in the Ship. At laft, the Paflions of thefe pious  Chriftians rofe fo high, that they threw him overboard ;  trufliing, we may fuppofe, in the Merit and Supererogation  of that holy Pilgrimage, to expiate the trifling Offence and  Peccadillo of Murder. However, Smith., by the Divine  Affiftance, got fafe to a fmall uninhabited Ifland, againft  Nice in Savoy. From thence he was, the next Day, taken  off by a French Rover, who treated him very kindly, and  with whom he therefore made the Tour of the whole Mediterranean, both on the Mahometan and the Chriftian Coafts.  At length, after a defperate Battle, having taken a very  rich Venetian Ship, the generous Frenchman fet him aftiore,  with his Share of the Prize ; amounting to five hundred Sequeens in Specie, and a Box of rich Commodities, worth  near as much more. And now out of Curiofity ranging  all the Regions and Principalities of. Italy., he at laft went  to Vienna., and entered himfelf a Gentleman Volunteer, in  Count Meldritch's Regiment, againft the Turk. H E had not been long i« the Chriftian Army, before he  was diftinguiftied for a Man of great perfonal Bravery ; and  in the Sieges of Olumpagh and Alba-Regalis, he was the  Author of fome Stratagems, which fliewed a happy Talent  for War, and did fignal Service to the Chriftian Caufe. He  was thereupon immediately advanced to the Command of a  Troop of Horfe ; and was, foon after, made Serjeant Major of the Regiment, a Poft, at that Time, next to the  Lieutenant Colonel. But Count Meldritch, a Tranjilvanian  Nobleman by Birth, afterwards palTed with his Regiment,  out of the Imperial Service, into that of his natural Prince,  Sigifmond 'Bathori, Duke of, Tranjilvanta. And here, endeavouring to recover fome patrimonial Lordfliips, then in  the Poflellion of the Turk., he laid Siege to a ftrong Town,  chiefly inhabited by Renegados and Banditti. Whilft their  Works were advancing flowly, and with great Difficulty,  a Turkijh Officer iflued forth of the Town, and challenged  any Chriftian, of the Dignity of a Captain, to a fingle  Combat. Many were eager of the Honour of humbling this no T/&e History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book III this haughty Muffelman ; but it was at laft decided, by Lot,  in Favour of Captain ^mith. Accordingly, the Ramparts  of the Town being filled with fair Dames and Men in Arms,  and the Chriftian Army drawn up in Battalia, the Combatants entered the Field, well mounted and richly armed, to  the Sound of Hautboys and Trumpets ; where, at the firft  Encounter, Smith bore the Turk dead to the Ground, and  went off triumphantly with his Head. But the Infidel Garrifon being enraged at this, he afterwards engaged two other Officers ; and being a great Mafter of his Arms, and  the Management of his Horfe, he carried off their Heads,  in the fame Manner. After which, being attended with a  Guard of fix thoufand Men, with the three Turkijh Horfes  led before him, and before each a Turk's Head upon a  Spear, he was condufted to the General's Pavilion ; who  received him with open Arms, and prefented him with a  fine Horfe, richly caparifoned, and with a Scimitar and  Belt, worth three hundred Ducats. Soon after, the Duke  himfelf, coming to view his Army, gave him his Pidlure,  fet in Gold ; fettled three hundred Ducats upon him, as a  Yearly Pehfion ; and iffued his Letters patent of Nobleffe,  giving him three Turks Heads, in a Shield, for his Arms ;  which Coat he ever afterwards bore, and it was admitted  and recorded in the Herald's Office in England^ by Sir Wil, liam Segar^ Garter, principal King at Arms. But foon after, the Duke of TranJUvania was deprived  of his Dominions by the Emperor ; and Smith, at the fatol  Battle of Rottenton, in the Year 1602, was left upon the  Field, among the dreadful Carnage of Chriftians, as dead.  But the Pillagers, perceiving Life in him, and judging by  the Richnefs of his Habit and Armour, that his Ranfom  might be confiderable, took great Pains to recover him.  After that, he was puBUckly fold, among the other Prifoners ; and was bought by a Bafliaw, who fent him to ConJiantimple, as a Prefent to his Miftrefs, Charat%a Tragaitgzanda, a beautiful young Tartarian Lady. Smith was  then twenty three Years of Age, in the Bloom of Life,  and, as it feems, of a very handfome Perfon. For this  young Lady was fo moved with Compaffion, or rather  Love, for him, that fhe treated him with the utmoft Tendernefs and Regard. And to prevent his being ill ufed, or  fold, by her Mother, {he fent him into Tartary, to her  Brother, who was Timor Bafhaw of Nalbrits, on the Palus Moeotis. Here, flie intended, he (hould ftay, to learn  the Language, tog^her with the Manners and Religion of  the Turit, till Time Ihould make her Miftrefs of herfelf. But Book III. The History of VIRGINIA. lu But the Bafliaw, fufpefting fomething of the Matter,  from the afFedtionate Expreflions, with which flie recommended and prefled his good Ufage, only treated Smith  with the greater Cruelty and Inhumanity. Smith's high  Spirit, raifed alfo by a Confcioufnefs of Tragabigzanda's  Paflioh, could but ill brook this harfli Treatment. At laft,  being one Day threfhing alone, at a Grange above a League  from the Houfe, the Timor came, and took Occafion, fo  to kick, fpurn, and revile him, that forgetting all Reafon,  Smith beat out his Brains, with his threfhing Bat. Then  reflediting upon his defperate State, he hid the Body under  the Straw, filled his Knapfack with Corn, put on the Timor's Cloaths, and mounting his Horfe, fled into the Deferts of Circajfta. After two or three Days fearful Wandering, he happened, providentially, on the Caftragan, or  great Road, that leads into Mufcovy. Following this, for  fixteen Days, with infinite Dread and Fatigue, he at laft  arrived at a Mufcovite Garrifon, on the Frontiers. Here  he was kindly entertained and prefented, as alfo at all the  Places, through which he pafled. Having travelled through  Siberia, Mufcovy, Tranfilvania, and the Midft of Europe,  he at length found his old Friend and gracious Patron, the  Duke of Tranfilvania, at Leipjick, together with Count  Meldritch, his Colonel. Having fpent fome time with them,  the Duke, at his Departure, gave him a Pafs, intimating  the Services, he had done, and the Honours, he had received ; prefenting him, at the fame Time, with fifteen  hundred Ducats of Gold, to repair his LofTes. And altho'  he was now intent on returning to his native Country, yet  being furnifhed with this Money, he fpent fome time, in  travelling through the principal Cities and Provinces of Germany, France, and Spain. From the laft, being led by  the Rumour of Wars, he paiTed over into Africa, and vifited the Court of Morocco. Having viewed many of the  Places and Curiofities of Barbary, he at laft returned, through  France, to England; and in his Paflage in a French Galley,  they had a moft defperate Engagement, for two or three  Days together, with two Spanijh Men of War. In England, all things were ftill, and in the moft profound Peace ;  fo that, there was no Room or Profpedl for a Perfon of his  adlive and warlike Genius. And therefore, having fpent  fome time, in an idle and uneafy State, he willingly embarked himfelf with Captain Gofnold, in the Projefl of fettling Colonies in America, and came ia Virginia. His ConduiSt here hath been fufficiently related ; and I  fhall finifli his CharacSer, with the Teftimonies of fome of  his Soldiers and Fellow-Adventurers. They own him to have 112 rbe History of VIRGINIA. Book III. have made Juftice his firft Guide, and Experience his fecond : That he was ever fruitful in Expedients, to provide  for the People under his Command, whom he would never  fufFer to want any thing, he either had, or could procure :  That he rather chofe to lead, than fend his Soldiers into  Danger ; and upon all hazardous or fatiguing Expeditions,  always fliared every thing equally with his .Company,, and  never defired any of them, to do or undergo any thing, that  he was not ready, to do or undergo himfelf : That he hated  Bafenefs, Sloth, Pride, and Indignity, more than any Danger : That he would fuffer Want, rather than borrow ;  and ftarve, fooner than not pay : That he loved A<Sion,  more than Words ; and hated Fallhood and ^ovetpufnefs,  worfe than Death : and. That his Adventures gave Life and  Subfiftency to the Colony, and his Lofs was their- Ruin and  Deftru(ftion. They confefs, that there were many Captains in that Age (as there are indeed in all Ages) who were  no Soldiers ; but that Captain Smith was a Soldier, of the  true old Englijh Stamp, who fought, not for Gain or  empty Praife, but for his Country's Honour and the publick Good : That his Wit, Courage, and Succefs here,were worthy of eternal Memory : That by the mere Force  of his Virtue and Courage, he awed the Indian Kings, and  made them fubmit, and bring Prefents : That, notwithftanding fuch a ftern an-d invincible Refolution, there was  feldom feen a milder and more tender Heart, than his was :  That he had nothing in him counterfeit or fly, but was  open, honeft, and fincere : and. That they never knew a  Soldier, before him, fo free from thofe military Vices, of  Wine, Tobacco, Debts, Dice, and Oaths. From this Account of Captain Smith, extracted from  his own Writings and the Teftimony of his Contemporaries and Acquaintance, it will be eafily feen, that he' was  a Soldier of Fortune, who had run through great Variety  of Life and Adventure. And indeed he was fo famous for  this in his own Age, that he lived to fee himfelf brought  upon the Stage, and the chief Dangers, and moft interefting Paffages of his Life, racked, as he complains, and mifreprefented in low Tragedies. I cannot therefore forbear  tranfiently obferving Oldmixon's Miftake, who fays, . that  the Company took him into their Service, becaufe he was  a noted Seaman, and famed for his Experience in maritime  Affairs. But to remark all the Errors of our Hiftorians,  but moft efpecially of Oldmixon, the weakeft, moft idle,  and erroneous of all others, would be an infinite Work,  and too often interrupt and break the Thread of my Narration. I hope therefore, the courteous Reader will be fa- tisfied  Book III. "Tibe History of VIRGINIA. tisfied with this fhort Caution and Animadverfion, once for  all. For to fpeak the Truth ingenuoufly, I had rather^  find out and corre£t one Miftake in ftiy own, than expofe  and ridicule twenty Blunders in the Hiftories of others. But  to return to the Affairs of Virginia. I T hath been before faid, that the Admiral-Ship, with y„hn Smith  Sir Thomas Gates, Sir George Somers, and Captain Newport PnHdent.  on board, was feparated from the reft of the Fleet in a Storm.  She was fo racked and torn by the violent Working of the  Sea, and became fo Ihattered and leaky, that the Water  rofe in the Hold above two Tire of Hogflieads ; and they  were obliged to ftand up to their Middles, with Kettles,  Buckets, and other Veflels, to bail, it but. And thus they  bailed and pumped, three Days and Nights, without Intermiffion ; and yet the Water feemed rather to gain upon  them, than decreafe. At lafl:, all being utterly fpent with  Labour, and feeing no Hope, in Man's Apprehenfion, but  of prefently finking, they refolved to fhut up the Hatches,  and to commit themfelves to the Mercy of the Sea and  God's good Providence. In this dangerous and defperate  State, fome, who had good and comfortable Waters, fetched  them, and drank to one another, as taking their lafl: Leaves,  till a more happy and joyful Meeting in the other World.  But it pleafed God, in his moft gracious Providence, fo to  guide their Ship, to her befl: Advantage, that they were  all preferved, and came fafe to Shore. For Sir George Somers had fat, all this Time, upon the  Poop, fcarce allowing himfelf Leifure, either to eat or  fleep, cunning the Ship, and keeping her upright, or flie  muft, otherwife, long before this, have foundered. As  he there fat, looking wiflifully about, he moft happily and  unexpeftedly defcried Land. This welcome News, as if  it had been a Voice from Heaven, hurried them all above  Hatches, to fee, what they could fcarce believe. But thereby, improvidently forfaking their Work, they gave fuch an  Advantage to their greedy Enemy, the Sea, that they were  very nigh being fwallowed up. But none were now to be  urged, to do his beft. Altho' they knew it to be Bermudas, a Place then dreaded and fliunned by all Men, yet  they fpread all the Sail, and did every thing elfe, in their  Povver, to reach the Land. It was not long, before the  Ship ftruck upon a Rock ; but a Surge of the Sea caft her  from thence, and fo from one to another, till fhe was moft  luckily thrown up between two, as upright,- as if flie had  been on the Stocks. And now the Danger ' was, left the  Billows, overtaking her, fhould, in an Inftant, have dafhed  and ihivered her to Pieces. But all on a fudden, the Wind  " I lay,  The History of VIRGINIA. Book III. lay, and gave Place to a Calm ; and the Sea became fo  peaceable and ftill, that, with the greateft Conveniency and  J"'"' S""'* Eafe, they unfhipped all their Goods, Visuals, and PeoPrefident. ^^^^ ^^^ j^ ^^^.^ Boats, with extreme Joy, almoft to Amazement, arrived in Safety, without the Lofs of a Man,  altho' more than a League from the Shore. How thefe Iflands came by the Name of Bermudas, is  not certainly agreed. Some fay, that they were fo named  after John Bermudaz, a Spaniard, who fir ft difcovered them,  about the Year 1522. Others report, that a Spanijh Ship,  called the Bermudas, was caft away upon them, as flie was  carrying Hogs to the Wejl-Indies, which fwam afliore, and  increafed to incredible Numbers. But they had been, in  all Times before, infamous and terrible to Mariners, for  the Wreck of many Spanijh, Dutch, and French Veffels.  They were therefore, with the ufual Elegance of the Sea  Stile, by many called the IJle of Devils ; and were efteemed  the Hell or Purgatory of Seamen, the moft dangerous, unfortunate, and forlorn Place in the World. But the fafe Arrival of this Company was not more  ftrange and providential, than their Feeding and Support  was beyond all their Hopes or Expe£i:ation. For they found  it the richeft, pleafanteft, and moft healthful Place, they  had ever feen. Being fafe on Shore, they difpofed' themfelves, fome to fearch the Iflands for Food and Water, and  others to get aftiore, what they could, from the Ship. Sir  George Somers had not ranged far, before he found fuch a  Fifhery, that, in half an Hour, he took, with a Hook and  Line, as many, as fufficed the whole Company. In fome  Places, they were fo thick in the Coves, and fo big, that  they were afraid to venture in amongft them ; and Sir  George Somers caught one, that had before carried off two  of his Hooks, fo large, that it would have pulled him into  the Sea, had not his Men got hold of him. Two of thofe  Rock-fifli would have loaded a Man ; neither could any  where be found, fatter, or more excellent Fifli, than they  were. Befides, there were infinite Numbers of Mullets,  Pilchards, and other fmall Fry ; and by making a Fire in  the Night, they would take vaft Quantities of large Crawfifli. As for Hogs, they found them in that Abundance,  that, at their firft- Hunting, they killed thirty two. And  there were likewife Multitudes of excellent Birds, in their Seafons ; and the greateft Facility, to make their Cabbins with  Palmeta Leaves. This caufed them to live in fuch Plenty,  Eafe, and Comfort, that many forgot all other Places, and  never defired to return from thence. In Book III. T>6e History 0/ VIRGINIA. 115 I N the mean while, the Thoughts of the two Knights i6°9were bufily employed, how to proceed, in this defperate"" — v — -'  State of their Affairs. At laft, it was refolved, to deck 'I'le Hon.  the Long-boat with the Ship's Hatches, and to fend Mr. -^^a^QovltRaven, a ftout and able Mariner, with eight more in her, nor.  to Virginia ; to get Shipping from thence, to fetch them  away. But flie was never more heard of; and fuch was  the Malice, Envy, and Ambition of fome, that, notwithftanding Sir George Samers's eminent Services, there arofe  great Differences between the Commanders. So that, as  if, according to the Obfervation of a Spanijh Author, the  Air of America was infeSious, and inclined Mens Minds to  Wrangling and Contention, they lived afunder, in the  Height of this their Calamity, rather like mere Strangers,  than diflreffed Friends. But the feveral Parties, each refolved upon building a VefTel. In the mean while, two  Children were born. The Boy was called Bermudas^ and 1610.  the Girl Bermuda; and in the Midfl of all their Sorrows,  they had a merry Englijh Wedding. But the two Cedar  Ships being, at length, finifhed, and rigged with what they  faved from the Sea-Venture^ they calked them, and paid  the Seams with Lime and Turtle's Oyl, inftead of Pitch  and Tar; which quickly became dry, and as hard as a  Stone. Sir George Somers had no Iron in his Bark, except  one Bolt in the Keel. And now, their Provifions being  laid in, and • all Things in Readinefs, after about Nine  Months Abode there, they fet Sail, on the loth of May^  i6ro. They left behind them- two Men, Chrijiopher Carter and Edward Waters ; who, for their Offences, fled  into the Woods, and defired, rather there to end their  Days, than to ff:and to the Event of Juflice. For one of  their AccompHces had been (hot to Death, and Waters was  adiually tied to a Tree to be executed ; but he had, by  Chance, a Knife about him, with which he fecretly cut  the Rope, and ran into the Woods. There alfo came from  England with them two Indians^ named Namontack and  Machumps. But, upon fome Difference, Machumps ' {[ew  Namontack ; and having made a Hole to bury him, becaufe  it was too fhort, he cut off his Legs, and laid them by him.  Neither was the Murder ever difcovered, before he got to  Virginia. Whilst thefe Things were pafEng in Bermudas, the  Colony in Virginia was reduced to the utmofl Mifery and  Diflrefs. Captain Percy, their Governor, was fo fick and  weak the whole Time, that he could neither go nor ftand.  Wherefore he c6uld not keep up his Authority with fuch a  feditious Crew, nor aft with that Vigor and Induflry, as I 2 might ii6 'J'be History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book III, 1610. might juftlv have been expefted from him. Captain Mar- ' r^tin from Nanfamond, and Captain Wgji from the Falls, The Hon. having loft their Boats, and near half their Men, were re^^°7^-^^7^_ turned to James-Tgwn. For the Indians, no fooner underno?.' """ flood, that Smith wzs gone, but they revolted, and fpoiled  and murdered all, they met. And now^ they had twenty  Prefidents, with all their Appurtenances of Parafites and  Profufion. They laviflily fpent the Provifions, fent from  England in the laft Ships ; which, however, were fo bad,  and fo infufficient in Proportion, that the .poor famifliing  People, in the Bitternefs of their Heart, poured forth, the  whole Time, the moft dreadful Curfes and Execrations againft Sir Thomas Smith, the Treafurer. And they were  therefore foon obliged, to depend wholly, on what Captain  Smith left ; which he had provided, only to ferve his own  Company for fome Time, with Intention, afterwards to  lay in a much larger Stock. But before thefe Provifions  were quite confumed, Captain Weji and Captain Ratcliffe,  each with a fmall Ship, and thirty or forty Men well appointed, went abroad to trade. Ratcliffie, upon Confidence  of Pow;^a^«?2's fair Profeffions, was flain, with thirty others,  as carelefs as himfelf. Only one Man of the Company  efcaped ; and Pocahontas faved a Boy, one Henry Spilman,  who lived for many Years, by her Means, among the Patowmacks. But Powhatan, ftill as he found Opportunity,  cut off their Boats, and denied them Trade ; -fo that Captain Weft failed off in his Ship to England. And now, they were all- deeply fenfible of the Lofs of  Captain Smith. Even his bittereft Enemies, and greateft  Maligners, would curfe their Deftiny for his Departure.  Inftead of Corn and Contribution from the Indians, which  his Induftry and Authority ftill wrefted from them, they  had nothing but Scoffs and mortal Wounds. And as for  their Hogs, Sheep, Goats, Hens, and other Animals, their  riotous Commanders, and the Indians, daily confumed and  deftroyed them. So that they traded away their Swords,  Firelocks, and any thing elfe, they had, with the Indians;  who were thereby enabled, the more eafily, often to embrue their cruel Hands in their Blood. Thofe, who had  Startch, made no little Ufe of it, in this Extremity ; and  the very Skins of their Horfes were prepared, by ftewing  and hafliing, into dainty and welcome Food. Nay, fo great  was the Famine, that the poorer Sort took up an Indian,  that had been flain and buried, and eat him ; and fo did feveral others, one another, that died, boiled and ftewed  with Roots and Herbs. And one, among the reft, killed  his Wife, powdered her up, and had eaten Part of her, before  Book III. The History of VIRGINIA. before it was difcovered ; for which he was, afterwards, defervedly* executed. In fhort, fo extremewas the Famine and  Diftrefs of this Time, that it was,, for many Years after, J}^^ '^°"'  diftinguifhed and remembered, by the Name of the Star- ^{q.%J,"tViNG Time. And by thefe means, of near five hundred nor.  Perfons, , left by Captain Smith at his Departure, within  fix Months, there remained not above fixty. Men, Women, and Children ; and thofe moft poor and miferable  Creatures, preferved, for the moft part, by Roots, Herbs,  Acorns, Walnuts, Berries, and now and then a little Fifh.  Neither was it poffible for them, to have held out ten Days  longer, without being all utterly extinft and famifhed with  Hunger. I N this calamitous State, did Sir Thomas Gates and Sir sir Thomas  George Somers find the Colony, at their Arrival, on the Gates, Go24th of May. Thefe two noble Knights, being utter ''""'"■•  Strangers to their Affairs, could underftand nothing of the  Caufe and Reafon of thefe Miferies, but by Conjedture from  their Clamours and Complaints, either accufing, or excufing one another. They therefore embarked them all, in  the beft manner, they could, and fet Sail for England. At  their Departure, many were importunate to burn the Houfes  and Fort at "James-Town. ,But God, who did not intend,  that this excellent Country fhould be fo abandoned, put it  into the Heart of Sir Thomas Gates., to fave the Town and  Fortifications. For having fallen down to Hog-JJland., and  thence to Mulberry-Point., they defcried the Long-boat of  the Lord Delawarr ; who, being then Captain-General of  Virginia., a Title ever after given to our Governors in chief,  came up with three Ships, exceedingly well furnifhed with  all Neceflaries, and returned them back to James-Town. His Lordfhip arrived the 9th of June^ accompanied with ^"^ ^'l!"  Sir Ferdinando Waynman, General of the Horfe,, (who foon ^jnor  after died here) Captain Holcroft., and divers other Gentlemen of Figure. The loth he came up with his Fleet,  went afliore, heard a Sermon, read his Commiflion, and  entered into Confultation about the Affairs of the Colony.  Then he made a fhort Speech to the Company, juftly  blaming them for their Pride, Vanity, and Sloth, and earneftly entreating them to amend their Ways, left he fhould  be compelled to draw the Sword of Juftice, and cutoff'fuch  Delinquents; which, he profefled, he had much rather  draw, to the fhedding his own vital Blood, in their Caufe  and Defence. He alfo conftituted proper Officers of all  Kinds, and allotted every Man his particular Place and Bufinefs. This Oration was received with a general Applaufe ;  and you might loon fee the idle and refty Humours of a divided Multitude, by the Splendor, Unity, and Authority of I 3 this n8 TAe History of VIRGINIA. Book III. 1610. this Government, fubftantially healed. Captain Martin  ■ was removed from the Council, for his weak, cruel, and  diforderly Behaviour; and thofe, who knew not the Path  to Goodnefs before, would, now chalk it out to their Fellows, endeavouring to outftrip each other in Diligence and  Induftry. The French prepared to plant the Vines ; the  Englijh laboured in the Woods and Grounds; and every  Man knew his particular Bufinefs and Vocation, which he  followed with Alacrity and Pleafure. But altho' his Lordfliip's Stores were -very plentiful for  his own Company, yet were they far from being enough to  fuffice the whole Colony. For it was computed, that all  the Provifion, landed from England, the whole firft three  Years, was .not fufficient to have ferved the People, according to their Numbers, fix Months. Underftanding  therefore, what Plenty there was of Hogs and other good  Provifions in Bermudas, he determined to fend thither for a  fufficient Supply. Whereupon Sir George Somen, who, by  his Dihgence in ranging thofe Iflands,' was befl: acquainted  with the Place, and whofe generous Mind ever regarded the  publick Good, more than his own .private Ends, altho' of  above threefcore Years of Age, and of a Fortune in England fuitable to his Rank and Quality, yet offered his Service to perform this dangerous Voyage to thofe rocky and  unfortunate Iflands ; and he promifed with God's Afliflance,  foon to return,/ with fix Months Provifion of Flefh. On  the 19th of June, he embarked, in his own Cedar VefTel,  of thirty Tons ; and Captain Samuel Argall was alfo fent  with him, in another fmall Bark. But Captain Argall was  foon forced back, by Strefs of Weather ; and was fent, by  the Lord, Governor, to Patowmack River, to trade for Corn.  He there found the Englijh Boy, Henry Spilman, preferved  by Pocahontas and thofe Indians, from the Fury of Powhatan. He was a young Gentleman, well defcended ; and,  by his Acquaintance and Help, Captain Argall received fuch  good Ufage from that kind People, that his VefTel was foon  freighted with Corn, with which - he returned to "JamesTown. But Sir George Somers flruggled long with foul  Weather and contrary Winds ; and was at lafl forced to the  Northern Parts of the Continent, where he refrelhed himfelf and his Men on the unknown Coafl. But departing  thence again, he at length arrived fafe at Bermudas. Ufing  too much Diligence and Pains in difpatching his Bufinefs,  and the Strength of his Body not anfwering the ever memorable Vigor of his Mind, having lived long in honourable  Employments, much beloved, and highly efleemed, thro'  his whole Life, Nature at lafl could no longer fupport the Burthen,  Book III. The History of VIRGINIA. Burthen, but funk under his too great Labour and Fatigue.  Finding his Time but fliort, after having made a proper '  Difpofi^tion of his Eftate, he called them together, and like ^°'^ ^'J,"'  a valiant Captain and virorthy Patriot, exhorted them to be T„„or.  true and conftant to thofe Plantations, and with all Expedition and Diligence, to return to Virginia. Thus died this virtuous and honourable Knight, in the  very Place, w^here they afterwards built a Town, from him  called St. Georges ; and the Iflands themfelves have ever  fince borne the Name of the Somer-IJlands, in Honour to  his Memory. But Captain Matthew Somers, his Nephew,  and all his Men, were in fuch Grief and Confternation at  his Death, and were fo heedlefs and unconcerned for the  Colony, that they utterly negle£led his dying Inftrudlions,  to return to Virginia. For having buried his Heart and Entrails, and erefted a Crofs over the Place ; they embalmed  his Body, and fet Sail with it, in his Cedar Ship, for England. Arriving fafe at Whitchurch in Dorfetjhire., he was  there honourably enterred, with many Vollies of Shot, and  the Rites of a Soldier. But the Crofs was accidentally  found, nine Years after, in a Bye-place, overgrown with  Bufhes, by Captain Nathaniel Butler^ then Governor of  thofe Iflands. Refolving to have a better Memorial of fo  worthy a Soldier, and finding a large Marble Stone, brought  from England, he caufed it to be handfomely wrought by  Mafons, and laid over the Place ; engraving an Epitaph,  agreeable to the Tafte and Manner of the Times, and environing the whole with a fquare Wall of hewn Stone.  But I underfland, that this Monument is now utterly obliterated, and the Place quite forgot and unknown in that  Country. Upon this Occafion,, there alfo happened a very humourous Circumftance. Carter and Waters had been left  here, when the reft went to Virginia, as hath been faid.  And now, by Carter's Perfuafions, Waters was ftill ftaid,  and one Edward Chard pined himfelf to them. This Veffel once out of Sight, thefe three Lords and fole Inhabitants of all thofe Iflands, began to ered: their little Commonwealth, with equal Power and brotherly Regency,  building a Houfe, preparing the Ground, planting their  Corn, and fuch Seeds and Fruits, as they had, and providing other Neceflaries and Conveniences. Then making  Search among the Crevices and Corners of tfiofe craggy  Rocks, what the Ocean, from the World's Creation, had  thrown up among them, befides divers fmaller Pieces, they  happened upon the largeft Block of Ambergreafe, that had  ever been feen or heard of, in one Lump. It weighed fourThe History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book III. fourfcore Pounds ; and is faid, itfelf alone, befides the others, ' to have been then worth nine or ten thoufand Pounds. And Lord Deh-novr being rich, they grew fo refty and ambitious, that ■^arr. Go- ^j^^^^ j},j.gg fgriom Men, above three thoufand Miles from """"■ their native Country, and with little Probability of ever feeing it again, fell out for the Superiority and Rule. And their Competition and Quarrel grew fo high, that Chard and Waters^ being of the greateft Spirit, had appointed to decide the Matter in the Field. But Garter wifely ftole their Arms ; chufing rather, to bear wi^th fuch troublefome Rivals, than, by being rid of them, to live alone. So doubtful a Good are Riches, and fo prepofterpus a Thing the Mind of Man ! In the mean while, the Lord Delawarr, in Virginia,  built two Forts at Kicquotan ; and called one, Fort Henry, the other, Fort Charles. They flood on a pleafant  Plain, near a little River, which they named Southampton  River, in a wholefome Air, having plenty of Springs, and  commanding a large Circuit of Ground, which contained  Wood, Pafture, and Marfli, with fit places- for Vines,  Corn, and Gardens. Here it was intended, that thofe,  who came from England, ftiould be quartered at their firft  Landing, that the Wearifomenefs and Naufea of the Sea  might be refreflied, in this pleafant Situation, and wholefome Air. Sir Thomas Gates he fent to England ; and Captain Percy, with Mr. Stacy and fifty or threefcore good  Shot, was difpatched to revenge fome Injuries of the Pafpaheys. But thofe Indians flying, they burnt their Houfes,  and took the Queen and her Children Prifoners, whom not  long after they flew. So much was the Government already altered from the Clemency of Smith's Adminiftration,  who never did, nor would have been permitted, to fhed  the leaft Drop of Indian Blood, by Way of Punifliment ;  but was obliged to fupply the Want of fufiicient Vigor and  Power in his Authority, by his own Activity, Induftry,  Art, and Circumfpedlion. Some time after, as my Lord Delawarr was at the  Falls, the Indians aflTaulted his Troops, and killed three or  four of his Men. But his Lordfhip had now been long fick.  Immediately upon his Arrival, he was feized with an Ague,  which, being put by for the prefent, foon returned with  greater Violence than ever ; and he began to be diftempered  with other grievous Sicknefles. He was firft aflTailed by the  Flux, then by the Cramp, and after that by the Gout;  all which reduced him to fo weak and low a State, that,  being unable to ftir, it brought upon him the Scurvy.  Therefore, by the Advice of his Friends, on the 28th of March, Book III. -r^e History 0/ VIRGINIA. 121 March, he fhipped himfeif, with Dr. Bohun and Captain "6iiArgall, for Mevis, in the Weji-Indies, an Ifland, at that '— — y — -^  time, famous for wholefome Baths. At his Departure, he "^^^ """■  committed the Colony to the Charge of Captain Percy, 'till ^lZ%o"athe Arrival of Sir Thomas Dale. And he left behind about nor!  two hundred Perfons, moft of them in good Health, and  well provided with Vidluals, and the Natives, to all outward Appearance, tradable and friendly. But being crofled  by Southerly Winds, they were obliged to fliape their Courfe  to the WeJiern-IJlands ; where his Lordfhip met with much  Relief from Oranges and Lemons,- a fovereign Remedy for  that Diforder. However he was advifed, not to hazard  himfeif back to Virginia yet, but to return to England, for  the perfeft Recovery of his Health. The Council in England were, all this while, ftill eager after fome immediate Profit. Therefore, finding the  Smalnefs of the Return by thofe Ships, which had carried  the laft Supply, they entered into ferious Confultation, whether it were better, to come into a new Contribution, or in  time to abandon the Country, and give over the Enterprife.  Wherefore, upon the Arrival of Sir Thomas Gates, they  adjured him to deal plainly with them ; and he, with a  folemn and facred Oath, gave them a full Account of the  State and ProfpeS of Things. And he told them, that all  Men knew, they lay at the Mercy of politic Princes and  States ; who, for their own proper Utility, devifed all Methods to grind their Merchants, and, on any Pretence, to  confifcate their Goods, and draw frqfn them all Manner of  Gain ; whereas Virginia, in a kw ■ Years, might furnifli  all their Wants, with Honour and Security. But, by this  time, fome of the Adventurers were become fufpicious of  the Treafurer's Fairnefs in the Carriage and Management  of the Bufinefs. To which the Lord Delawarr's Return  ^added a farther Damp and Difcouragement, and bred fuch  a Coldnefs and Irrefolution in many of them, that they endeavoured to withdraw their Payments. Being fued, fome  pleaded in Chancery, upon their Oaths, that the Monies  were not converted to' the Ufe intended, but to private  Mens Gains ; and that no Accounts were kept, or at leaft  legally audij:ed and examined. But this was overruled, and  no ways regarded or believed ; and Sir Thomas Smith's Integrity was then thought fo unqueftionable, that they were  obliged to pay their Sums fubfcribed. The Lord Delawarr  alfo, being much pleafed with the Country, and cordial in  the Affair, made a publick Oration in the Council; which  he afterwards publiflied, to allay their Difcontents, and give  Satisfa6lion to all. And his Lordfliip protefted himfeif wills ling.  rbe History of VIRGINIA. Book III. ling, to venture his whole Fortune upon the Succefs of the  ■■ Enterprife ; and rather than fo honourable an Aftion fliould Sir nomas {^i\^ to return immediately in Perfon, if they would but Dal^, Go- fecond his Endeavours. """"''■ But before the Arrival of Lord Delawarr in England, the Council and Company had difpatched away Sir Thomas  Dale, High Marflial of Virginia, with three Ships, Men,  and Cattle, and with all other Provifions, thought neceflary  for a Year; which arrived fafe, the loth oi May, i6ir.  Sir Thomas found the People again, falling into their former  Eftate of Penury and Want. For they were fo improvident, as not to put Corn into the Ground, but trufted  wholly to the Store, then furniflied with only three Months  Provifions. His firft Care, therefore, was to employ all  Hands in planting Corn at the two Forts at Kicquotan ; and  the Seafon being then not fully paft, they had an indifferent  Crop of good Corn. And having taken Order for this Bufinefs, and committed the Care of it to his Under-Officers,  he hafted back to James-Town ; where he found moft of the  Company, at their daily and ufual Work, bowling in the  Streets. But he foon employed them about things more  neceffary ; as felling Timber, and repairing their Houfes,  ready to fall on their Heads. He likewife fet many to providing Pales, Pofts, and Rails, to empale the new Town,  he purpofed to build ; but being yet unacquainted with the  Country, he had not refolved, where to feat it. He therefore fpent fome time, with an hundred Men, in viewing  the River of Nanfammd, in Defpight of the Indians, at that  time their Enemies. And then he examined James River,  up to the Falls ; and at length' pitched upon a Place for his  new Town, on the Narrow of Farrar's Ifland^ in Varina  Neck, upon a high Land, nearly invironed by the main  River. B u T he found it no eafy Matter, to reduce his turbulent  and feditious People to good Order. About this time, SuThomas Smith fent over a printed Book of Articles and Laws,  chiefly tranflated from the martial Laws of the Loix) Countries. Thefe were very bloody and fevere, and no ways  ■ agreeable to a free People and the Britijh Conftitution ;  neither had they any SancSion or Authority from the Council and Company in England. However, Sir Thomas Dale,  being fadly troubled and peftered with the mutinous Humours of the People, caufed them to be publifhed, and  put into Execution with the utmoft Rigor. And altho' the  Manner was harfti and unufual to Englijhman, yet had not  thefe military Laws been fo ftriftly executed at this time,  there were little Hopes or Probability of preventing the utter  Book in. rhe History of VIRGINIA. ter Subverfion of the Colony. For, this Summer, one  ff^ebb and one Price entered into a Plot againft the Go-''  vernment ; which was,*foon after, followed by a more dan- Sir Thomas  gerous Conspiracy of Jefrey Jbbgt. This Jbbfft had ferved f/^^'^^/^°'  long as- a Soldier, both in Ireland and the Netherlands, and  was here Serjeant of Captain Smith's Company ; who declares, that he never knew in Virginia, a more able Soldier,  lefs turbulent, of a better Wit, more hardy and induftrious, or more forward to cut ofF thofe, who endeavoured to  abandon the Country, or wrong the Colony. But from  what Caufe foever his Difcorftents arofe, whether he refented his being neglefted and unrewarded, and having others  put over his Head and preferred before him, or whether  there was any other Reafon of his Diflatisfaftion, it is certain, that this Man, who never received any Reward for  his long Services and Deferts, now met with an immediate  Punifliment for this fudden and pailionate Deviation from  his Duty. One Cole alfo, and Kitchens, with three more,  plotted to run away to the Spaniards, whom they fuppofed,  from fome wrong Information, to be inhabiting, fome  where within five Days Journey of the Fort. And thefe  Commotions juftified Sir Thomas Dale's neceflary Severities,  which might otherwife have been branded, as many were  then ready to do, with being too cruel and tyrannical.  But however falutary fuch fharp and fummary Proceedings  might be at that time, as I find them owned to have been,  and commended by all Parties ; and however Sir Thomas  Dale might fafely be trufted with fo great a Power, a Man  of much Honour, Wifdom, and Experience ; yet it is certain, that thefe Articles were utterly deftruftive of the Englijh Freedom and Laws, and gave the Governor fuch a  commanding and defpotick Authority, as is, by no means,  to be lodged in any Hand, in a Country, that has the leaft  Thoughts or Pretenfions to Liberty. In the Beginning of Auguji, Sir Thomas Gates arrived sir Thomas  in fix tall Ships, with three hundred ,Men, an hundred Cat- Gato Gotie, two hundred Hogs, and with all Manner of other Mii-^""""'nition and- Provifion, that could be thought of, as needful  and proper. At his Arrival, Sir Thomas Dale's Authority  determined, who, after mutual Salutations, acquainted him  with what he had done, and what he intended. And now,  being eafed of the Burthen of Government, and more at  Leifure, he fet himfelf heartily about building his Town ;  and Sir Thomas Gates, highly approving the Defign, furniflied him with three hundred and fifty Men, fuch as he  himfelf made Choice of. He fet Sail from "James-Town,  the Beginning of September ; and being arrived at the Place, he  T/S^ History of VIRGINIA. Book III. he environed it with a Palifade, and in Honour of Prince  ' Henry, called it Henrico. And then he built a Church,  Sir Thomas ^nd Storehoufes ; and at each Corner of the Town, high  ^mor ^°' commandirtg Watch Towers, This being accomplifhed,  he next provided proper and convenient Houfes for himfelf  and Men, which were finifhed with all poffible Speed, to  the great Comfort and Satisfacftion of his Company and the  whole Colony. The Ruins of this Town are ftill plainly to be traced  and diftinguiflied, upon the Land of the late Col. William  Randolph, of Tuekahoe, juft without the Entrance into Farr.ar's Ifland. It lay from River to River, upon a Plain of  high Land, with very fteep and inacceflible Banks, and the  Neck without, being well empaled, gave it all the Security  and Conveniency of an Ifland. It had three Streets of wellframed Houfes, a handfome Church, and the Foundation  of another laid, to be built of Brick, befides Store-houfes,  Watch-houfes, and other publick Conveniences. Upon the  Verge of the River Bank, flood five Houfes, inhabited by  the better Sort of People, who kept continual Sentinel for  the Town's Security. About two Miles from the Town,  into the Maiii, he run another Palifade, from River to River, near two Miles in Length, guarded with feveral Forts,  with a large Quantity of Corn-ground empaled and fufficiently fecured. Befides thefe Precautions, there may ftill  be feen, upon the River Bank within the Ifland, the Ruins  of a great Ditch, now oyer-grown with large and ftately  Trees ; which, it may be fuppofed, was defended with a  Palifede, to prevent a Surprife on that Side, by crofling the  River. And for a ftill further Security to the Town, he  intended, but never quite finiflied, a Palifade on the South  Side of the River, as a Range for their Hogs ; and he called  it Hope in Faith and Coxendale. It was about two Miles  and an half long, and was fecured by five of their Manner  of Forts, called Charity Fort, Elifaheth Fort, tort Patience,  and Mount Malady, with a Gueft Houfe for fick People,  upon a high and dry Situation, and in a wholefome Air, in  the Place, where Jefferfon's Church now ftands. On the  fame Side of the River alfo, Mr. fFhitaker, their Preacher,  chofe to be feated j and he empaled a fair Parfonage, with  an hundred Acres of Land, calling it Rock-hall. About Chrijimas, Sir Thomas Dale, to revenge foqie  Injuries of the Jppamattock Indians, aflaulted and took their  Town, without the Lofs of a Man. This Town ftood at  the Mouth of the River, and was accounted but five Miles,  by Land, from Henrico. And Sir Thomas, confidering how  convenient it would be to the Englijh, refolved to poflefs and Book. III. The History of VIRGINIA. 125 and feat it, and, at the Inftant, called it New Bermudas, i*"  And he annexed, to the belonging Freedom and Corpora- '— — y— -'  tion for ever, many Miles of champion and wood-land ?,'^ Thomas  Ground, in feveral Hundreds, by the Names of the Upper yeVnor.  and Nether Hundreds, Rochdale ( now called Rod/dale )  Hundred, Shirley Hundred, and Digges's Hundred. At'  Bermudas, where was the moft Corn-ground, he firft be'gan to plant ; and with a Pale of two Miles, acrofs from  River to River, he enclofed and fecured eight Englijh Miles  in Compafs. Upon this Circuit, there were foon built many fair Houfes, to near the Number of fifty. RockfdaJe  was alfo enclofed with a crofs Palifade, near four Miles in  Length ; and there were many Houfes, planted along the  Pale, within which their Hogs and Cattle had twenty Miles  Circuit to graze in fecurely. I T will not be thought, I believe, foreign to the Hiftory  of Virginia, occafionally to interfperfe fome Account of  the Fortunes of Sir Walter Ralegh, our Founder, and the  firft Author, to the Englijh, of fettling Colonies in America.  Juft before the Death of Queen Elifaheth, he received a  Challenge, upon fome Quarrel, from Sir Amias Prejion,  one of EJfex's Followers, and a Man of the Sword ; which  however was made up, by the Mediation of a certain great  Nobleman, before it came to the laft Decifion. But on this  Occafion, Sir Walter, like a prudent and affedtionate Father of a Family, had conveyed all his landed Eftate, which  confifted of about three thoufand Pounds a Year, to his  Wife and Son. This was fortunately a Bar to his Lands  falling abfolutely to the Crown, upon his Attainder. They  were only forfeited for his own Life ; and the King, upon  fome powerful Interceffion, reftored them to him again. So  that he lived, under his Confinement, with much Elegancy, Neatnefs, and Affluence. For he was naturally a great  Lover of Propriety ; and had been, in the Time of his  Profperity, both in his Drefs and Equipage, one of the moft  fumptuous and polite Perfons of the Age. And now, being  cut oiF from all the active Parts of Life, he indulged and  gave a Loofe to his noble Genius, and natural Thirft of  Knowledge ; and feemed (to ufe Prince Henry's Allufion)  a finging Bird in a Cage ; rather a Philofopher, than a Captive ; a Student in a Library, than a Prifoner in the Tower.  The Reftraint of his Body was fo far from damping and  confining his native Greatnefs of Mind and Sublimity of  Parts, that it only opened a new Field of Glory to him,  and rendered him as illuftrious, in this ftill and fedentary  Scene of Life, as he had before been, in his moft aSive and  profperous Days. But at laft, the Lawyers pretended to find 126 <r>&^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book III. 1611. find fome Flaw in the Conveyance of his Lands ; and an In- ' V ' formation was exhibited againft him, in the Court of ^k- Sir noma! chequer. His chief Judge, we are told, was his greateft  Gati!, Go- Enemy . which, I fuppofe, was Sir Edward Coke^ then  """"''■ Lord Chief Juftice. For that famous Lawyer, notwithftanding his vaft Abilities and Knowledge in the Common  Law, will be branded to all Futurity, for bawling and railing Sir Walter Ralegh out of his Life at his Trial. And  Wilfon, a contemporary Hiftorian, tells us, thai it was popularly objefted to him, as a Judge ; That he made the  Law lean too much to his own Opinion, thereby becoming  a legal Tyrant, and ftriking, whom he pleafed, with that  Weapon, whofe Edge he was able to turn any Way.  When the Caufe came to Trial, it was determined againft  Sir Walter Ralegh, only for the Want of one fingle Word  in his Anfwer, fetting forth that Conveyance ; which was  neverthelefs an Overfight of the Clerk, and the Word was  in the original Inftrument. And thus was he moft iniquitoufly deprived of his Lands ; and upon Lady Ralegh's paffionate Application to the King, flie could obtain no other  Anfwer from him, but I mun have the Land, I mun have  it for Car. It was accordingly conferred upon that Favourite, juft then in his Rife ; and Sir Walter wrote him a  Letter upon the Occafion, which may be feen in his Life,  by Mr. Oldys ; and which may be placed, perhaps, among  the moft beautiful, wife, and pathetic Compofitions, that  ever has appeared of that Kind. So invariable was this Monarch in his wrong Judgment of Men and Things, as to  aggrandize and enrich fo infignificant a Tool, and one fo  infamoufly wicked, lewd, and infufficient, as Car, with the  Spoils of a Perfon, fo truly virtuous, great, and able, as  Sir Walter Ralegh. As if Fortune had confpired to expofe  his Weaknefs, and render his Injuftice the more confpicuous and remarkable, by the Contraft between the Man, he  opprefled, and the Man, he advanced. However, as fome  Retaliation for the Injuftice and Wrong, his Majefty afterwards gave Lady Ralegh and her Son eight Thoufand  Pounds for the Eftate.  i6ia. Captain Matthew Somers and his Company, at their  Return to England with Sir George's Body, had made very  advantageous Relations of Bermudas. But thefe were little  credited at firft, and looked upon, as mere Traveller's  Tales ; till fome of the Virginia Company apprehended,  that a Settlement there might be very beneficial and helpful  to the Plantation in Virginia. But as by their former Letters-patent, they were only entitled to the Iflands within an  hundred Miles of their Coaft, and as Bermudas lay much beyond Boole III. rhe History of VIRGINIA. beyond that Diftance, they procured a new Charter from  his Majefty, bearing Date March 12, 1611-12. This  granted them all the Illands in the Ocean Seas, within three  hundred Leagues of the Coaft, between the one and fortieth  and thirtieth Degrees of Northerly Latitude. It alfo gave  them a Power, to fet up Lotteries ; to fue for the Monies  ■ fubfcribed, requiring the Judges, to favour and further the  faid Suits, fo far forth, as Law and Equity would, in any  wife, further and permit ; together with other ample Privileges and Authorities, as may be more fully feen in the  Charter at large, printed in the Appendix. But the Firginta Company fold thefe Iflands to about an hundred and  twenty of their own Members, who were erefted into a  diflinit Society and Body Corporate, by the Name of the  Somer-IJlands Company. Sir Thomas Smith was elefted  their Treafurer, or Governor, in England; and fome time  this Year 161 2, Mr. Richard More was fent Governor of  the Country, with fixty Men, to make a Settlement and  Plantation. They found the three Men, before fpoken of,  lufty and well. They were very comfortably feated, and  plentifully ftored with divers Sorts of excellent Provilions.  But under Colour, that they were fitted out, at the Charge,  and in the Service of the Company, thefe three poor Men  were profecuted, tormented, and threatned by the Governor, in the Company's Name, 'till they were entirely deprived of their great Treafure of Ambergreafe. However  a great Part was embezzled by Captain Davies and Mr.  Edwin Kendal^ to whom they committed it, during the  Squabble and Contention. So that not above a Third came  into the Hands of the Company; for which, we are told,  they afterwards compounded with the Finders, and made  them a juft and reafonable Satisfaftion. I N the Beginning of the fame Year, two Ships arrived  in Virginia, with a Supply of Provifions and fourfcore Men.  But thefe Provifions, according to Cuftom, were very fcanty  and infufficient ; and therefore Capt. Argall, who commanded one of the Ships, having recreated and refreftied his  Company, was fent to Patowmack River, to trade for Corn.  For the Indians about yames-Town were in a ticklifh State,  and little to be depended upon ; being Friends or Foes, according as they found Advantage and Opportunity. Captain  Argall foon entered into a great Acquaintance and Friendfliip with Japazaws, King of Patowmack, an old Friend to  Captain Smith, and fo to the whole Englijh Nation, ever  fince the firfl: Difcovery of the Country. Hard by Patowmack, Pocahontas lay concealed, thinking herfelf fafe, and  unknown to all but trufty Friends. What was the Reafon of  128 The History of VIRGINIA. Book III. i6ia. of her abfconding from Werowocomaco, cannot eafily be "^— > 'judged ; except it was to withdraw herfelf from being a Sir Tboma, Witnefs to the frequent Butcheries of the Englijh, whofe  ™ ^°' Folly and Raftinefs, after Smith's Departure, put it out of  her Power to fave them. Captain Argall, having got Intelligence of this, engaged to give Japazaws a Copper Kettle, to bring her on board his Ship ; promifing not to hurt  her, but to keep her fafe, 'till they could conclude a Peace  with her Father. This Savage would have done any thing  for the Copper Kettle ; and therefore, having no Pretence  on Account of her own Curiofity,.becaufe fhe had feen and  been in many Ships, he made his Wife pretend, how defirous fhe was to fee one, fo that he offered to beat her for  her Importunity, 'till fhe wept. But at lafl he told her, if  Pacahantas would go with her, he was content. And  thus, taking Advantage of her Good-nature and obliging  Temper, they betrayed this innocent Creature aboard ;  where they were all kindly received and entertained in the  Cabbin. The Captain, when he faw.his Time, decoy'd  Pocahontas into the Gun Room ; only to conceal from her,  that Japazaws was any way guilty of her Captivity. When  he had received his Reward, the Captain fent for her again ;  and told her, fhe mufl: go with him, and be the Means and  Inflrument of Peace, between her Country and the Englijh.  At this, the old Traitor and his Wife began to howl and  cry, as much as Pocahontas ; who, by the Captain's fair  Promifes and Perfuafions, pacified herfelf, by degrees. And  fo Japazaws and his Wife, with their Kettle and other  Baubles, went joyfully afhore, and fhe to James-Town ;  where, altho' a frequent Vifitant before, and often a kind  Support and Preferver of the Colony, fhe had never been  'till now, fince Captain Smith left the Country. A MefTenger was immediately difpatched to her Father ;  that he muft ranfom his Daughter Pocahontas^ whom he  loved fo dearly, with the Men, Guns, and Tools of the  Englijh, which he had treacheroufly flolen and furprifed.  This unwelcome News much troubled Powhatan, becaufe  he loved both his Daughter and their Commodities well ;  and it threw him into fuch Perplexity, that it was three  Months, before he returned any Anfwer. Then he fent  back feven of the Englijh, with each an unferviceable  Mufket ; and fent Word, that when they fhould deliver his  Daughter, he would make full Satisfaction for all Injuries, and  give them five hundred Bufhels of Corn, and would be  their Friend for ever. But the Englijh anfwered ; That  his Daughter fhould be well ufed ; but that they could not  believe, the reft of their Arms were either loft, or ftolen from Book III. r^6> History 0/ VIRGINIA. 129 from him ; and that therefore, they would keep his Daugh- i Sifter, till he had fent them all back. But this Anfwer dif- '~— \ ' pleafed him fo much, that they heard no more from him, ^'" Thomas  for a long time after. ^^f2°°" At laft, in the Beginning of the next Year, Sir Thomas 161 3.  Dale took Pocahontas with him, and went in Captain Ar~  galPs Ship, with fome other Veflels belonging to the Colony, up into his own River, to his chief Habitation at Werowocomoco^ with a Party of an hundred and fifty Men,  well appointed. Powhatan did not appear ; and although  the Englijh told them, their Bufinefs was to deliver up their  Emperor's Daughter, upon Reftitution of the reft of their  Men and Arms, yet were they received with many fcornful Bravades and Threats. They told them, if they came  to fight, they were welcome ; but advifed them, as they  loved their Lives, to retire ; or elfe they would treat them,  as they had done Captain Ratcliffe. But after fome fmall  Skirmifhes, and confiderable Damage done the Indians,  by burning their Houfes, and fpoiling all, they could find,  a Peace was patched up. ' They immediately fent Meffengers to Powhatan ; and they told the Englijh., that their  Men were run off, for fear they ihould hang them ; but  that Powhatan's Men were run after, to bring them back ;  and that their Swords and Mufkets fhould be brought, the  next Day. But the Englijh, perceiving, that this was all  Collufion, only to delay the Time, till they could carry ofF  their Goods and Provifions, told them, that they fhould  have a Truce, till the next Day at Noon ; but then, if  they had not a dire<9: Anfwer to their Demands, or found  them inclinable to fight, they ihould know, when the Englijh would begin, by the Sound of their Drums and Trumpets. Upon Confidence of this Truce, two of Powhatan's  Sons came on board the Ship, to fee their Sifter; on whofe  Sight, finding her well, although they had heard the contrary, they greatly rejoiced ; and they promifed to perfuade  their Father, to redeem her, and for ever be Friends with  the Englijh. Hereupon Mr. John Rolfe and Mr. Sparks  were fent to Powhatan, to acquaint him with the Bufinefs.  They were kindly received and entertained, but not admitted into the Prefence of the Emperor. They only fpoke  with Opechancanough, who promifed to do his utmoft with  his Brother, to incline him to Peace and Friendftiip. But  it now being April, and Time to prepare their Ground, and  fet their Corn, they returned to "James-Town, without doing any thing more in the Affair. Long before this, Mr. John Rolfe, a worthy young Gentleman, and of good Behaviour, had been in Love with 19 K Pocahontas, 130 The History of VIRGINIA. Book III. .613. Pocahontas, and {he with him. And at this time, he made ■ , ■ the thing known to Sir Thomas Dak, through Mr. Ralph Sir Thomas Hamer, and wrote him a Letter, entreating his Advice ;  Gatts, Go- ^j^j ^g likewife acquainted her Brother with it. Sir Tho""""'■■ mas Dale highly approved of it ; and the Report of this  Marriage foon coming to the Knowledge of Powhatan, it  was found a thing acceptable to him, by his fudden Confent. For within ten Days, he fent Opachifco, an old  Uncle of hers, and two of his Sons, to fee the Manner of  the Marriage, and to do in that Behalf, what they were  required, for the Confirmation of it, as his Deputies. It  was therefore folemnifed in the Beginning of Jpril 1613 ;  and ever after, they had friendly Trade and Commerce, as  well with Powhatan himfelf, as with all his Subjedls, The Chickahominies were a ftbut, daring, and free People. They had no Werowance, or fingle Ruler, but were  governed, in a Republican Form, by their Elders. Thefe  were their Priefts, and fome of the wifeft of their old Men,  as Affiftants to them. In Confequence of thefe Principles  of Government, they took all Opportunities of fhaking, off  Powhatan's Yoke, whom they looked upon and hated, as  a Tyrant. And therefore, they had taken Advantage of  thefe late Times of Hoftility and Danger as well to the  Indians, as to the Englijh, to affert their Liberty. But  now, feeing Powhatan fo clofely linked with the Englijh,  both in Affinity and Friendship, they were in great Concern  and Dread, left he fhould bring them again to his Subjection. To prevent which, they fent Ambaffadors to Sir  Thomas Dale ; excufing all former Injuries, and promifing  ever after to be King James's faithful Subjedls : That they  would relinquifh the Name of Chickahominies, and be called  Tajfautejfus, or Englijhmen, and that Sir Thomas Dale fliould  be their Governor, as the King's Deputy. Only they defired to be governed by their own Laws, under their eight  Elders, as his Subftitutes. Sir Thomas Dale, hoping for  fome Advantage from this, willingly accepted their Offer.  At the Day appointed, with Captain Argall and fifty Men,  he went to Chickahominy ; where he found the People afaflembled, expecting his Coming. They treated him kindly ; and the next Morning, having held a Council, the  Peace was concluded on thefe Conditions : I. That they fhould for ever be called Englijhmen, and  be true Subjeds to King James and his Deputies : II. That they fhould neither kill, nor detain, any of  the Englijh, or of their Cattle, but fhould bring them  home : m. That Book III. The History of VIRGINIA. 131 III. That they fhould be always ready, to furnifh the >6i3- EngUJh with three hundred Men, againft the Spaniards, or "— -. ' any other Enemy : Sir Thomas IV. That they fhould not enter any of the Englijh ^^^^^^  Towns, before fending in Word, that they were new Englijhmen : V. That every fighting Man, at gathering their Corn,  fhould bring two Bufhels to the Store, as a Tribute ; for  which he fhould receive as many Hatchets : VI. That the eight chief Men fhould fee all this performed, or receive the Punifhment themfelves ; and for  their Diligence, they fhould have a 'red Coat, a Copper  Chain, and King James's Pifture, and be accounted his  Nobleman. These Articles were joyfully afTented to and ratified,  by a great Shout and Acclamation ; and one of their. Elders  began an Oration, addreffing his Speech, firfl: to the old  Men, then to the Young, and then to the Women and  Children, to make them underfland, how flricStly they were  to obferve thefe Conditions, and that then the EngUJh would  defend them from the Fury of Powhatan, or any other Enemy whatfoever. And thus was their Liberty once more  fecured ; which indeed had its ufual good EfFedis, even among thefe wild and favage Nations. For altho' Chickahominy is far from being famous for good Land, yet we are  told, that they had the largefl Fields, and moft plentiful  Crops of Corn, and the greatefl Abundance of all other  Provifions and NecefTaries, of any People then in the Country. Such a happy Influence had Liberty, and fuch vifible  Incitement did firm Property give to the Induflry of even  that lazy and improvident Pebple. And now the EngUJh began to find the Miftake of forbidding and preventing private Property. For whilfl they  all laboured jointly together, and were fed out of the common Store, happy was he, that could flip from his Labour,  or flubber over his Work in any Manner. Neither had  they any Concern about the Increafe ; prefuming, however  the Crop profpered, that the publick Store mufl ftill maintain them. Even the mofl honeft and induflrious would  fcarcely take fo much true Pains in a Week, as they  would have done for themfelves in a Day. The five Years  alfo, prefcribed in his Majefly's Inflru<9:ions under the Privy  Spal, for trading all together in common Stocks, and bringing the whole Fruit of their Labours into common Storehoufes, were now expired. Therefore, to prevent this Inconveniency and bad Confequence, Sir Thomas Dale allotted K 2 each 132 The History of VIRGINIA. Book III. 1613. each Man three Acres of cleared Ground, in the Nature • . 'of Farms. They were to work eleven Months for the Sir Thomas Store, and had two Bufliels of Corn from thence ; and only  «rnor ^°" ^^^ ^"^ Month allowed them, to make the reft of their Provifions. This was certainly very hard and pinching ;  but his new and favourite Settlement at Bermudas Hundred  had better Conditions. For one Month's Labour, which  muft neither be in Seed-time nor Harveft, they were exempted from all further Service ; and for this Exemption  they only paid two Barrels and a half of Corn, as a Yearly  Tribute to the Store. However, the Profpea of.thefe Farmers Labours gave the Colony much Content ; and they  were no longer in Fear of wanting, either for themfelves,  or to entertain their new Supplies. Sir Thomas Dale had been very aftive and induftrious  in ranging about and viewing the Country, and was vaftly  delighted with its Pleafantnefs and Fertility. Being therefore much vexed and concerned, to find the Poffeffion of  fo noble a Territory fet fo light by at home, as even fometimes to be debated, whether it fhould be farther profecuted, or entirely abandoned, he wrote a Letter to Sir Thomas Smith, the Treafurer ; wherein he affures them all,  and prays them to remember it, that if they fliould give  over the Enterprife, and lofe the Country, they would, in  their great Wifdom, commit an Error of fuch Prejudice  and Damage to England, as had never happened to it, fince  the Lofs of the Kingdom of France. He defires them not  to be gulled and deceived, by the clamorous Reports of  bafe People, but to believe Caleb and Jofliua. And if the  Glory of God, and the Converfion of thofe poor Infidels,  had no Influence on the rich Mammons of the Earth ; yet  he advifes them to follow the Didiates qf their own Avarice,  and only to confult their proper Intereft and Advantage.  For he protefts on the Faith of an honeft Man, that the  more he ranged and faw of the Country, the more he admired it ; and that having feen the beft Parts of Europe,  yet he declares, with a folemn Affeveration, that put them  all together, he thought, this Country would be equivalent  to them, if it were once well cultivated, and feated with  good and induftrious People. 1614. Early in the next Year, Sir Thomas Gates returned to  ^^.^^^^^^^z England, and left the Government again to Sir Thomas  Sir Thomas Dale. Underftanding, that there was a Colony of French,  Dale, Go- in the Northern Part of Virginia, about the Latitude of  vernor. ^^^ j^^ ^^^^ Captain Argall thither, to Port Royal and St. Croix, two Towns, lying on each Side of the Bay of Fundi, in Acadia. Finding the French difperfed abroad in the Woods, Book III. rbe History of VIRGINIA. Woods, he furprifed their Ship and Bark, lately arrived  from France. In them was much good Apparel, with other ^  Furniture and Provifion, which he brought to James-Town ;Sir riomaj  Da/e, Gd- but the Men efcaped, and lived among the Indians of thofe y„„or.  Countries. The Pretence for this Depredation on the  French, was founded on their Right of firft Difcovery ;  and therefore the Englijh, in Imitation of the Spaniards,  laid Claim to the whole Continent, altho' they really poffeffed, and had feated fo fmall a Part of it. But it is certain, that we were, at that time, in profound Peace, not  only with France, but the whole World. In his Return,  Captain Jrgall likewife vifited the Dutch Settlement, on  Hudfon's River ; and he alledged, that Captain Hudfon, the  firft Difcoverer, under whofe Sale they claimed that Country, being an Englijhman, and licenfed to difcover thofe  Northern Parts, by the King of England, could not alienate  that, which was only a Part of Virginia, from the Englijh  Crown. He therefore demanded the Poffeflion ; and the  Dutch Governor, being unable to refift, peaceably fubmitted both himfelf and his Colony, to the King of England,  and to the Governor of Virginia ^under him. Soon after,  a new Governor arrived from Amjlerdam, better provided.  Under Colour of their Right of Purchafe, and becaufe the  Country lay void and unoccupied, and confequently open  to the firft Poffeflbr, he not only refufed to pay the Tribute  and Acknowledgment, which had been agreed upon, but  alfo began to fortify, and put himfelf into a Pofture- of Defence. And the Claim of the Englijh, being either wholly  waved for the prefent, or but faintly purfued, they, this  fame Year, made a firm Settlement, which foon became  very flourifliing and populous. But Complaint being made,  fome Years after, to King Charles I. and by him reprefented to the States of Holland, they declared, by a publick  Inftrument, that they were no ways concerned in it, but  that it was a private Undertaking of the Weji-India Company of Amjierdatn ; and fo referred it wholly to his Majefty's Pleafure. M R . Ralph Hamer, who was afterwards one of our  Council, and to whofe Relation we are indebted for this  Part of the Hiftory of Virginia, having refided fome Years  here, ever fince the great Supply 1609, and being now about to return to England, was very defirous to vifit Powhatan and his Court, and to be able, when he went home,  to fpeak fomething of his own Knowledge. Sir Thomas  Dale alfo thought it advifeable, to have fome further Pledge  of Powhatan's Friendfhip, befides Pocahontas. It was therefore refolved, to fend this Gentleman, as his Ambaflador, K3 to 134 '^^^ History of VIRGINIA. Book III. *6i4- to demand his other Daughter. Wherefore, Mr. Hamer, "— V 'taking Thomas Savage for his Interpreter, and two Indians Sir Tbomai for Yiis Guides, went off in the Morning from Bermudas,  «fnor ^°' (Sir Thomas Dale's favourite Seat, and chief Place of Refidence) and arrived the next Evening at Matchot. This  was a Seat of the King's, where he then was, a few Miles  higher up York River, than Werowocomoco. Powhatan  knew the Boy, Thomas Savage, well, whom Newport had  prefented to him, in the Year 1607 ; and he faid to him:  My Child, you were my Boy, and I gave you Leave, four  Tears ago, to go and fee your Friends ; but I have never feen  nor heard of you; nor my own Man Namontack fnce, altho'  many Ships have gone and returned. Then turning to Mr.  Hamer, he demanded the Chain of Pearl, which he fent  to Sir Thomas Dale, when the Peace 'was concluded ; and  which was to be a Token between them, whenever Sir  Thomas fent a Meffenger to him ; otherwife, he was to  bind him, and fend him back, as a Deferter. It was true,  there was fuch an Agreement ; and Sir Thomas Dale had  ordered his Page to deliver the Chain to Mr. Hamer, but  the Page either neglected or forgot it. Mr. Hamer therefore replied, that he knew not of any fuch Order ; and if  there was fuch a Token, it was only intended, when Sir  Thomas, upon the fudden, fliould fend an Englijh Meffenger, without an Indian Guide. But if his own People  fliould conduct the Meffenger, which was the Cafe at prefent, that was a fufficient Teftimony and Credential. With  this Anfwer Powhdtan was falisfied, and conduced them to  his Hoirfe, where a Guard of two hundred Bowmen attended. Firft he offered Mr. Hamer a Pipe of Tobacco, and  then afked after his Brother, Sir Thomas Dale's Health ;  and how his Daughter, and unknown Son, lived and liked.  And being told, that his Brother was well ; and that his  Daughter was fo delighted with her Condition, that fhe  would not, upon any Account, return and live again with  him, he laughed heartily, and feemed much pleafed to hear  it. After that, he demanded of Mr. Hamer his Bufinefs;  who telling him, that it was private, he inftantly commanded all out of the Houfe, except his two Queens, that  always fat by him, and then bad him fpeak on. Mr. Hamer firft prefented him with feveral Toys, fent by Sir Thomas Dale ; and then he told him, that his Brother Dale,  having heard of the Fame of his youngeft Daughter, intended to marry her to fome worthy Englijh Gentleman,  which would be highly pleafing and agreeable to her Sifter,  who was very defirous to fee her, and to have her near her;  Book III. Tbe History of VIRGINIA. her ; and that therefore, he defired, as a Teftimony of his  Love, that he would fend her to him. For fince they were  now become one People, and defigned to dwell together in Sir W^'"  the fame Country, he conceived, there could be no firmer yernor.  Union, nor ftronger Affurance of Love and Friendfhip,  than fuch a natural Band of Intermarriage and Alliance.  Powhatan, who often interrupted him, and betrayed many  Signs of Uneafinefs, the whole Time, he was fpeaking,  immediately returned this Anfwer, with much Serioufnefs  and Gravity. / gladly accept my Brother's Salute of Love and Peace;  which, whil/i I live, I will punSiually and exaSily keep, I  likewife receive his Prefents, as Pledges thereof, with no lefs  Thankfulnefs. But as to my Daughter, I fold her, a few  Days fince, to a great IVerowance, for two Bujhels of Roanoke.  Mr. Hamer told him, that the Roanoke was but a Trifle  to fo great a Prince ; and by returning it, he might recall  her, and gratify his Brother. And he further aflured him,  befides ftrengthening the ftridl Band of Peace and Friendfhip  between them, that he ihould have three times the Worth  of the Roanoke for her, in Beads, Copper, and- other Commodities. This extorted the Truth from him ; and he ingenuoufly confefled, that the Reafon of his Refufal, was  the Love, he bore his Daughter. Altho' he had many  Children, yet he delighted in none, he faid, fo much as  her ; and he could not poflibly live without often feeing her ;  which he could not do, if flie lived among the Englijh.  For he had determined, upon no Terms, to put himfelf into their Hands, or come among them. He therefore defired him, to urge him no farther upon the Subje<S, but to  return his Brother this Anfwer : That he held it not a brotherly Part, to endeavour to bereave him of his two darling  Children at once : That, for his Part, he defired no farther  jijfurance of his Friendjhip, than the Promife, he had given :  and. That from him. Sir Thomas already had a Pledge, one  of his Daughters, which, as long as Jhe lived, would be fufficient ; but if Jhe Jhould happen to die, he promifed to give  another. AnS further, fays he, tell him, altho' he had no  Pledge at all, yet he need not dijiruji any Injury from me or  my People. There hath been enough of Blood and War. Too  many have been fiain already, on both Sides ; and, by my Occafion, there Jhail never he more. I, who have Power to perform it, have faid it. I am now grown old, and would gladly  end my Days in Peace and ^uietnefs ; and altho' I Jhould have  juji Caufe of Refentment, yet my Country is large enough, and  I can go from you. And this Anfwer, I hope, will fatisfy  my Brother. K 4 Whilst  "The History of VIRGINIA. Book III. Whilst Mr. Hamer ftaid here, by Chance there came  - T an Englijhman, who had been taken, three Years before,  SiY Thomas ^^ fgrf Henry, on the Mouth of Hampton River. He was  DaU, Go- ^o^n fo like an Indian, both in Complexion and Habit,  '""'°"'' that he could be diftinguiflied from them by nothing but his  Language. He begged of Mr. Hamer, to procure his Liberty ; which, with much Difficulty, he did. And now  being about to return, Powhatan defired him, to put his  Brother Dale in Mind, to fend him feveral Toys and Tools ;  which, left he fliould forget, he made him write them down,  in a Table-Book, that he had. However he got it, it was  a very fair one ; and Mr. Hamer defired, he would give it  to him. But be told him, he could not part with it : For  it did him much Good, in (hewing to Strangers. After  which, having furnifhed them well with Provifions, he difmiffed them ; giving each a Buckfkin, extremely well dreffed, and fending two more, to his Son and Daughter. All this while. Sir Thomas Dale, Mr. JVhitaker, Minifter of Bermuda-Hundred, and. Mr. Rolfe, her Hufband,  were very careful and affiduous, in inftru(9:ing Pocahontas in  the Chriftian Religion ; and flie, on her Part, expreffed an  eager Defire, and fliewed great Capacity injearning. After  flie had been tutored -io'c fome time, flie openly renounced  the Idolatry of her Country, confeffed the Faith of Chrift,  and was baptized by the Name of Rebecca. But her real  Name, it feems, was originally Matoax ; which the Indians  carefully concealed from the Englijh, and changed it to Pocahontas, out of a fuperftitious . Fear, left they, by the  Knowledge of her true Name, ftiould be enabled to do her  fome Hurt. She was the firft Chriftian Indian in thefe Parts,  and perhaps the fincereft and moft worthy, that has ever  been fince. And now fhe had no Manner of Defire, to return to her Father ; neither could ftie well endure the brutifti Manners, or Society, of her own Nation. Her Affection to her Hufband was extremely conftant and true-; and  he, on the other Hand, underwent great Torment and Pain,  out of his violent Paflion, and tender SoUicitu^e for her. Whilst thefe things were tranfafting in Virginia,  Captain Smithes reftlefs and enterprifing Genius could not  brook a Life of Indolence and Inaiftivity at home. He therefore undertook a Voyage for fome Merchants, to that Part  of Virginia, which had befen difcovered by Captain Gofnold, in the Year i6o2. Having made an advantageous  Voyage for his Owners, ^nd taken an exad: Chart of the  Coaft, he then firft called the Country New-England. This  Name was afterwards confirmed and eftablifhed by Prince  Charles, who likewife, at Captain Smith's Defire, gave Names  Book III. The History of VIRGINIA. Names to feveral Places and Rivers along the Coaft, from  Cape Cod as far as the Bay of Fundi. It was refolved, to ^  fettle the Country immediately, under the Condudt of Cap-^''y''*°"""  tain Smith ; who was graced with the empty Title of Ad- yernor  miral of Mew-England. But he meeting with many crofs  Accidents the next Year, and being at laft taken by a French  Rover, the Projecft became abortive ; and it was the Year  1620, before any Settlement was made there. This Year alfo, Sir Walter Ralegh firft publiflied his  Hiftory of the World ; which was received with all due  Applaufe and Admiration by the Publick, but gave Umbrage, we are told, to the King. Some Authors have infinuated, that that Royal Pedant was piqued, as an Author,  and jealous of him in that Capacity. As if it would ever  come into any Man's Head, to put that admirable Work  in the Ballance with his old-wififh Garrulities ; which are  now only to be found in the Colle£lions of the Curious, as  a comic and ridiculous Entertainment, and a proper Subjefl: for Laughter and Contempt. Others fay, that he was  fcandalized at the Freedom, which Sir Walter Ralegh had  taken with fome dead Princes, and particularly with Henry  VIII ; thinking it perhaps an unpardonable Infolence, and a  Kind of Blafphemy, that any, below a Crowned Head,  fhould dare to cenfure their Aftions. Whilft others tell us,  that, through the mifchievous Iniinuations of fome Sycophants about him, he fufpe£ted, that it contained an artful  Expofure of himfelf and Miniftry. And thus truly, as Mr.  Oldys obferves, the General Hiftory of the World was turned into a fecret Hiftory, or oblique Satire, upon his Court ;  and Scotch Faces were to be feen in it, ftuck upon old Jewijh, Babylonian, or AJfyrian Shoulders. Altho', as it is remarked by another Author, he might eafily be led to fancy,  he faw in the Face of Ninias, the Son of Semiramis, his  own Features, as Succeflbr to the Britijh Semiramis ; and  that his particular Injuftice, to the Writer, was well reprefented and cenfured, in the Story of Ahab's taking away  Naboth's Vineyard. But from whatever Caufe his Offence  arofe, I thought, it would not be unacceptable to the Reader, to make this ftiort Digreflion, to the Honour of that  immortal Work. For next to the Praife and Approbation  of the Wife, it hath been ever efteemed a fecondary Honour to an Author, to be carped at, by the foolifh Cavils,  and vain Exceptions, of thofe of a contrary Charadler. In "June, Captain Argall fet Sail for England^ and gave an Account of the quiet and flourifhing State of the Colony; which Report was ftrengthened by the Teftimony of Sir Thomas Gates., who had returned from Virginia, the March "^ before.  Dale, Go- The History of VIRGINIA. Bcfok III. before. To back this Succefs with all Expedition, the  Council and Company refolved, that the great Virginia  Sir Tbcmas Lottery fhould be drawn, with all convenient Speed ; which  ^'"' was accordingly done, the following Year 1615. The  fame Year, a Spanijh Ship was feen to beat to and fro, off  Point Comfort ; and at laft, flie fent a Boat afliore, for a Pilot.  Captain Daviet, the Governor of the Fort, readily granted  one, and fent Mr. John Clarke ; who was no fooner on  board, but they fet Sail, and carried him off to Spain. He  was there ftrongly follicited, to become their Inftrument  and Pilot, to betray the Colony. But he bravely and honeftly refilled all their Temptations ; and was, therefore,  obliged to undergo a long Captivity. At laft, after four  Years Imprifonment, he was, with much Suit, returned to  England. But the Spanijh Ship, by fome Accident, left  three of her own Men behind ; who were immediately  feized, and ftridily examined. They faid, that having loft  their Admiral, they were forced into thefe Parts ; and that  two of them were Captains, and in chief Authority in the  Fleet. But fometime after, one was difcovered to be an  Englijhman ; who had been a Pilot in the Spanijh Armada.^  in the grand Expedition againft England., in the Year 1588.  And not content with this Perfidy and Bafenefs to his Country, he began here to plot, and perfuaded fome Malecontents, to join with him, in running away with a fmall Bark.  But they were apprehended, and fome of them executed ;  and he, now lying at Mercy, readily confeffed, that there  were two or three Spanijh Ships at Sea, fent purpofely to  difcover the State of the Colony. But he faid, their CommiiEon was not to be opened, 'till they arrived in the Bay j  fo that, of any thing further he was utterly ignorant. One  of the Spaniards died here, and the other was fent to England. But this Renegado was hanged at Sea, by Sir Thomas Dale., in his Voyage homeward. For Sir Thomas Dale had now been five Years in the  Country ; and he had been, for fome time paft, kept here,  and fupported under a longing Defire to vifit his own Affairs  and Family, by a juft Senfe of his Duty to God and his  Country, and out of Compaffion to the poor Creatures committed to his Charge. But now the Country being in perfect Peace, and having fettled all things in good Order,  and made Choice of Mr. George Yeardley., to be DeputyGovernor in his Abfence, he embarked for England., with  Pocahontas and Mr. Rolfe her Hufband ; and carrying with  them feveral young Indians of both Sexes, they all arrived  fafe at Plimouth., the 12th ol June., i6r6. But at the time  of his Daughter's Departure, Powhatan had withdrawn himfelf 1616. George  Teardley,  Governor, Book III. -r>6^ History ?/■ VIRGINIA. 139 himfelf to the King of Moy-umps., on Patowmack River ; '6'6- out of Fear, as it was fuppofed, of Opechancanough. For ■— — > ■ he was then a Man very gracious and popular, both with Geo.Ytardthe Indians and the Englijh ; and as Opitchapan, the fecond „qJ  Brother, was lame and decrepit, he was thought to look  upon Powhatan, a Perfon of equal Ambition and Capacity  for Government, as the only Obftacle to his afpiring Hopes  and Defigns. And therefore, Powhatan fufpedted at this  time, that he had entered into a Confpiracy with the Englijh, to betray him into their Hands ; a Cafe, which he had  ever dreaded, and which, he had therefore turned the whole  Force of his Politicks, to prevent and avoid. This worthy and honourable Knight, Sir Thomas Dale,  who may juftly be ranked among the firft and beft of our  Governors, had, by his Angular Vigor and Induftry, and  by his Judgment and Condufl: of the Affairs of the Colony,  put things into fuch an eafy and profperous Condition, that,  from this Time, an Alteration was made, in the Right of  Adventure for Land. For before this, every one, that had  adventured his own Perfon, or had fent, or brought others  over, at his own Expence, was entitled to an hundred Acres of Land, perfonal Adventure, for each; which was  the utmoft that could be granted in any fingle Share, by  the King's Letters patent, and which are called, in the  Company's Journals, and other old Records, Great Shares,  or Shares of old Adventure. But now it was thought, all  Difficulties were fo far overcome, and the Country fettled  in fuch a Way of fubfifting and flourifhing, that, henceforward, fifty Acres only were allowed to thofe, who came,  or brought others over. This is the ancient, legal, and a  moft indubitable Method of granting Lands in Virginia, and  was intended for a great and ufeful End, the encouraging  People, to come themfelves, and to bring or fend others  over, to inhabit the Country ; and that they might, immediately upon their Arrival, have a Place, whereon to feat  themfelves and Families. And I likewife find, in the old  Records, that upon peopling and faving thefe hundred, or  fifty Acres (the Terms of which I can no where find) they  were entitled to the like Quantity more, to be held, and  feated at their Leifure. But befides this, there were two  other Methods of granting Lands. The one was upon Merit : When any Perfon had conferred a Benefit, or done  Service, to the Company or Colony, they would beftow  fuch a Proportion of Land upon him. However, to prevent Excefs in this Particular, they were reftrained, by his  Majefty's Letters patent, not to exceed twenty great Shares,  or two thoufand Acres, in any of thefe Grants. The other was  Tbe History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book III. was called the Adventure of the Purfe ; every Perfon, who 'paid twelve Pounds ten Shillings into the Company's Trea- Geo. Yeard- fy^y^ having thereby a Title to an hundred Acres of Land, %, Gover- ^^y, ^),gj.g jjj p^irginia, that had not been before granted to, or poffeffed by others. Sir Thomas Dale, among the many Praifes, juftly due  to his Adminiftration, had been particularly careful of the  Supplies of Life ; and had, accordingly, always caufed fo  much Corn to be planted, that the Colony lived in great  Plenty and Abundance. Nay, whereas they had formerly  been conftrained, to buy Corn of the Indians Yearly, which  expofed them to much Scorn and Difficulty, the Cafe was  fo much altered under his Management, that the Indians  fometimes applied to the Englijh, and would fell the very  Skins from their Shoulders for Corn. And to fomc of their  petty Kings, Sir Thomas lent four or five hundred Bufhels ;  for Repayment whereof the next Year, he took a Mortgage of their whole Countries, But as the Cultivation of  Tobacco began to creep in, and to obftruft their Crops of  Corn, he made a Law, that no Tobacco fhould be fet,  'till fuch a Proportion of Corn-Ground, for the Mafter and  each Servant, had been fir ft prepared and planted. And  this was the firft Beginning and Eflay, towards making  Tobacco here, which hath ever fince continued the StapleCommodity of our Country. But after his Departure, both  his Law and his Example were utterly laid by and forgot ;  and the new Governor himfelf, together with all the People, being tempted with the View of prefent Gain, applied  themfelves fo eagerly to planting Tobacco, that they negleded the other neceflary Article of Life. And befides this  Neglecft of their Corn, the Supplies of People, fent this  Year, came, as ufual, fo unprovided, that they foon eafed  them of the Plenty, left by Sir Thomas Dale, and reduced  them to great Streights. Mr. Teardley therefore, fent to  the Chickahominies, for the Tribute Corn. For there being  about two hundred and fifty, or three hundred, fighting  Men of the Nation, and each Man- being obliged, by the  Treaty, to bring two Bufliels of Corn to the Store, fuch a  Quantity would have been a great Relief to their Neceffities.  But receiving a flight and afFrontive Anfwer, he drew together an hundred of his beft Shot, and went to Chickahominy. The People there received him with much Scorn and  Contempt. They told him, he was only Sir Thomas Dale's  Man ; that they had indeed paid his Mafter, according to  Agreement ; but as for him, they had no Order, and lefs  Inchnation, either to obey, or give him any Corn. And beiog  Book.III. rhe History 0/ VIRGINIA. being led by their Captain, Kijfanacomen, Governor of Ozinies, they drew themfelves up, in martial Rank and Or-^  der, as they faw the Englijh do. But after many Remon- ^eo.Ycardftrances, and much Bravade and Threatening on both Sides, ^^J  Mr. Teardley, at laft, commanded his Men to fire upon  them. Twelve were flain, and as many taken Prifoners ;  among whom, were two of their Senators, or Elders. For  their Ranfom, they had an hundred Bufliels ; and the Indians^ to buy their Peace, readily loaded their three Boats  with Corn ; one of which, crowding on, to bring the firft  News to "James-Town^ was unhappily overfet, all her Corn  loft, and eleven Men drowned. Opechancanough^ a politick and haughty Prince, was much  vexed, that neither his Brother, nor he, could ever bring  this obftinate People, firmly to their Obedience. Being,  therefore, as attentive to enflave them, as they were watchful and tenacious of their Liberty, he took this Opportunity,  and agreed with Mr. Teardley, to come to no Terms with  them, without his Advice and Confent. And as the Englijh pafled down the River with their Prifoners, he met  them at Ozinies, and pretended to the Indians, that he had,  with great Pains and Sollicitation, procured their Peace.  To requite which Service, they chearfully proclaimed him  King of their Nation, and flocked, from all Parts, with  Prefents of Beads, Copper, and fuch other Trifles, as were  in Value and Efteem among them. And he was glad to  be content with this precarious Acknowledgment, from a  free and refolute People. But this feafonable and vigorous  Chaftifement of the Chickahominies, and efpecially the ftricSl  League and Friendihip, with Opechancanough, and the whole  Imperial Family, kept the reft of the Indians in fuch Awe  and Dependance, that the Englijh followed their Labours,  with the utmoft Quietnefs and Security. Many alfo of  the Savages daily brought them fuch Provifions, as they  could get ; and would be their Guide's in hunting, and fometimes hunt for them themfelves. And thus, by fuch an Intercourfe and Familiarity, the Englijh and they lived together,  the reft of this Gentleman's Government, as if they had  been one People. And Captain Smith tells us, that Mr.  Yeardley had fome trained to their Pieces to kill him Fowl,  as had likewife feveral other Gentlemen in the Country ;  and that thefe foon' became as dextrous and- expert, as any  of the Englijh. But the Captain's Authority is rendered  very fufpicious in this, by the Records of our General  Court. For long after, the Governor and Council received  fome Queries from England, the fourth whereof was :  What was the Caufe of the Majfacre, and who firji taught the  The History of VIRGINIA. Book III. the Indians the Ufe of Fire Arms ? Whereupon, in a Court  held the ift of November^ 1624, Robert Poole and Edward  Grindon, Gentlemen, ancient Planters and Inhabitants of  the Country, appear, and declare, upon Oath, their Knowledge of the Matter. Their Depofitions entirely clear Mr.  Teardley, and fliew him to have been very cautious and  careful in that Point ; and they throw the whole Blame upon Captain Smith himfelf. Sir Thomas Dale, and fome other  inferior Officers and private Perfons. In the mean while, Pocahontas, or the Lady Rebecca,  as they now affefted to call her, was kindly received in England. She was, by this time, well inftrucSed in Chriftianity, fpoke good and intelligible Englijh, and was become  very civil and ceremonious, after the Englijh Fafliion. She  was likewife delivered of a Son, of which fhe was extremely  fond ; and the Treafurer and Company gave Order, for  the handfome Maintenance of both her and her Child. '  Befides which, her Company was courted, and fhe kindly  treated, by many Perfons of higheft Rank and Quality in  the Nation. There hath been indeed a conftant Tradition,  that the King became jealous, and was highly offended at  Mr. Rolfe, for marrying a Prineefs. That anointed Pedant,  it feems, had fo high an Idea of the fus divinum, and indefeafible Right, of Powhatan, that he held it a great Crime  and Mifdemeanor, for any private Gentleman to mingle  with his Imperial Blood. And he might perhaps likewife  think, confiflently with his own Principles, that the Right  to thefe Dominions would, thereby, be vefled in Mr. Rolfe's  Poflerity. However, it pafTed off, without any farther bad  Confequence, than a little Difpleafure and Murmuring. At the time of Pocahontas's Arrival, Captain Smith was  preparing for a Voyage to New-England. He was much  concerned, that the Suddenefs of his Departure put it out  of his Power, to do her that Service, which he defired, and  fhe well deferved at his Hands. However, being well acquainted at Court, and particularly favoured and countenanced by Prince Charles, he drew up, and prefented to the  Queen, before her Arrival in London, a Reprefentation of  her Cafe and Defert. In this, he exprefTes a deep Senfe of  Gratitude to her ; and fets forth her great AfFeftion, and  many Services, to himfelf, and the whole Englijh Nation :  That by her, their Quarrels had oft been appeafed, their  Wants fupplied, and their Dangers averted : That fhe, under God, had been the chief Inflrument, of preferving the  Colony, and confirming the Settlement : That being taken  Prifoner, fhe had become the Means of a firm Peace and  Alliance, with her Father : That fhe was now married to Book III. T:he History of VIRGINIA. 143 an Englijh Gentleman ; who, however, was not of Abi- i6«6- lity, to make her fit to attend her Majefty : That flie was ' « — — ' the firft Chriftian, that ever was of that Nation ; and the Geo.Ycardfirft Virginian^ that ever fpoke, or became Englijh : That ^^J  being well received^ and honoured by fo great a Queen,  beyond what her fimple Thought could imagine or conceive,  flie might be the Means of adding another Kingdom, to his  Majefty's Dominions ; But by bad Ufage, her prefent Love,  to the Englijh and Chriftianity, might be turned to Scorn  and Fury ; and all the Good, fhe had, or might do, diverted to the worft of Evil. And therefore, he humbly recommends her to her Majefty, as a proper Objedt of her Favour  and Regard, on Account of her Birth, Virtue, Simplicity,  and forlorn Condition in a ftrange Country. But before Captain Smith's Departure, Pocahontas came  up to London. Being offended by the Smoke of the Town,  flie was immediately removed to Brentford; whither Smith,  with feveral of his Friends, went to vifit her. After a cold  and modeft Salutation, flie turned from him in a paflionate  Manner, hid her Face, and could not be brought to fpeak  a Word for two or three Hours. But at laft, fhe began to  talk ; and flie reminded him, of the many Services, flie  had done him, and of the ftridt Promife of Friendfliip, between him and her Father. y««, fays flie, promifed him,  that what was yours., Jhould he his ; and that you and he  would he all one. Being a Stranger in our Country, you called  Powhatan Father ; and /, for the fame Reafon, will now  call you fo. But Captain Smith, knowing the jealous Humour of the Court, durft not allow of that Title, as flie  was a King's Daughter ; and therefore, he endeavoured to  excufe himfelf from it. But flie, with a ftern and fteady  Countenance, faid : Ton were not afraid to come into my Father's Country, and Jirike a Fear into every Body, hut myfelf;  and are you here afraid, to let me call you Father? I tell you  then, I will call you Father, and you Jhall call me Child; and  fo I will for ever be of your Kindred and Country. They  always told us, that you were dead ; and I knew no otherwife,  'till I came to Plimouth. But Powhatan commanded Tomocomo to feekyou out, and know the Truth ; hecaufe your Countrymen are much given to Lying. This Tomocomo (or Uttamaccomqc^, as Smith calls him)  had Matachanna, one of Powhatan'i Daughters, to Wife ;  was one of the chief of his Council, and of their Priefts ;  and was efteemed- a very wife and underftanding Fellow among them. He was therefore fent upon this Voyage, by  Powhatan, to take the Number of the People in England,  and to bring him a full and exaft Account, of their Strength and 144 "^^^ History of VIRGINIA. Book III. 1616. and Condition. And accordingly, being arrived at Plimouth, * V 'he got a long Stick, intending to cut a Notch, for every Geo.reard- Q^^^ he faw. But he w^as foon tired with fuch an endlefs  ^^;°'"'^'"Work, and threw away his Stick; and being alked, by the  King, after his Return, how many People there were ? it  is faid, that he replied: Count the Stars in the Sky, the  Leaves on the Trees, and the Sand upon the Sea Shore ; for  fuch is the Number of the People in England. But Sir Thomas Dale told Mr. Purchas, that he believed him to be fent  by Opechancanough, their King and Governor in Powhatan's  Abfence and Retreat ; and that he was fent, not fo much  to number the People, as to take an Account of their Corn  and Trees. For Namontack, and fuch others, as had been  fent to England formerly, being ignorant and filly, and  having feen little elfe befides London, had reported much of  their Men and Houfes, but thought, they had fmall Store  of Corn and Trees. And it was therefore a general Opinion  among thefe Barbarians, that the Englijh came into their  Country, to get a Supply of thefe ; which might be ftrengthened and confirmed, by their fending large Quantities of  Cedar, Clapboard, and Wainfcot, to England, and by their  continual Want and Eagernefs after Corn. But Tomocomo,  landing in the Wefl, and travelling thence to London, was  foon undeceived, and faw great Caufe, to admire the Englijh Plenty. However, he began to take an Account, until! his Arithmetick failed him. Meeting Captain Smith accidentally in London, they foon renewed their old Acquaintance. He told the' Captain, that Powhatan had commanded  him, to find him out, to fhew him the Englijh God, their  King, Queen, and' Prince ; of which he had told them fo  much. As to God, Captain Smith excufed and explained  the Matter, the beft, he could ; and as to the King, he  told him, that he had already feen him, and fhould fee the  reft, whenever he pleafed. But he denied, that he had feen  the King, 'till, by Circumftances, he was convinced and  fatisfied. And then, with a melancholly Countenance, he  faid : You gave Powhatan a white Dog, which he fed as himfelf-y but your King has given me nothing, and yet I am better, than your white Dog. Such an arch Senfe had this  Barbarian, of the ftingy Treatment, with which he had  been received at Court. However, Pocahontas was eagerly fought, and kindly  entertained every where. Many Courtiers, and others of  his Acquaintance, daily flocked to Captain Smith, to be introduced to her. They generally confeffed, that the Hand  of God did vifibly appear, in her Converfion ; and that they  had feen many Englijh Ladies, worfe favoured, of lefs ex- aa Book III, ne History of VIRGINIA. 145 a6l Proportion, and genteel Carriage, than fhe was. She i6'6- was likewlfe carried to Court, by the Lady Delawarr^ at-' v — ■' tended by the Lord, her Hulband, and divers other Perfons Gco.Teardof Fafhion and Diftincftion. The whole Court were charm- ^^J  ed and furprifed, at the Decency and Grace of her Deportment ; and the King himfelf, and Queen, were pleafed,  honourably to receive and efteem her. The Lady Delawarr, and thofe other Perfons of Quality, alfo waited on  her, to the Malks, Balls, Plays, and other publick Entertainments ; with which fhe was wonderfully pleafed and delighted. And fhe would, doubtlefs, have well deferved, and  fully returned, all this Refpe£t and Kindnefs, had fhe lived  to arrive in Virginia. The Lord Rich was one of the Company in England;  a great and powerful, but a moft defigning, interefled,  and fadlious Member. Not content with that lawful and  regular Advantage, which might be'juftly expefted, in a  due Courfe of Time, from the Entefprife, but aiming at a  fudden and extraordinary Profit, altho' it fhould be, by the  Spoil of the Publick, and Oppreffion of the private Planters, and being likewife egged on and aflifted, by fome corrupt and avaritious Perfons, he thjrew himfelf at the Head  of a Fadion in the Company, and drevy over to his Party,  as many Creatures and Dependents, as he poffibly could.  By their Means and Support, he hoped and endeavoured,  to bear fuch a Sway, both in the Virginia and Somer-IJlands  Company, that the Management of all things at home, and  the Placing all Governors abroad, fhould be entirely in his  Power and Difpofal. And altho' he met with a Check in  his Deligns, from many great and worthy Members, and  a vaft Majority of the whole Companies, yet he did, at  this time, carry a very important Point. Captain Samuel  Jrgall, a Friend and Relation of Sir Thomas Smith, the  Treafurer, was one of Lord Rich's fafteft Friends and Favourites. His Lordfliip therefore, having concerted Matters with him, and entered into a Partnerfhip, procured him  to be ele£led Deputy-Governor of Virginia. And altho'  Martial Law was then the Common Law of the Country,  yet the better to arm and ftrengthen him, with the Exercife of fuch a defpotic Authority, and that no Man here  might dare to open his Mouth againft him, he obtained for  him the Place of Admiral of the Country and Seas adjoining. With thefe Views and Powers, was Captain Argall 1617.  fitted out, and fent to Virginia, in the Beginning of 16 17. v^— y— '  And the Treafurer and Council took Care, for the proper Sam. ArgaU,  Accommodation of Pocahontas and her Hulband, on board Governor.  21 L the 146 Tbe History of VIRGINIA. Book III. 1617- the Admiral Ship. Mr. Rolfe was alfo made Secretary and V ^ — ■' Recorder-General of Virginia^ which Place was now firft &;».^iXfl//, inftituted. But it pleafed God, at Grave/end, to take /•«Governor, cahontas to his Mercy, in about the two and twentieth Year  of her Age. Her unexpeiSted Death caufed not more Sorrow and Concern in the Speftators, than her religious End  gave them Joy and Surprife. For flie died, agreeably to  her Life, a moft fincere and pious Chriftian. Her little Son,  Thomas Rolfe^ was left at Plimouth with Sir Lewis Steukley,  who defired the Care and Education of him. This Gentleman was then Vice-Admiral of the County of Devon ;  but foon after, having feifed Sir Walter Ralegh, and been  guilty of a notable Piece of Treachery towards him, he  drew upon himfelf the publick Scorn and Deteftation. For  however hard or unjuft Kings and Statesmen may be to  thofe Perfons of their Age, who are of the moft eminent  Parts and Virtues, the Publick is generally more candid in  it's Judgments, and apt to refent every Hardftiip or ill Ufage  to fuch Men. Sir Lewis Steukley therefore fell unpitied,  when he was afterwards detedied in corrupt Praftices ; for  which he was obliged to purchafe his Life at the Expence  of his whole Fortune, and at laft died, a poor, defpifed,  and diftradied Beggar. And as thefe Misfortunes happened  foon after this Time, it is not to be fuppofed, that young  Mr. Rolfe long enjoyed the Advantage of his Favour and  kind Intentions. However he was carried up to London,  and there educated by his Uncle Mr. Henry Rolfe, and afterwards became a Perfon of Fortune and DiftinSion in this  Country. He left behind him an only Daughter, who was  married to Col. Robert Boiling ; by whom fhe left an only  Son, the late Major John Boiling, who was Father to the  prefent Col. John Boiling, and feveral Daughters, married  to Col. Richard Randolph, Col. John Fleming, Dr. William  Gay, Mr. Thomas Eldridge, and Mr. James Murray. So  that this Remnant of the Imperial Family of Virginia, which  long ran in a fingle Perfon, is now encreafed and branched  out into a very numerous Progeny. But Governor Argall, with his Vice-Admiral Captain  Ralph Hamer, purfued their Voyage to Virginia, where  they arrived in May. He found all the publickWorks and  Buildings in James-Town fallen to Decay ; not above five  or fix private Houfes fit to be inhabited ; the Market-place,  Streets, and all other fpare Places, planted with Tobacco ;  and the Colony difperfed all about, as every Man could  find the propereft Place, and beft Conveniency, for Planting. But foon after his Arrival, he wrote to England, that  the Colony was in great Peace and Plenty, and the People bufily  Book III. "the History of VIRGINIA. bufily employed, in preparing for their Crops of Corn and  Tobacco. With him returned Tomocomo, who, in our old *  Records, is called by a third Name, Tomakin. Captain *'"'-^''^'''''  Argall fent him immediately to Opechancanough, who came "°'^'  to yames-Town, and received a Prefent, with great Joy  and Thankfulnefs. Tomocomo railed violently againft England, and the Englijh ; and particularly, againft his beft  Friend, Sir Thomas Dale. But all his Reports were fo  clearly difproved before Opechancanough and his Grandees,  that much to the Satisfa£l:ion of the Grandees, he was rejected and difgraced. But Powhatan, all this while, leaving  the Care and Charge of the Government chiefly to Opechancanough, went about from Place to Place, taking his Pleafure, and vifiting the different Parts of his Dominions.  However he ftill continued in good Friendfliip with the Englijh, He greatly lamented the Death of his Daughter ;  but rejoiced, that her Child was living. He alfo, as well  as Opechancanough, ^xpreffed much Defire to fee him ; but  determined, that he ought not to come over, before he was  ftronger. And, this Year, one Mr. Lambert made a great  Difcovery, in the Trade of Planting. For the Method of  curing Tobacco then was in Heaps. But this Gentleman  found out, that it cured better upon Lines ; and therefore  the Governor wrote to the Company, to fend over Line for  that Purpofe. Captain Argall was a Man of Senfe and Indufi:ry ; «6'8.  and therefore, to fecure a Plenty of Provifions, he fent out,  the next Year, a Frigat and a fmall Bark to trade, which  brought near fix hundred Bufhels of Corn, to the great  Relief of the Colony. For the-Company's Servants, that  worked for the Store, were reduced to fifty four. Men,  Women, and Children. But from the Farmers, who were  at Captain ArgaU's Arrival eighty one, and from the Indians, as Tribute, they received annually- above twelve  hundred Bufliels. But this Year, there was a great  Drought, with a dreadful Storm, that poured down Hailflones, eight or nine Inches round, which did much Damage to both Corn and Tobacco. However, what Tobacco could be faved, was made up, the befl: at thyee Shillings a Pound, and the refl at eighteen Pence. The Governor alfo publifhed feveral Edicts : That all Goods fhould  be fold at twenty five per Cent, and Tobacco allowed for  at three Shillings a Pound, and not under nor over, on the  Penalty of three Years Slavery to the Colony : That there  ftiould be no private Trade or Familiarity with the Savages":  That no Indian fhould be taught to fhoot with Guns, on  Pain of Death to Teacher and Learner : That no Perfon L 2 fhould  "The History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book III.  fhould hunt Deer or Hogs, without the Governor's Leave :  That all Hogs, found a fecond time in James-Town, fliould  Sam.yirgall\^^ forfeited to the Colony ; and thofe at Bermuda, ringed :  Governor, ^j^^^ ^^ y^^^ fhould fhoot, except in his own neceflary  Defence againft an Enemy, till a new Supply of Ammunition came in, on Pain of a Year's Slavery : That none  fliould go on board the Ship, then at James-Town, without  the Governor's Leave ; and that no Matters of Ships fhould  fuiFer their Sailers to go aftiore, or talk with the People at  Kicquotan : That every Perfon fliould" go to Church,. Sundays ands Holidays, or lye Neck and Heels that Night, and  be a Slave to the Colony the following Week ; for the fecond Offence, he fliould be a Slave for a Month ; and for  the third, a Year and a Day. The Lord Delawarr, who had withdrawn from the  Government on Account of his Health, and whofe Commiffion, as Captain-General, was fupreme, and fuperfeded  all others, being ardently wiflied for by the Colony, was  now fent by the Council and Company, in a large Ship,  with a Supply of two hundred People. But meeting with  contrary Winds and much bad Weather, many fell fick,  and thirty died. In this Number was the Right Honourable, the Lord Governor himfelf ; a Perfon of a mofl: noble  and generous Difpofition, who had warmly embarked, and  expended much Money, in this Bufinefs, for his Country's  Good. Cambden tells us, that he had been feaflred at the  WeJiern-IJlands, and that his Death was not without fufpicion of Poifon. And I think I have fomewhere feen, that  he died about the Mouth of Delawarr Bay, which thence  took it's Name from him. But being not able, now to recolledl the Authority, I fliall leave it, as I found it, and  not venture pofitively to aiBrm it. After his Death, they  were forced on the Coaft of New-England \ where they  got a Recruit of Wood and Water, and took fuch an Abundance of Fifli and Fowl, as plentifully ferved them to  Virginia. They likewife here met a fmall Frenchman, rich  in Bever and other Furrs, who feafted them with fo great  a Variety of Fifli', Fowl, and Fruits, that they were all  amazed ; little fuipefting, that wild Defert could afford  fuch a wonderful Plenty of delicate and wholefome Food.  This Ship bringing News, that Multitudes were preparing  in England to be fent. Captain Argall called a Council,  and wrote to the Treafurer and Council in England the  State of the Colony ; and what Mifery mufl: neceflarily enfue, if they fent not Provifions, as well as People. And  he likewife reprefented their Want of fkilful Hufl)andmen,  with Shares, Harnefs, and other Implements for Ploughing. For Book III. "Tbe History of VIRGINIA. 149 For their Land was exceeding good, and they had now 1618. about forty Bulls and Oxen, which were wholly idle and^-~~Y ufelefs, for want of Ikilful Men to bring them to Labour. Sam.Argall  However, I find, in our old Records, that fome Ploughs, ''^""°'■•  by this time, were fet to work. One Richard Killingbeci, this Summer, attempting a  fecret Trade with the Indians, was, together with his whole  Company, flain by a Party of the Chickahominies ; who  fearing the Confequences, robbed the Matchacomoco Houfe  of their Town, and fled. This was their Temple and religious Treafury ; held, to the higheft Degree, facred and  inviolable by the Indians. And the Sunday after, they flew  two Boys and three yoiing Children, within a Mile of  yames-Town, while their Parents were at Church. The  Governor therefore fent to Opechancanough, who had the.  Title of their King, and the Power too, as far as Neceffity  conftrained, or it fuited with their Humour or Intereft. But  he excufed the Nation from the Guilt, and laid the whole  Blame upon fome fugitive Robbers ; of whofe Town he  fent him a Bafket of Earth, as Pofl'eflion given ; and promifed, to fend their Heads alfo for Satisfadlion, as foon  as they could poflibly catch them. But this he never performed; and confidering the Perfidy of his Nature, and  the exterminating Hatred, he always bore to the Englijh, it  is much to be queftioned, whether he was not privy to, or  perhaps the chief Author and Contriver of the whole Matter. However, by thefe A£ts of Hoflility and Barbarity,  the whole Nation was rendered obnoxious to the Englijh  Power and Refentment, and his Regal Authority thereby  firmly riveted and eftablifhed among them. Altho' the Governor, being fatisfied with this Pretence and Excufe, never  farther profecuted, or revenged, this perfidious Murder and  Breach of the Peace. Captain Argall, all this time, was not negligent or  forgetful of the grand End of his coming to Virginia, but  pu&ed on his unrighteous Gains, by all imaginable Methods  of Extortion and Oppreffion. For befides a Multitude of  private Wrongs to particular Perfons, he converted in a  manner wholly to " his own Ufe and Pofleflion, whatfoever  remained, at that time, belonging to the Publick, being  the Fruits and Relifts of eighty thoufand Pounds Expence.  So that he was loudly charged, with many Ofi^ences in Matter of State and Government, with Depredation and Wafte  of the publick Eftate and Revenues of the Company, and  with great Oppreffion of the Colony in general, as well as  feveral private Men in particular. And the Cries of his  Outrages and Rapine at laft became fo loud and numerous, and  'the History of VIRGINIA. Book III.  and the Company in England was fo enraged at the Reports  and Informations, they received, that they could fcarce be  &«.^r^a//refl.rained from flying to the King, for the Redrefs of fo  Govervor. ^^^^ ^^^ ^^ ^^^^^ Mifchiefs. But Sir Thomas Smith, whether in Favour to Captain Argail, his Kinfman, or out of  his real Judgment, alledged, that imploring his Majefty's  Aid might prove prejudicial to the Company's Power, and  of dangerous Confequence to their Liberties ; and might  alfo give Room to much publick Scandal and- Reflection.  And therefore he propofed a milder and lefs clamorous Way  of Proceeding. To this End, he himfelf. Alderman Johnfon, the Deputy-Treafurer, Sir Lionel Cranfield, and others of the  Council, wrote Captain Argall a Letter, dated the 23d of  Augujl, 16 18; charging him, in very fliarp and fevere  Terms, with many Crimes and Mifdemeanors : That he  was exceedingly chargeable to the Company, and converted  the Fruits of their Expence to his own private Ufe : That  he was grown fo proud and infolent, as to fcorn the Title  of Deputy-Governor, declaring, that he would, be no Man's  Deputy : That he wronged the Magazine, by his Negligence and Connivency : That he had appropriated the Indian Trade to himfelf; ufing the Company's Frigat and  other Veflels, together with their Men, to trade for his  own Benefit, and prohibiting the Trade of Skins and Furs  to all others : That he took the old Planters, who ought to  be free, as well as the Company's Tenants and Servants,  and fet them upon his own Employments : That he expended the publick Store-Corn, to feed his own Men : That  he had, for fome private End and Purpofe of his own, informed the Company, that Opech'ancanough and the Natives  intended to give their Country to -Mr. Rolfe's Child, and  to referve it from all others, 'till he came of Age : That  he neither looked into, nor regarded, their InftrucStions ;  but had, under Pretence of their Commiffion, difpofed of  all the Company's Cattle, againft their Exprefs Orders and  Direftions, and had converted the Profits thereof to his own  Ufe : That he had, under Colour of his Right, as Admiral,  feifed and detained fome Hides, unlawfully taken or purchafed, for which the Company had compounded, with the  Lord High Admiral and the Spanijh Ambaflador, at the  great Expence of four hundred Pounds : And in fhort, that  all his Adtions and Proceedings feemed to be, as if the Colony was wholly intended for his private Gain and Advantage, and as if he was fo great, and they fo mean and infenfible of Reafon, as to let things, of this publick and notorious Nature, pals off without a ftricft and exacft Account ; up- Book III. The History of VIRGINIA. 151 upbraiding him alfo with thefe ungrateful Returns to their '^'8.  Favour and Friendfliip, in procuring him the Government. ' y ' At the fame time, they wrote a Letter to my Lord *"^-^^^''"  Delawarr, whofe Death was yet unknown in England,  containing the like Heads of Complaint and Accufation againft Captain Argall ; and informing him, that by the  ftrange Infolence of his laft Letter, and by the Informations  of fundry Witnefles, lately come from Virginia, there was  more Difcontent raifed in the Adventurers, and more Danger feared to the Colony, than had ever happened, by any  other thing, fmce the firft Beginning of the Enterprife. So  that the Adventurers could hardly be reftrained from going  to the King, altho' far off on a Progrefs, and procuring his  Majefty's Command, to fetch him home as a Malefactor.  But to avoid farther Scandal to their Management and Adminiftration, they befeech his Lordfhip, to fend him forthwith to England, to make his perfonal Appearance, and to  give his Anfwers to fuch things, as fhould be laid to his  Charge. And forafmuch as it was conceived, that there  would be many things, for which he muft make SatisfaiSion  to the Company, they defired his Lordfhip, to feife upon  his Tobacco, Skins, Furs, and other Goods, to be fent to  them as a Depofite, till all Matters fhould be fatisfied and  adjufted ; and that he would likewife return the Cattle, and  other publick Goods, which he had embezzled, to their  proper Places and Owners. And at the fame time, there  was an Order of Court paffed in England, to fequefter all  Captain ArgaWs Effe£ts, which fhould be fent home, to  make Reflitution to the Company for his Rapines and Extortions. These Letters, coming, by Lord Delawarr's Death,  to Captain ArgalP% Hands, were fo far from diverting or  reprefling his Exhorbitances, that they feemed, only to put  him upon his Guard, and to render him the more eager and fludious to make the befl Ufe of his Time. For  my Lady Delawarr complained, that he wrongfully took  fome of her Goods from her late Hufband's Servants, without rendering any Account of them. And indeed he had,  in general, afTumed to himfelf a Power, of ordering and  difpofmg of his Lordfhip's Eftate, fetting his Tenants and  Servants to his own Work, and thereby ruining and depopulating a very large and hopeful Plantation, begun by his  Lordfhip. But one Captain Edward Brewjier, alledging  Lord Delawarr'% Order, for their being under his Management and DireiSion, endeavoured to withdraw them from  the Governor's Work, and to employ them, for the Maintenance of themfelves, and for the Benefit of his Lordfhip's Heirs,  "The History of VIRGINIA. Book III.  Heirs and Fellow-Adventurers. But one of them refufed  to obey him, which drew from him fome threatening Expm.^rgall preffions againft the Fellow. This he immediately ran with  overnor. ^^ ^^^ Governor; who being drunk with Power, and impatient of Oppofition, (a Diftemper, very incident to our  American Viceroys) and being alfo vexed perhaps, to find  any one dare to withftand his arbitrary Schemes of Gain,  he caufed Captain Brewjier to be feifed, tried by a Court  Martial, and condemned to Death. The Legality of this Proceeding was founded on an Article of the Martial Laws of the Low Countries, introduced among thofe Articles, fent over by Sir Thomas Smith.  This decreed, " That no Man fhould offer any Violence,  " or contemptuoufly refift or difobey his Commander, or  " do any Aft, or fpeak any Words, which might tend to  " breed Diforder or Mutiny, in the Town or Field, or  " difobey any principal OiRcer's Direftions, upon Pain of  " Death." But altho' it was evident from his Majefty's  Charter, that the Governor had Power to execute Martial  Law only in Times of Mutiny and Rebellion, in like Manner as Lords Lieutenants in England had, and that in all  othei: Cafes, as well civil as criminal, their Proceedings  were to be as agreeable, as conveniently might be, to the  Laws, Statutes, Government, and Policy of the Realm of  England; and altho' it was as evident, that there was at  that time no Pretence of Rebellion or Mutiny, but the Colony enjoyed an univerfal Peace and Tranquility ; yet was  this innocent Gentleman's Condemnation moft unmercifully  driven on, and his Life fubjecfted to the Pleafure of a furious and enraged Enemy. And this, not in an Affair of  publick Concern, but in a Dispute of private Right ; and  when it did not appear, that he had uttered any thing againft the Governor, but only fome threatening Language againft a Servant, that difobeyed his lawful Commands. And the whole was carried on and tranfa£ted, under Colour and Pretence of a Law, which could have no  legal Force or Validity in the Britijh Dominions. Altho'  it muft be confeffed, that Martial Lavv was then the reigning Law of Virginia, to the great Difcouragement of the  Colony, and to the manifeft Infringement of the Rights' and  Liberties of the People, as Britijh Subjefts. And this  Courfe, at times introduced and ufed from the firft, as being in a State of War and Danger, was firmly riveted and  confirmed by thofe bloody Articles, fent in by Sir Thomas  Smith, which were unfortunately, at their firft coming, applied to a good Purpofe and Effeft by Sir Thomas Dale, in  quelling the diforderly and mutinous Humours of the People. Book, III. "The History of VIRGINIA. 153 pie. And thus, by this Example and Authority, and by '6'8. eafy Acquiefcence and Ignorance in the People of their na-^~ — v ' tive Rights and Privileges, it was made the ftanding Rule Sam.Argr.ll  of Proceeding, and became the Common Law and Cuftom  of the Country. But fome of the Court, refleftirig on the extreme Severity of thefe Martial Laws, and being alfo moved perhaps by the particular Hardfhip and Unrighteoufnefs of the  prefent Cafe, prevailed on the reft, to go in a Body, and  intercede for Captain Brewfter's Life. And being alfo joined  by fuch of the Clergy, as were at Hand, they did, with  much Intreaty, and after many Repulfes and Allegations of  Captain Argall, at laft prevail to fave his Life. But it  was upon this exprefs Condition, that he fliould take a folemn Oath, neither direcSly nor indireftly, in England or  elfewhere, to utter any contemptuous Words, or do any  thing elfe, that fhould turn to the Difhonour or Difparagement of Captain Argall; and that he fliould never return  more to Virginia^ by any dire£l: or indirect Means. All  which was this poor Gentleman, a Perfon of fome Figure  and Confideration, obliged to fubmit to, to refpite and put  ofF an immediate Execution. But after his Return to  England^ being deeply fenfible of this oppreflive and injurious Treatment, as alfo to clear his Reputation, and to  wipe off the Stain of being a condemned Man, he appealed  from the Sentence of the Court Martial in Virginia^ to the  Treafurer and Company in England. And the Profecution  of this Appeal did greatly contribute, to fliew and expofe  the extreme Rapicioufnefs and tyrannical Adminiftration of  Captain Argall. A Ship, called the Treafurer, was alfo, this Year, fent  from England by the Lord Rich., who was now become  Earl of Warwick, a Perfon of great Note afterwards in the  Civil Wars, and commander of the Fleet againft the King.  He had afpired to the Title of Earl of Clare ; but that  being then efteemed the fame with Clarence, and a Royal  Title, it was judged too high an Honour for a Family in a  Manner new and upftart, and that of Warwick conferred  upon him. This Ship was here new vidlualled, and manned  with the ftouteft and ableft Recruits, that could be picked  out of the whole Colony. And then, uhder Colour of an  old Commiflion of Hoftility from the Duke of Savoy, againft  the Spaniards, which they had by fome Means procured,  flie was fent to rove on the Spanijh Dominions in the WejiIndies ; where fhe committed much Ravage, and gained  fome Booty. But they had the Confcience even to defraud  the Mariners, who afterwards made Complaint to the  22 Com■The History of VIRGINIA. Book III. Company, that they had cheated them of their Share of  'the Negroes taken ; all which were placed on the Earl of  Sam.Argall WarwicFz Lands in Bermudas^ and there kept and detained  Governor. ^^ j^.^ Lojrdfhip's Ufe. And this Proceeding was efteemed,  not only a manifeft Aft of Piracy, but alfo a thing of great  Danger to the Colony, confidering our weak Condition at  that time, and the great Strength of the Spaniards in the  Weji-Indies. Mr. Beverley alfo gives a particular Account  of an Expedition, made this Year by Captain Argall in Perfon, to diflodge the French at St. Croix and Port-Royal in  Acadia. But as I cannot find the leaft Mention of it, in  any contemporary Writer, or in any of the old Records,  that I have perufed and examined, I am apt to think, he is  miftaken in the Time, and confounds this with the Expedition, he made under Sir Thomas Dale., in the Year 1614. But the Company in England., receiving Advice of  Lord Delawarr^s Death, and finding, that Sir Thomas  Smith's Projetft had thereby failed of Succefs, came to a  Refolution of fending over a new Governor, with Power  to examine all Complaints and Accufations againft Captain  Argall upon the Spot. And therefore Captain Teardley,  who was upon this Occafion knighted, was chofen Governor and Captain-General, and fent upon this Bufinefs.  But Captain Argall., in the mean while, was fully apprifed,  by the Earl of Warwick and others, his Aflbciates in England, of every thing, that had paffed in their Courts concerning himfelf. Wherefore, to prevent the Seifure of his  Goods, he configned all his Efl:'e£l:s, under other Men's  Names, and into the Hands of great and powerful Perfons.  And as to thofe Goods, which were fent home, before he  knew of the Order to fequefter them, the Earl of Warwick,  by his Intriguing and Intereft, got them all into his own  Hands, under Pretence of taking out the Share, which belonged to him by his Right of Partnerfliip, and upon exprefs Promife, to return the reft into the Company's  Hands. But this Promife he could never be brought to perform ; fo that the Company were deprived of the Means to  right themfelves, and defrauded of that juft Reftitution,  which they had great Reafon to expert and demand. This Yeari6i8 is likewife memorable, for the Death  of two Perfons of principal Figure in the Virginian Hiftory.  The firft of thefe was Powhatan, Emperor of the Indians,  a Prince of excellent Senfe and Parts, and a great Matter  of all the Savage Arts of Government and Policy. He  was penetrating, crafty, infidious, and cruel ; and as hard  to be deceived by others, as to be avoided in his own Strategems and Snares. But as to the great and moral Arts of Policy, Book III. T>&^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. 155 Policy, fuch as Truth, Faith, Uprightnefs, and Magnani- '618. mity, they feem to have been but little heeded or regarded " , — -^ by him. He was fucceeded in his Dominions, according to ^''"•■■^''gaU  the regular Order of Succeflion, by his fecond Brother, °^""°''Opitchapan ; who is fometimes called Itopattn, and Oeatan.  And now upon his Acceffion to the fupreme Power, he  again changed his Name to Safawpen^ as Opechancanough  did his to Mangopeeomen. Upon what Reafon of Cufi:om,  or Dignity, or Humour, thefe Changes were made in their  Names, I cannot fay ; but to avoid Confufion, I (hall take  no Notice of fuch nominal DifFerences, but (hall always  fpeak of the fame Perfon by the fame Name. Opitchapan,  being an eafy, decrepit, and unadlive Prince, was foon  obfcured by the fuperior Parts and Ambition of his younger  Brother, Opechancanough ; whofe Figure and AcSivity firft  drew the Attention, and at laft, by degrees, engrofled the  whole Power of the Government ; altho' for fome time,  he was content with, and feemed chiefly to afFeft, the Title  of King of Chickahominy . However they both renewed  and confirmed the League with the Englijh ; under the Prote(ftion of which, every Man peaceably followed his Building and Planting, without any remarkable Accidents or Interruption. The other Perfon was Sir Walter Ralegh, the Father  and firfi: Mover of thefe American Colonies ; to whom we  owe our Name, as we do our Settlement alfo to the Profecution of his Defign. In October this Year, he ended a  Life of much Glory and Adverfity, on the Scaffold, to the  everlafting Infamy and Reproach of King James. For he  was a Perfon of very great Worth, and'of a vaft and moft  extenfive Genius ; beirig equally fitted, to fhine in every  Part of Life, or Branch of Art, to which he applied himfelf. And he was accordingly alike famed, as a Seaman,  a Soldier, a Statefman, and a Scholar. He was therefore  univerfally pitied and lamented, and even interceded for by  feveral Princes ; by the Queen, Prince Henry, the King of  Denmark, and King of France, whofe Agent in England,  even at the laft, endeavoured to contrive his Efcape. But  King James, perverfely bent on the Wrong, could, by no  means, be prevailed upon, to -fpare the greateft and wifeft  Head in his Dominions ; but fhamefully made him a Sacri.fice to his darling Dotage, the Spanijh Match, a Meafure  weak in - itfelf, but profecuted and carried on, with ftill  greater Weaknefs and Indifcretion. But his Death hath  been fo often deplored and condemned, that I fhall not add  to the general Complaint any farther, than by making fome  brief Extrafts out of a Letter, preferved by Mr. Rujhworth  rhe History of VIRGINIA. Book III. in his Colleaions, to fhew the fhameful Cruelty and In'juftice of the KSi..  Sam.Argall This Letter is written, by a great Minifter of State in  Governor. £^^1^^^^ jq Mj., Cottington, afterwards Lord Cottington,  the Britijh Refident at the Court of Spain. In it he complains, as by Order from the King, of the Infincerity and  Chicanry of the Spanijh Court in that Affair, and fets forth  the upright and fmcere Intentions of his Majefty. And he  fays, that he is particularly commanded by his Majefty, to  advertife him of the Execution of Sir Walter Ralegh^ who  was lately put to Death, chiefly for their Satisfadiion, and  concerning whom he promifes fpeedily to fend a Declaration: That, to pleafe them, his Majefty of late had, in  many things, ftrained upon the Affeiftions of his People;  and moft efpecially, in this laft of Sir Walter Ralegh^ who  died with great Courage and Conftancy, and had raifed  much Remorfe and Compaffion in the People, who all attributed his Death, to the Spanijh Machinations, and his  Majefty's Defire to do them a Pleafure : And further, he  orders him, ftrongly to infift upon and reprefent, how able  a Man Sir Walter Ralegh was to have ferved his Majefty, if  he had been pleafed to have employed him : And that yet,  to give them Content, he had not fpared him, altho' he  might, by faving his Life, have given infinite Satisfadlion  to his People, and have had at Command, upon all Occafions, as ufeful a Man, as ferved any Prince in Chriftendom. Thus fell one of the laft-furviving, and the brighteft  of all the Commanders, bred under Queen Elifabeth, and  by her fleflied in Spanijh Blood and Spoil. And what is the  moft reproachful Part of it, he fell a Vidlim to his own  great Merit and Abilities, the Memory and Danger of  which, to the Spanijh Nation, had been revived, by his late  Expedition to Guiana ; as alfo, out of the old Grudge, for  his many eminent Services, under his former Royal and  illuftrious Miftrefs, Queen Elifabeth, and to place him beyond a Poflibility of ever rendering the like Services, to  King jfames^ or his Son. As the King's whole Conduft towards him was a ftrange Medley of Injuftice and Inconfiftency, fo was it fmartly obferved by his Son, Carew Ralegh ; That his poor Father was firft condemned, for being  a Friend to the Spaniards, and afterwards loft his Life, by  the fame Sentence, for being their Enemy. He died, as he  had lived, with great Luftre and Honour ; with the Charity, Serenity, and Refignation of a Chriftian, joined to  the Magnanimity and intrepid Courage of an old Roman. In Book III. "The History of VIRGINIA. 157 In the Beginning of the Year 1619, Sir George Teardley was i6'9- difpatched and fent Governor, with divers Commiflions and ^— ~v ' Inftruftions for proceeding againft Captain Argall in Virgi- ^" G""-^'  nia, were the Fafts were committed, and where the Proofs, Governor,  on both Sides, might readily be had. The Earl of Warwick and his Faction had violently oppofed this, but not being able to prevail, he was obliged to betake himfelf to  othej- Meafures. Mr. Rolfe's Commiffion was either now  expired ; or elfe, as I rather believe, he had given Offence  to the Company, and was turned out of his Place of Se-;  cretary. And this, I find fome Reafon to fufpecS, pro-^  ceeded from his too great Submiffion and Subferviency to  Captain ArgaW% male Praftices. But however that was,  the Earl of Warwick obtained that Place from Sir Thomas  Smithy for Mr. "John Pory^ who now went over with the  Governor. For the Nomination to that Office was a Compliment, made by the Company to their Treafurer ; till afterwards the Earl of Southampton^ in the Time of his Treafurerfhip, returned it back, to the Company, and referred it'  wholly to their Choice. By the Means of this Pory, as it  was vehemently fufpedted, the Earl of Warwick got- the  Ship fo long flopped and retarded on the Coafl of England,  that he difpatched a fmall Bark, before from Plimouth, to  fetch away Captain Argall, with all his Goods and Booty.  This Bark arriving the Beginning of April, Captain Argall  took immediate Order for his Affairs, and within four or  five Days, embarked in her for England. He left Captain  Nathaniel Powel Deputy-Governor ; a worthy Gentleman, .  who had come in at the firft with Captain Smith, and ever  fince continued, an honeft and ufeful Inhabitant. But his  Government was of very fhort Duration. For in ten or  twelve ' Days after Captain ArgalPs, Departure, Sir George  Teardley arrived ; and was received with the greater Joy and  Welcome, as he brought with him feveral Charters from  the Company, of Grants and Liberties to the Colony. For  the honefler Part and Majority of the Company, being  alarmed at thefe late Proceedings, refolved to be more attentive to the Affair, and' to prevent all fuch Exorbitancies fo)r  the future. One of thefe Charters only have I feen, containing Diredtions to the Governor and Council of State, to  lay off Lands for feveral publick Ufes ; and likewife confirming Titles, and afcertaining the Methods of obtaining  Lands in Virginia, and for preventing fraudulent and furreptitious Grants ; two of which, of a very extraordinary  and inconvenient Nature, had been obtained by Captain  Martin and Captain Argall. But Sir George Teardley, having thus narrowly miffed of the Quarry, applied himfelf to. the  The History of VIRGINIA. Book III. the Affairs of Government. And firft he added the fol' lowing Gentlemen to the Council; Captain Francis Weji,  Sir Gcorgt Captain Nathaniel Powel, Mr. John Pory^ Mr. John Rolfe,  Govef^r ^r. miliam Wickham, and Mr. Samuel Macock. For although Captain Powel had been appointed Deputy-Governor, yet was he not of the Council. For, till this time,  the Governors, in Cafe of thieir Abfence, always affumed  to themfelves the Power of naming their Deputies. Soon  after Sir George publifhed his Intention, of holding a General Affembly in a fliort time ; which, I fuppofe, was one  of the chief Privileges and Powers, granted and fent over  with him. And I likewife find, by an Inftrument of Writing to one Richard Kingfmil, that he had a Power to grant,  and accordingly did grant, to all the ancient Planters, who  had been here before Sir Thomas\Dale's Departure, a full  Releafe and Difcharge from all further Service to the Colony, excepting only fuch Services, as they fliould willingundertake, or were bound in Duty to perform by the Laws  of all Nations ; together with a Confirmation of all their  Eftates real and perfonal, in as full and ample Manner, as  the Subjecfts of England held and enjoyed them. And this  Precaution was undoubtedly occafioned by Captain JrgalCs  Rapines, and many perfonal Impofitions on the ancient Planters and Freemen of -the Colony. The Earl of Warwick was highly incenfed at thefe late  Proceedings againft Captain Argall ; and finding Sir Thomas  Smith not ftanch, and fit for his Purpofe, he purfued, with  great Vehemence, the Removal of him and Alderman Johnfon^ the Deputy, from the Government of the Company.  Thofe two Gentlemen had alfo given much Offence, to  the greater and better Part of the Adventurers ; and lay under a flrong Sufpicion, as well. of Negligence in their Office,  as of Collufion and unfair Dealing. Sir Thomas Smith too  himfelf, being far advanced in Years, of tender Health,  and very rich, was willing to furrender a Place, of fo great  Trouble and' Fatigue, and fo little fair Profit. And therefore, being already Governor of the Eaji-India Company,  and lately appointed a Commiffioner of his Majefty's Navy,  he declared, at a Quarter Court, held the 28th of April^  that he was unable to give that Attendance, which he defired, and which the Affairs of the Company demanded ;  and for that reafon, requefted the Favour of them, to be  difcharged from his Office. And altho' he was afterwards  named by fome to be a Candidate, yet he was fixed in his  Refolution, and abfolutely refufed to ftand in Eleftion. In  his Room, Sir Edwin Sandys^ Sir John Woljienholme^ and  Alderman Johnfon^ were propofed ; and the Choice fell on Sir  Book III. "The History of VIRGINIA. Sir Edwin Sandys^ he having fifty nine Voices, Sir John  Woljlenholme twenty three, and Alderman 'Johnfon eighteen. '"  Sir Edwin was a Gentleman of Kent^ and a Member of S"" ^"''g'  Parliament ; a Perfon of excellent Underftanding and Judg- Governor.  ment ; of great Induftry, Vigor, and Refolution ; and indefatigable in his Application to the Bufinefs of the Company and Colony. He had, before this, on Account of his  Iduftry and Knowledge of their Affairs, been often joined,  by the Courts, with Sir Thomas Smithy in the Management  of feveral weighty things, relating to the Colony. So that  fcarce any thing, whilft he was in Town, paned without  him. But he afterwards complained, that what was done,  during his Abode in Town, was commonly undone, when  he was abfent in the Country. Mr. John Farrar^ an eminent Merchant of London^ with a like Majority, was chofen  Deputy-Treafurer ; a worthy Second to Sir Edwin Sandys^  and every way fit for the Poft, conferred upon him. But not to cafl: off an old Servant with Difregard, who  had, in the Time of greateft Trouble and Difficulty, continued above twelve Years in the principal Offiee of the  Company, at the Motion of Sir Edwin Sandys, twenty  great Shares, or two thoufand Acres of Land, were beftowed, as a Gratuity, upon Sir Thomas Smith. But there  was not the leaft Notice taken, or Reward given, to Alderman Johnfon. And thefe Alterations in the Government of the Company gave not only much Satisfadlion in  England, but were alfo received with great Joy in Virginia ;  where the old Officers had been long and bitterly exclaimed  againft, by the general Voice of the Colony. But the  Earl of Warwick was fo far from gaining by the Change,  that he had now a Perfon of much greater Honour and Integrity, and a Gentleman of principal Figure and Intereft  in the Nation, to oppofe bis Schemes and Defigns. For  altho' Sir Edwin Sandys was much wronged in the Execution of his Office, and even fought to be deterred by Threats  of Blood, yet they could no way turn him, from a vigorous  Profecution and Enquiry into the late Diforders in Virginia.  At the Expiration of Sir Thomas Smith's Government, after fourfcore thoufand Pounds Expence and twelve Years  Labour, the Colony confifted of about fix hundred Perfons,  Men, Women, and Children. And they had about three  hundred Head -of Cattle, fome Goats, and infinite Numbers of Hogs, both wild and tame. But all the Company's Lands and Plantations were utterly ruined and depopulated by Captain Argall, there being only three Tenants  left thereon, and fix Men of what he called his Guard.  And notwitjiftanding Sir Thomas Smith's Boaft, that he had left i6o r^^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book III. 1619- left four thoufand Pounds, for the new Treafurer to proceed "— V ■ upon, yet it was found, upon Examination, that the Coni- Slr George pany was above that Sum in Debt. However Sir Edwin  GoveraoJ. Sandys^ and all the founder and more publick-fpirited Part  of the Company, applied themfelves, witli a laudable Diligence and Induftry, to reform the Abufes, and by all the  Methods, they could devife, to fet forward and advance the  Plantation. Sir George Yeardley, upon his Arrival in Virginia^ finding a great Scarcity of Corn, made it his firft Care to fupply that Defe<a. And therefore he wrote to the Treafurer  and Company in England^ to excufe him, if he made not  fuch Returns in Tobacco, this Year, as might be expedtefl.  For he was determined, by the Bleffing of God, to raife  such a plentiful Crop of Corn, that the Colony fhould not,  in hafte, be in any further Danger of Want. And about  the latter End of "June^ he called the firft General Affembly, that was ever held in Virginia. Counties were not yet  laid ofF, but they eleifted their Reprefentatives by Townfhips. So that the Burroughs of "James-Town^ Henrico^  Bermuda Hundred., and the reft, each fent their Members to  the Affembly. And hence it is, that our Lower Houfe of  Affembly was firft called the Houfe of Burgefles, a Name  proper to the Reprefentatives of Burroughs or Towns ;  and it hath, by Cuftom, ever fince retained that Appella^  tion, altho' the Burgefles, or Members for Towns and Corporations, are very few and inconfiderable at prefent, in  Comparifon of the Reprefentatives for Counties. Mr. Beverley fays, they fate in the fame Houfe with the Governor and Council, after the Manner of the Scotch Parliament ; and we are told by Smith, that they debated all  Matters, thought expedient for the Good of the Colony.  The K&s of this General Aflembly were remitted' to England, and prefented to the Company, to be read in their  Court, the, 20th of March following. For the Company  then had the regal Power of confirming, or difanulling our  A&s of Afl'embly. I can no where find, among the Records now extant, any Account of the Particulars, that  pafled. Only Sir Edwin Sandys, upon Perufal of them,  aflfures the Company, that they were very well and judicioufly formed ; but they were very intricate, and difficult  to be reduced into diftindl and proper Heads. However we may be certain of this happy EfFedl, that  by the Introduction of the Britijh Form of Government,  by Way of Parliament or AflTembly, the People were again  reftored to their Birthright, the Enjoyment of Britijh Liberty ; and that moft grievous and oppreffive Cuftom of Trial Book. III. T-6^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. 161 Trial by Martial Law was thereby, if not at once, yet by ,619.  Degrees, entirely baniflied and aboliftied. It is true indeed, ^- — y— '  that before, both by the Royal Charters, and by all other sir George  Law and Reafon, the Englijh, tranfplanted hither, had a feardley.  Right to all the Liberties and Privileges of Englijh Subjedts. G°«'^"°fAnd certainly no Perfon, in his Senfes, would have left the  Liberty of England^ to come hither (in order to improve  the Commerce, and increafe the Riches of the Nation) to  a State of Slavery ; when without that, it was natural to  fuppofe, that they muft undergo much Hardfliip and Labour. Yet by the Neceflity of the Times, by the Ignorance of the People, and by the Oppreflion and Tyranny of  Governors, they had, thus far, been deprived of that their  native Right. But with the Englijh Form of Government,  the Englijh Liberty again revived and flourifhed ; and together with the Nation, they now tranfplanted and diffufed  into America their moft happy Conftitution. From this  Time therefore, we may moft properly date the Original  of our prefent Conftitution, by Governor, Council, and  Burgefles; which altho' defective perhaps in fome material  Points, yet comes fo near to the excellent Model of the Englijh Government, that it muft be the hearty Prayer and  Defire of all true Lovers of their Country, that it may  long flourifh amang us and improve. For this happy Change,  we are chiefly indebted to the Change of the Officers and  Governors of the Company in England, and to the A£tivity  and Attention of Sir Edwin Sandys, and many other worthy  Members of the Company, to the Affairs of the Colony. This Summer, they laid off four new Corporations ;  which encreafed the Number of their Burroughs, that had  Right to fend Members to the Aflembly, to eleven in all.  And Japa'zaws, the King of Patowmack, came to JamesTown, and invited the Englijh into his River to trade ; for  a more plentiful Year of Corn had not been known, in a  long time. But Captain Ward, being fent thither, was  treacheroufly dealt with by the Natives ; and the thing  coming to open Hoftility, he took from them eight hundred  Buihels by Force, and fo returned to James-Town. One  Captain Stallings, this Year, had the Misfortune, firft to  have his Ship caft away, and not long after to be flain, in  a private Quarrel, by William Eppes. And the whole  Colony laboured under fo great a Mortality, that no lefs  than three hundred of the Inhabitants died within the Year.  But in Mitigation of this, they had the moft plentiful Crop  of Grain, that had ever yet been raifed, fince the firft Plantation of the Country. And indeed the Company received  fuch an Account of it, as will not eafily gain Credit ; which  M M I there-T i62 T^^ History ?/■ VIRGINIA. :&Jok III. 1619- I therefore leave entirely to the Reader's good Pleafure, to ^- — Y ' believe or difbelieve, as he thinks fit ; neither fhould I have Sir George related it, had I not foand it authentically recorded, in the  Governor Company's Journals. For by Letters froni Vitginia, they  were informed, that they had had two Harvefts of Wheaf^  the firft being fhaken by the Wind, and producing a fecond ;  and their Ground was fo extraordinary fat and good, that  they planted Indian Corn upon the* Stubble, and had an excellent Crop of that. But it muft be remembered, that  rare-ripe Corn was the Corn of thofe Times, and that they  ufually had two Crops of it in a Year. Whilst things were in this State in Virginia, Sir Edwin Sandys was, by no means, idle or negligent of his  Charge in England. For turning the whole Bent of his  Thoughts, tovi^ards the Irnprovenient and Furtherance of  this noble Enterprife, he got a Committee appointed, con• *fifl:ing of Sir Dudley Digges, Sir Edward Harwo&d^ and divers other Knights, Gentlernfenj Merchants, aiid Citizens,  as well for compiling and reducing the ftanding Rules and  Orders, for the Government pf their own Company, into  one entire Body, as more efpecially for conftituting Laws,  and fettling a Form of Government for Virginia, appointing Magiftrates and Officers, and declaring their feveral  Funcftiohs and Diities. And this was one of the chief Powers  and Injunftions of his Majefly's Letters patent and Inftructions'to the Company. As to the former Part, concerning  the Government of themfelves, it was eafily Ijrought to a  tolerable Head. But the latter being a vaft Defign, of very  great Weight and Difficulty, and comprehending no lefs,  than a Projedl for rearing, conftituting, and forming a compleat Commonwealth, in all its Parts, it never could, notwithftanding Sir Edwin Sa.ndys's great Pains and Diligence,  be brought to any fatisfadtory Conclufion. So that Virginia  was left to the beft Mearte of forming its Government ; that  is to fay, to work after the Englijh Plan, with the Affiftaricfr  of Time and Experience^ and the united Senfe and Endeavours of its Reprefentatives and Officers of States The King had formerly iflued his Letters to the feveral  Bifliops of the Kingdom, for collecting Money,- to eteft  and build a College in Virginia, for the training up and  educating Infidel Children in the true Knowledge of God.  And accordingly, there had been already paid near fifteen  hundred Pounds towards it, and more was expedted to come  in. For befides other Particulars, Sir Edwin Sandys, upon  fome Conference with the Bifliop of Litchfield, found, that  he had never heard of any Colledtion in his Dioc;efe ; but  he promifed, as foon as he fliould have a Warrantj to further Book III. rhe History of VIRGINIA. 163 ther fo good a Defign, with the utmoft Diligence. Sir '^'g- Edwin therefore recommended it to the Company, as a" . ' thing moft worthy of their Confideration, both for the Glo- ^^ ^^'°^S'  iry of God, and their own Honour. And he told them. Governor.  that it was an Affair of that Weight and Dignity, that they  muft: expe£i; to render an Accout of their Proceedings to the  State ; and that Negligence therein could never efcape publick Notice and Cenfure, efpecially of thofe, who had generoufly contributed towards it. He therefore had Sir Dudley D'lgges^ Sir Nathaniel Rich, Sir yohn Wolftenholme, Mr.  Deputy Farrar, Dr. Anthony, and Dr. Guljhne, appointed  a Committee, to meet, as he fhould order and direft, and  to confult thereupon. And he ILkewife moved and obtained,  that ten thoufand Acres of Land Should be laid off for the  Univerfity at Henrico, a Place formerly refolved on for that  Purpofe. This was intended, as well for the College for the  Education oi Indians, as alfo to lay the Foundation of a Seminary of Learning for the Englijh. In Confequence of  thefe Kefolves, Sir Edwin procured fifty Men to be fent this  Summer, and fifty more the Beginning of the next Year,  to be feated on thefe College Lands, as Tenants at Halves.  They were to have half the Profit of their Labour to themfelves, and the other half was to go, towards forwarding  the Building, and the Maintenance of the Tutors and Scholars. And as a Man's Labour was then computed at ten  Pounds Sterling a Year, it was intended, hereby to eftablifli  an annual Revenue of five hundred Pounds, for this good  and pious Work. Mr. George Thorpe alfo, a Kinfman of  Sir Thomas Dale's, being- a Gentleman of his Majefty's Privy Chamber, and one of the Council in England for Virginia, accepted of the Place, and was fent over the next Spring,  as the Company's Deputy and Superintendent for the College. And for his Entertainment and Support, they granted  three hundred Acres of Land, to be for ever annexed and  belonging to that Place, with ten Tenants thereon. In a great and general Quarter Court of the Company,  held in November this Year, Sir Edwin Sandys told them,  that his Duty and Inclination running equally for the Advancement of this good Adlion, he had many things to lay  before them. And accordingly, he reminded them, that  the Maintenance of the PubMck, in all States, was of no  lefs Importance, even for the Benefit of private Men, than  the Root and Body of a Tree are to the particular Branches.  And he recalled to their Rerriembrance, how by the admirable Care and Diligence of two worthy Knights, ^\x -Thomas Gates and Sir Thomas Dale, the publick Eftate and Revenue of the Company had been fet forward, in a 'Way to  great Perfeftion : That the former, Sir Thomas Gates, had M 2 the  The History of VIRGINIA. Book III. the Honour to all Pofterity, to be the first named, in his  ' Majefty's Patent and Grant of Virginia, and was alfo the  ^ri°dl7' ^""^ *^^ ^y ^'* Wifdom, Induftry, and Valour, accomGovernOT. panied with exceeding Pains and Patience, in the Midft of  many Difficulties, had laid the Foundation of the prefent  profperous State of the Colony : And the latter, Sir Thomas  Dale, building upon thofe Foundations, with great and  conftant Severity, had reclaimed, almoft miraculoufly, thofe  idle and diflblute Perfons, and reduced them to Labour and  an honeft Fafliion of Life: That proceeding with great  Zeal for the good of the Company, he had laid off publick  Lands, to yield them a ftanding Revenue, placed Servants  thereon, as alfo upon other publick Works, for the Company's Ufe ; eftabliflied an annual Rent of Corn from the  Farmers, and of Tribute from the Barbarians ; together  with a great Sto?k of Cattle, Goats, and other Animals:  That this had fince been the Occafion of drawing fo many  private Plantations, to feat in Virginia ; upon Hope and  Promife of Plenty of Corn and Cattle, to be lent them by  the Publick, for their Eafe and Benefit, at their firft Arrival : But that fince their Times, all this publick Provifion  had been utterly laid wafte and deftroyed : And that befides,  for about an hundred Perfons, which appeared to have been  fent, at the Company's Charge, within the two or three  laft Years, Sir George Teardley wrote Word, that, at his  Arrival, only three could be found, remaining to the Publick :  That as to the Means and Caufes of thefe Dilapidations, he doubted not, but that hereafter, in due time, they  would be made fully manifeft ; but that he forbore, at prefent to touch upon them, left he fliould, by Glance of  Speech, give Offence to any Perfon prefent (for Captain  Argall, the known Author thereof, was then in Court )  But as to the Remedies of thefe Mifchiefs, he related to  them, what Methods had been already taken. For whereas, not much above three Years before, there had been remitted from Virginia twelve feveral Commodities, fold  openly in Court, to the great Honour of the Aftion, and  Encouragement of the Adventurers ; yet fince that time,  there had been little returned, worth fpeaking of, except  Tobacco and Saffafras ; to which the People there applied  themfelves fo entirely, that they would have been reduced  to the Neceffity of ftarving, the laft Year, had not the Magazine fupplied them with Corn and Cattle from England:  That this had been the Occafion of flopping and difcouraging many Hundreds of People, who were providing to remove themfelves thither : That frequent Letters had therefore been fent, from the Council there to the Governor in  Virginia, to reftrain that immoderate planting of Tobacco, and Book III. rhe History of VIRGINIA. 165 and to caufe the People to apply themfelves to other and J6i9- better Commodities : And that he- had alfo, by the Advice ' y~—' and Confent of the Council, and according to an Order now ^'" Gmrj-e  to be propofed, caufed to be drawn a new Covenant, to be q"^J^I^  inferted in all future Grants of Land, that the Patentees  fliould not apply themfelves, wholly, or chiefly, to Tobacco, " but to other Commoditifes, therein fpecified ; an  Example whereof they would now fee, in a Patent, lying  before them for their Approbation. But altho' they had been, by no means, negligent in  thefe Affairs, yet he faid, that his principal Care and Study  had been employed, -to fet up again and reftore the publick  Stock and Revenue, to as great, or a greater Degree of  Perfection, than they had heretofore been at. And to that  End, he recounted, how three thoufand Acres of Land  had been laid off, for the Governor ; twelve thoufand for  the Company ; and ten thoufand, for the Univerfity at Henrico. And that feventy two Perfons had already been placed  on the Company's LatKi, fifty three on the Governor's, and  fifty on the College's ; an hundred and feventy five in all.  But not content with this, he told them, that he had ftill  fome farther Propofitions to make to them. And firft, he propofed to them, that thefe Tenants for  the publick might, the next Spring, be encreafed to the  Number of three hundred ; an hundred for the Cornpany's  Land, an hundred for the College, and an hundred for the  Governor, who fhould be obliged, at the Expiration o'f his  Office, to leave the fame Number to his Succeflbr ; which  would thereby raife a ftanding Revenue of a thoufand Pounds  a Year, and eafe the Company of all further Expence for  his Provifion and Entertainment. And whereas Care had  been, and fliill {hould be taken, during his Office, to fend  over to thefe Lands, divers ftaid and difcreet Perfons, he  propofed, in the fecond Place, that an hundred Boys and  Girls, of about twelve or thirteen Years of Age, might be  fent to be their Servants and Apprentices ; in the Charge  whereof, he hoped, that the honourable City of London  would partake with the Company, as they had formerly  done. And'becaufe he underftood, that the People in Virginia^ tho' feated there in their Perfons for fome few Years,  yet were not fettled in their Minds, nor intended to make  it their Place of Reft, and Continuance, but propofed, after  having got fome Wealth, to return again to England^ which  tended to the utter Overthrow and DilTolution of the Plan.tation ; he therefore advifed, and made it his third Propo'fition, that there fhould be fent over one hundred Maids,  young and uncorrupt, to make Wifes for the Inhabitants ; M 3 that i66 rhe History of VIRGINIA. Book III. 1619- that Wives, Children, and Families, might render them . Ms moveable, and fix and fettle ' them, together with their Sir Gurgi Pofterity, in that Soil : And that fuch of thefe Maids, as  Governor, ^ere married to the publick Farmers, fliould be tranfported  at the Company's Expence ; but if any were married to  others, that then thofe, who took them to Wife, fhould  repay the Company their Charges of Tranfportation. And  in Confequence of this Propofition, ninety Maids were accordingly fent the following Spring. As to the Manner of  tranfporting thefe Perfons, to make up five hundred in all  for the Publick, he propofed, in the fourth Place, that they  fliould not hire Shipping, as heretofore, fince each Ship,  at its Return, in bare Freight and Wages, emptied the  publick Cafli of eight hundred, and fometimes a thoufand  Pounds ; but that they fliould, as he had already done this  prefent Year, take the Advantage of the Ships trading to  Newfoundland, and fo tranfport them, at fix Pounds a Perfon, without any after Reckonings. Fifthly, he propofed,  the fending twenty Heifers, for every hundred Tenants,  threefcore in the whole ; which, with their Breed, might  foon raife them a tolerable Stock ; and which he had Hopes  of having tranfported, taking thie Opportunity of Shipping  in the Wefiern Parts, at ten Pounds a Head, to be delivered  in Virginia. Lastly, as to the Charges, he obferved to them, that  there never could be a more proper Time, for fuch large  Tranfportations, than the prefent ; Corn being fo exceedingly  cheap and plentiful at home, and there being, by their Advices from Virginia, fo great Promifes of an excellent Crop  there. And he alfo fliewed, how much the Company was  bound to give Thanks to Almighty God, for all his Bleffings, who continually raifed Means, to fupport and carry  on this great Work ; and ht particularly mentioned one unknown Gentleman alone, who promifed five hundred Pounds,  on Demand, for the Converfion and Education of threefcore Indian Children ; and that he had likewife, upon his  Letters, received Afliirance from fundry Parts, and fome  of them very remote, that if they proceeded with the Undertaking, they fhould not want for Money. But not to  rely upon fuch precarious Funds and Hopes, he related to  them, particularly, nhe feveral Ways and Means, by which  the Money would arife. And he eftimated the whole  Charge, at four thoufand Pounds, to be done fparingly ;  and bountifully, at five thoufand. He alfo promifed, not  to leave the Company one Penny in Debt, for any KSt or.  Thing, to be performed within his Year; and that he  would moreover difcharge three thoufand Pounds of former Debts, Book III. 'The History of VIRGINIA. 167 Debts, according to the Stock, left at the time of his com- >6i9ing to his Place. And thefe things done, he hoped, theV— ^r-™— '  Publick would again be fully reftored, a Foundation laid ^" George  for a future great State, the Adventurers and Planters well Qoy„^^^  comforted and encouraged, and all Matter of Scandal and  Reproach to them and the Enterprife removed. And fo  he concltided, by recommending thefe Points to their moft  ferious Confideration, and the whole Enterprife to the Bleffing of Almighty God. Thefe Propofitions, which had  been before made in two feveral Courts, and were now repeated at the particular Defire of fome noble Lords prefent,  were received with that Applaufe, they well deferved ; and  they paiTed, upon the Queftiori, with an unanimous Approbation, altho' Sir John Wolftenholme^ in a former Court,  had made fome vain Exceptions againft them. And Sir Edwin Sandys^ with an extreme Care and Diligence, faw them  all afterwards put efFecftually into Execution. But befides thefe reputable People, to be tranfported at  the Company's Charge, the Treafurer and Council received  a Letter frorti his Majefty, commanding them, forthwith  to fend away to Firgihia an hundred diflblute Perfons, which  Sir Edward Zouch, the Knight Marflial, would deliver to  them. In Obedience to his Majefty's Command, it was  refolved, to fend them over with all Conveniency, to be  Servants, which JVTr. Treafurer underftood, would be very  acceptable to the Colony. But as it was November, and  Shipping, at that Seafon, not eafily procured, it was thought  they could not be feht off before 'January at fooneft. But  to fatisfy his Majefly, the Company agreed to be at the Expence of their Maintenance, in the mean while.' The  Treafurer was therefore defiredj to deliver this their Anfwer to his Majefty, by Secretary Calvert. But he was  told, that the King's Command was urgent, and admitted  no Delay ; and that fifty, at leafb, muft with all- Speed be  fhipped off. And notwithftanding his juft Reprefentations,  how great Inconveniency and Expence would thence accrue to  the Company ; that they could not well go in lefs than four  Ships, left, being fo many together, they fhould mutiny,  and run away with the Veffel ; that thofe four Ships, to be  got thus fuddeiily, without ta]f;irig, Advantage of the Veffels  trading to America, would not ftand the Cochpany in lefs  thail four thoufand Pounds ; and that, riotwithftanding all,  Ships were not to be procured fo fpeedily, at that Time of  the Year. Yet nothing, he could alledge^ giving SatisfacSionj  the Company were obliged to appoint a Coiiimittee of the  Deputy and other feleft Merchants, to employ all their Endeavours, for compafling Shipping, with all ^poflible Speed. M if ' And  "tbe History of VIRGINIA. Book III. And by good Fortune, for the additional Premium of an  'hundred Pounds, they procured a large Ship, to carry  Sir Gargt them ofF; but which neverthelefs could not fail before Those, who are acquamted with Hiltory, and know,  with how high and magifterial a Hand, this King fometimes  carried it, even with his Parliaments, will not be furprifed,  to find him thus unmercifully infult a private Company, and  load them, againft all Law, with the Maintenance and extraordinary Expence of tranfporting fuch Perfons, as he  thought proper to banifli; and that perhaps, without any  colourable Pretext, or fufficient Warrant of Law at that  time. And I cannot but remark, how early that Cuftom  arofe, of tranfporting loofe and diflblute Perfons to Virginia, as a Place of Punifhment and Difgrace ; which altho'  originally defign'd for the Advancement and Increafe of the  Colony, yet has certainly proved a great Prejudice and  Hindrance to it's Growth. For it hath laid one of the  fineft Countries in Britijh America, under the unjuft Scandal  of being a mere Hell upon Earth, another Siberia, and only  fit for the Reception of MalefacSors and the vileft of the  People. So that few People, at leaft iew large Bodies of  People, have been induced, willingly to tranfport themfelves to fuch a Place ; and our younger Sifters, the Northern Colonies, have accordingly profited thereby. For  this is one Caufe, that they have outftripped us fo much,in the Number of their Inhabitants, and in the Goodnefs  and Frequency of their Cities and Towns. His Majefty had, by his Letters patent, bearing Date  the 23d oi May 1609, granted the Company a "Freedom  " from all Cuftom and Subfidy, for twenty one Years, ex" cepting only five per Cent, upon all fuch Goods and  " Merchandifes, as fliould be imported into England, or  " any other of his Majefty s Dominions, according to the  " ancient Trade of Merchants." Notwithftanding this,  which was intended for the Eafe and Encouragement of the  Infant Colony, the Farmers of the Cuftoms, upon a general Rate made of Tobacco, both Spanijh and Virginia, at  ten Shillings the Pound, demanded fix Pence a Pound, equally upon all ; altho' Spanijh Tobacco was ufually fold  at eighteen Shillings a Pound, and fometimes more, and  Virginia would feldom bear above three or foUr Shillings.  Mr. Jacob alfo. Farmer of the Impoft upon Tobacco, did  moft oppreffively impofe another fix Pence a Pound, contrary to the clear and indubitable Tenor of his Majefty's  Grant. And the Company, in June this Year, importing  twenty thoufand Weight, the whole Crop of the former Year, Book III. ne History of VIRGINIA. 169 Year, had delivered it all, into the Cuftom-Houfe, as they >6'9were required, that the Tobacco might be weighed, and^—~v-~^  the Cuftom anfwered. But Mr. Jacob^ of his own Au-SjjGwr^e  thority, flopped and feifed the Tobacco, till that Impoft of Qg^^^^^J  fix Pence a Pound fliould be difcharged. And this alfo will  foon be perceived by thofe, who are any thing verfed in the  Hiftory of thofe Times, to be entirely confonant to the  Behaviour of the Cuftomers then ; whofe Infolence and  arbitrary Proceedings, fupported by the Royal Authority,  and even encreafed and carried to a greater Height in the  next Reign, was one of the chief and moft vifible Caufes  of the general Difcontent of the Nation, and of the unhappy  Civil War, which enfued. The Company, being thus wronged and abufed, applied themfelves to the Lords of his Majefty's Privy Council, and obtained their Letter to Mr. yacob, to deliver the  Tobacco, upon their entering into Bond to pay him, whatfoever (hould appear to be his due, upon Certificate from  his Majefty's learned Council, within a Month. But Jacob  rejecting this, and all other Conditions offered by the Company, and likewife exacting twelve Pence a Pound at Plimouth, upon the Somer-IJlands Tobacco, it was refolved to  try the Strength of their Charter, and to enter an Aftion  againft him for the Damage, which was already computed  at two thoufand five hundred Pounds Sterling. But afterwards, confidering, that their Commodity was very periftiable, and that their Suit could not be determined that  Michaelmas Term, they altered their Method of Proceeding, and by the Advice of a ^reat Lord of the Privy Council to Sir Edwin Sandys, they brought the Matter before  the Council Board ; where, upon the Attorney-General's  delivering his Opinion clearly, that the Company, by their  Letters patent, were free from all Impofition, and after  fome Delay and Chicanry of Mr. Jacob, it was ordered,  upon a full Hearing of the Allegations on both Sides, that  he fhould deliver the Tobacco to the Company, paying all  lawful Duties appertaining thereto. And thus, at length,  they regained their Goods out of the Hands of this Harpy ;  but were obliged to fit filently by the great Lofs and Da-i  mage, occafioned partly, by. impairing it's Worth through  Drying and other Corruption, and partly, by the Fall of the  Price, upon the Sale of Englijh Tobacco, made fince it'g  Importation. To which was added the daily Expectation  of more, both from Virginia and the Somer-IJlands, which  rendered the Market fo mean and dead, that they were fadly  puzzled and perplexed, how to difpofe of it. And at laft,  after many Schemes and Effort? to raift the price, they were  ^ _ obliged  The HisTORr of VIRGINIA. Book III. obliged to fell it very low, and • were confiderable Lofers  ' by it. Sir Georgi i^ ^^g ^^^ peculiar Mark and Property of this Family GoveraOT. of our Kings, that they were always craving, and for ever 1620.' poor and in Want, notwithftanding the frequent Contribu- ■ f—^' tions of the People, to fome of them efpecially ; the Reafons of which, it lies 'not within my Province at prefent, to  open and explain. And accordingly King James, notwithftanding his natural Antipathy to Tobacco, began now to  tafte the Sweets of the Revenue, arifmg from it ; and was  therefore very ill fatisfied, with this Determination of the  Privy Council. For in the very Beginning of the next  Year, within a Month after, under Colour, that fome  Spanijh Tobacco had fold at twenty Shillings a Pound, he  demanded of the Company twelve pence a Pound, Cuftom  and Impoft, for theirs. But it was unanimoufly agreed, to  ftand refolutely upon the Privilege of their Charter, which  they could not give up or betray, without the greateft  Breach of their Truft and Duty. And therefore, as Virginia Tobacco had never been aftually fold for more, than  five Shillings a Pound, but generally much lower, they fubmitted to pay three Pence a Pound Cuftom, which was full  five per Cent, on their higheft Price, But however, to avoid,  all Conteft with the King, as his Majefty had given Order  for prohibiting, by Proclamation, the planting Englijh Tobacco, for five Years enfuing, they agreed, in Return to  that his Majefty's Favour, during the faid Term of five  Years, if the Proclamation took Effeft, and continued fo  long, to add nine Pence a Pound 'more, and thereby to make  it up twelve Pence ; which was the Full of his Majefty's  Demand, tho' not in the fame Form. But it was conceived, unlefs this Offer, and the true Meaning thereof,  • fhould be entered, as an A£l, in the Lords Commiffioners  of the Treafury's Books, it would be very difficult, at the  Expiration of the five Years, to withdraw* the .Payment,  but continuing fo long, it might be demanded for ever, as  due from the Company to the King. They therefore appointed a Committee, to repair to the Clerk of the Council, and to take Care, that this Bargain be exactly recorded,  and alfo to procure a Copy of the faid Record, to be entered in the Company's Journals. But as to the Farm of  the Impoft on Tobacco, the Refufal whereof the King, at  the fame time, offered them, they held it inconvenient at  prefent to be undertaken ; but not entirely to rejedl his  Majefty's Offer, they permitted fome of their Society, to  join for a Part, in the Company's Name, but in reality,  for their own proper Ufe and Behoof. The Book III. the HiSTokY of VIRGINIA. 171 The Trade of Virginia had been thus far reftrained, '6»°- and kept in the Adventurers Hands, except a few Inter- ' ■< ' lopers, that ftraggled in by Chance ; and the Method of ^"^ ^'^S'  carrying on this Trade was thus. Every Adventurer, that Governor.  pleafed, fubfcribed, what- he thought proper, to a- Roll ;  which Money, together with a certain Sum perhaps, contributed out of the publick Cafli of the Company, made  their Capital or Stock. With this they bought Goods, and  fent them to the Cape-Merchant in Virginia^ who had,  long before this, loft his original Office of being Keeper of  the publick Storehoufes, and was become the Company's  chief FaiStor-. The Cape-Merchant, having fold thefe  Goods to the Inhabitants, for Tobacco or other Commodities, remitted the EfFedts to England. This Society for  Trade, called the Magazine, was a diftiniSt Body from the  publick Company ; but always under its Controle, as it received its Being and Authority from the Company, and as  the Joint-Stock of the Company was always the greateft  and principal Adventurer in it. Alderman Jokhfon had  ever been at the Head of this Magazine, under the Title of  Director ; and fince the Removal of himfelf and Sir Thomas  Smith from their Offices, it had been the Subjedt of much  Fadlion and Difcord. For they had made many Difficulties,  in fubmitting to the Orders of the Company, concerning  the Place of their Meetings.; had negledled to bring their  Accounts to an Audit, tho' v&^y clear and fairly kept ; and  had delayed and kept off the making any Dividend ; which  things had caufed much Difturbance and Diffenfion. To  remove therefore fuch a Block of Offence, it was now agreed to diffolve this Magazine, and to leav€ the Trade free  and open to all ; only with this Provifo, that the Goods of  the Magazine, then upon band in Virginia, fhould be firft  fold off, before any of the fame Kinds fhould be vended. But the Diligence,. Vigor, and Fidelity of Sir Edwin  Sandys, and of others of the Company, had now raifed the  Reputation of the Acftion very high. And accordingly there  had been prefented, by an unknown Perfon, the former  Year, a Communion Cup, with a Cover and Cafe, a  Trencher Plate for the Bread, a Carpet of Crimfori Velvet,  and a Damalk Table-Cloth, for the Ufe of the College ;  and another had given a fair Set of Plate, with other rich  Ornaments, to Mrs. Mary Robinfon's Church, who had,  the Year before, bequeathed two hundred Pounds, towards  the Building of it. And now, in the Beginning of this  Year, another unknown Perfon fent five hundred Pounds,  direcfted ; To Sir Edwin Sandys, the faithful Treafurer of  Virginia. This was for the Maintenance of a convenient Number  The History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book III. Number of young Indians, from feven or under, to twelve  ■ Years of Age, to be inftrufted in Reading and the PrinSir Gyrge (.jples of the Chriftian Religion ; and then to be trained and  Governo? brought up in fome lawful Trade, with all Gentlenefs and  Humanity, till they attained the- Age of twenty one ; and  after that, to have and enjoy the like Liberties and Privileges, with the native Englijh in Virginia. And he likewife  fent fifty Pounds, to be given into the Hands of two religious and worthy Perfons, who fliould, every Quarter, examine and certify, to the Treafurer in England^ the due  Execution of this Defign, together with the Names of the  Children, and of their Tutors and Overfeers. This Charity, the Company thought not proper, to entruft to private  Hands, but committed the Management of it to Smith's  Hundred chiefly. This lay in the Parts above Hampton,  up into Warwick, and was fo called, in Honour to Sip Thomas Smith. But after this. Sir Thomas, with the Earl of  Warwick^ and the reft of that Fadlion, fold out their Shares  in this, and other private Plantations, and only referved  their Part in the Company's publick Stock, in order to be  prefent, and to have a Vote at their Courts. Wherefore,  this was afterwards changed to the Name of Southampton  Hundred ; either in Honour to the Earl of Southampton'.^  their next Treafurer, or rather, as that Nobleman became  the chief Adventurer in the Plantation. And further, for  the better procuring and retaining the Indian Children, the  Company ordered a Treaty and Agreement to be made with  Opechancanough, and authorifed Sir George Yeardley, to  make him fuch Prefents, out of the Magazine, as would  be moft grateful to him, and beft promote the Defign. Mr.  Nicholas Farrar, the Elder (Father, as I take it, to the  prefent and fucceeding Deputy-Treafurer of the Company)  alfo bequeathed three hundred Pounds, for converting Infidel Children in Virginia. He ordered this to be paid into  the Hands of Sir Edwin Sandys and Mr. John Farrar, at  fiich time, as it fliould appear by Certificate, that ten Indian Children were, placed in the College ; and then, by  them to be difpofed of, according to his true Intent and  Meaning. And in the mean time, he obliged his Executors  to pay eight per Cent, for the Money, to be given to three  feveral honeft Men in Virginia, of good Life and Fame,  and fuch as Sir Edwin Sandys and Mr. John Farrar fliould  approve of, each to bring up one of the faid Children, in  the Grounds and Principles of the Chriftian Religion. There was, at this time, a great Scarcity of Clergy in  Virginia-, there being but five Minifters and eleven Burroughs, each of which, being fame very diftant from each other. Book III. The History of VIRGINIA. 173 other, was erefted into a diftindt Parifli. The Company '6*o- indeed had before, in their Charter by Sir George Yeardley^ ^~ — v ' taken Care of a handfome Provifion for the Clergy. For^'^^"''^'  they had ordered an hundred Acres of Land, in each of the Governor.  Burroughs, to be laid off for a Glebe ; and that there  fliould, for their further Maintenance, be raifed a ftanding  and certain Revenue, out of the Profits of each Parifli, fo  as to make every Living, at leafl: two hundred Pounds Sterling a Year-. And this Stipend I find, two Years after, fettled in the following Manner : That the Minifter fliould receive Yearly fifteen hundred Weight of Tobacco, and fixteen Barrels of Corn, which was then eftimated at two  hundred Pounds Sterling : That this fliould be raifed by ten  Pounds of Tobacco and a Bufliel of Corn a Head, for every  labouring Man or Boy, above fixteen Years of Age ; provided, it did not exceed fifteen hundred Weight of Tobacco and fixteen Barrels of Corn : But if any Plantation  was not able, to make up that Quantity, by ten Pounds of  Tobacco and a Bufliel of Corn a Head, that, in fuch Cafe,  the Minifter fliould be contented with lefs, according to  the Number of Tithables. And now, for a farther Encouragement, that pious, learned, and painful Minifters  might be invited to go over, the Company ordered fix Tenants to be placed on each of thofe Glebes, at the publick  Expence ; and they applied to the Bifliop of London, for his  Help and Affiftance in procuring proper Minifters, which  his Lordfliip readily promifed, and undoubtedly performed.  For he had ever been a great Favourer and Promoter of the  Plantation, and had himfelf alone colledled and paid in a  thoufand Pounds towards the College ; which he would not  permit the Company to diminifli, by a Prefent to his Regifter, who had been very adlive and ufeful in the Colle<9:ion.  And for this, and other his Deferts towards them, he was  made free of the Company, and chofen one of his Majefty's  Council for Virginia. As the Country was very defencelefs and unfortified,  and as the Interefts and Improvements of the Inhabitants  were now much encreafed, and become confiderable, they  began to grow uneafy in that Particular ; and they wrote  to the TrCafurer and Company in England, to procure them  fkilful Engineers, to raife Fortifications ; promifing, themfelves to bear the Charge of it. Wherefore, to give them  prefent Satisfaftion, and as regular Fortifications, to endure  Affault and Battery, were not fo needful, as the chufing  and improving fome Places of natural Strength and Advantage, Sir Thomas Gates was entreated by the Company, as  well in Regard of his military Skill, as of his Knowledge of the  rbe History of VIRGINIA. Book III. the Country, to write them his private Letters of Advice  and Direftion. And he was alfo defired, together with Sir  Sir Garge Mgthaniel Rich, to confer with General Cecil about it, aGoverno'r "Other eminent and military Member of their Society, and  youngeft Son to the famous Lord Treafurer Burleigh, who  likewife promifed, if other Methods failed, to write them  fuch particular Diredions and Inftruiftions, that they might  eafily themfelves proceed. To them was afterwards added  Sir Horatio Fere, who was efteemed the Perfon of the  greateft military Skill and Reputation of any in that unwarlike Age. He was therefore, this Summer, fent Commander of the fingle Regiment, which King James, in his  great Wifdom, thought fit to furnifli out, for the Relief  and Support of his diftreffed Son in Law, the Palatine of the  Rhine. For altho' General Cecil had been firft defighed for  that Service, yet he was afterwards laid afide, and this Gentleman appointed in his Room. The Governor and Coiincil, in Virginia, had fettled  and allowed certain Fees to the Secretary, which were, this  Year, fent to England for Confirmation. But the Treafurer and Company were become, from the late Exadtions,  very jealous and cautious in that Point ; and did moreover  judge thofe Fees to be very oppreffive and intolerable. And  therefore, for the Eafe of the Colony, they declared, that  the Secretary ihould receive no P"ees at all ; but in Recompence of all Services, they allotted five hundred Acres of  Land, for him and his Succeflbrs, with twenty Tenants  thereon. This was laid ofF on the Eajiern Shore, and the  Grant was afterwards enlarged. But whereas Captain \Argall, in the time of his Sufpenfion from the Place of Admiral, had deputed Abraham Peirfey, the Cape-Merchant, to  be his Vice-Admiral, the Company declared that Deputation, to be utterly void and unlawful, and committed the  Execution of that Office, to the Governor and Council of  State, and to fuch under them, as they ftiould authorife  and appoint.  i There had been many fcandalous Reports fpread (as was intimated in a private Letter to Mr. Bland, a very confiderable Merchant of the Company) of the Barrennefs and  Infertility of the Soil in Virginia. And it alfo had been one  efpecial Piece of Captain Argadl's Policy, in order to difhearten and difgrace the Company, to vilify the Country,  both by himfelf and his Engines, and to reprefent it as lefs  fertile, than the moft barren arable Lands in England. And  altho' thefe Afperfions were fufficiently contradidled by his  own former Letters and Reports, yet, for a fuller Anfwer  to them, a Commiffion was fent to Virginia, and a Return made Book III. rhe History of VIRGINIA. 175 made upon Oath, of the Strength and Goodnefs of the Soil. i6»oBut as Malice is m^e induArious than Truth, thefe un-^'- — v"— '  juft Scandals prevailed but too much, and difcouraged many ^ ^'"•^«  Adventurers from making their Tranfportations. To Qb' Governor,  viate therefore all fuch ill Confequences, it was refolved  upon the Motion, and committed to the Care, of Sir Edwin Sandys and Dr. JVinJlone, Xo prepare and publifh a fmall  Book, containing a Refutation of all fuch flanderous Reports ; and to adjoin, at the End, an alphabetical Index of  the Adventurers Names. This Isft had a double Ufe. For,  in the firft Place, it did great Honour to the Enterprife,  by fhew^ing, that many of the. chief Perfons in the Nation,  for Wifdom, Fortune, and Dignity, were deeply concerned  in, and great Encouragers af it. And next, as this Index  was drawn from Sir Thomas Smith's Books, which were  very carelefly kept and incorreft, it gave the Alarm to all , fuch, as had paid in their Monies to him, and found themfelves omitted in this Lift. And it accordingly made them  bring, in his Receipts, or Bills of Adventure ; whereby ma-?  ny Sums of Money appeared to have been received by him,  which could otherwife never have been madb out by hig  Books, or proved by any other Method.  THE 176  THE HISTORY OF  V I R G I N I A. BOOK IV. i6zo. Sir George Teardley, Governor. g5:98:9§ H E Time of Sir Edwin Sandys^ Office being  u^ _, (M expired, there was held a great and general  vp« Quarter Court of Eledlion, at Mr. Deputy  9®'^'^ Farrar'% Houfe, in St. Sithe's Lane, on the 17th  of May, confifting of three Earls, one Vifcount,  four Lords, thirty Knights, feveral Do£tors and Efquires,  and largely above an hundred other Gentlemen, Merchants,  and Citizens. To this fplendid Meeting, Sir Edwin Sandys  made a long and' very handfome Speech, laying before them  the State of their Affairs, at the time of his AccefEon to the  Office of Treafurer, and then. In this he was naturally led  to fet forth, as well the Negligence and bad Government  at home, as particularly the vaft Lofs and Damage, which  the Company had fuftained, in the Time of their Deputy  Governor, Captain Argall. And he informed them, that  there had, within his Year, been fet out eight Ships at the  Company's Expence, and four others by private Adventurers ; arid that thefe Ships had tranfported twelve hundred  and fixty one Perfons, whereof fix hundred and fifty were  for the publick Ufe, and the other fix hundred and eleven  for private Plantations. He alfo gave them an Account of  the feveral Gifts, which had been made, this Year, for  pious Ufes ; and of the many Patents, that had paffed to  various private Adventurers and their Affociates, who had underBook IV. The History 0/ VIRGINIA. undertaken, to tranfport to Virginia great Multitudes of  People, with much Cattle. And he recounted to them '"  the feveral Methods, which had been taken, to draw the^}^ ^"''S'  People ofF from their greedy and immoderate Puirfuit of To- Governor  bacco, and to turn them to other more ufeful and neceflary  Commodities : That for this Purpofe, an hundred and fifty  Perfons had been fent, to fet up three Iron Works : That'  Directions had been given for making Cordage, as well of  Hemp and Flax, as more efpecially of Silk-grafs, which  grew there naturally in great Abundance, and was found,  upon Experience, to make the beft Cordage and Line in  the World ; and that therefore each Family had been ordered and obliged, to fet an hundred Plants of it, and the  Governor himfelf five thoufand : That, befides, it had been  recommended to them, to make Pitch and Tar, together  with Pot and Soap-Afhes, and to provide Timber of all  Sorts, for Shipping, and other Ufes; to which End, fufficient Men and Materials had been fent over, for eredling  fundry Sawing-Mills : That the Country abounding in Mulberry Trees of the beft Sort, whereon fome Silkworms had  been found naturally, producing excellent Silk, they had  therefore prefled upon them tlje Culture and Improvement  of that Manufacture ; and that his Majefty, now the fecond  time, after the Mifcarriage of the former, had beftowed  upon the Company Plenty of Silkworm Seed, of the beft  Sort,, out of his own Store : That moreover, as the Country yielded naturally a wonderful Variety of excellent Grapes,  there had been fent divers fkilful Vignerons, together with  Store of Vine Slips, of the beft European Kinds : And laftly, that the Salt- Works, which had been fuffered to run  to Decay, were again reftored and fet up ; and that  there were now Hopes of fuch Plenty, as not only to ferve  the Colony for the prefent, but alfo fliortly to fupply the  great Fifhery on thofe American Coafts. H E then exhibited to the Court the Book of his Accounts,  examined and approved by five of the feven publick Auditors  of the Company, the other two being abfent. And he further declared, that for any Bufinefs, done within his Year,  he had not left the Company, to his Knowledge, one Penny in Debt, except perhaps the Remain of fome Charges,  which had not been delivered in, or were not yet become  due ; and that he had alfo left in Stock twelve hundred  Pounds more, than had been left to him the former Year.  And next, he proceeded to inform the Company of the Deputy's Accounts, who himfelf prefented them, exaftly kept,  after the Manner of Merchants, in three Books, fubfcribed  and approved, as well by the Company's Committees, as  "' V- N ' ' all 178 ^.?>^. Hi STORY of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1620. all the Auditors. And then Sir Edwin Sandys went on, and '• Y 'told the Court, that he could not but greatly commend Mr. Sir Gecrgt Deputy-Treafurer's Fidelity, Care, and Induftry ; who, to  Governor ^^^ Neglea of his own private AfFairs, had beftowed his  whole Time, together with the great Help and Afliftance  of his Brothers, on the Bufinefs of his Office, which he had  difcharged, with wonderful Exa<ftnefs, and an incredible  Diligence and Labour. And laftly, he concluded, with his  refpeflive Thanks to the feveral Orders of the Company :  Firft, to the Company in general, for their good Opinion  and AfFeftion, in chufing him their Treafurer : Then, particularly to the Lords, for their frequent Prefence, to the  great Grace and Honour of the Court, and Furtherance of  the Enterprife : Next, to the Officers, for their Fidelity and  Diligence, in joining with him to fupport the great Burthen  of the Company's Bufinefs: And laftly, to the Court, for  their Goodnefs and Patience, in bearing with his involuntary  Errors and other Infirmities. After which, delivering up  his Office, together with the Seals, he defired them to proceed to their Election, according to the Meflag_e, lately received from his Majefty ; and thereupon withdrew himfelf  out of Court. For at the Beginning of this Court, before they had entered upon any Bufinefs, a Gentleman from the King prefented himfelf to the Board, and figrtified ; that it was his  Majefty's Pleafure, out of his efpecial Care and AfFeftion for  the Colony, that the Company fhould eleit one of the four,  which he fhould name to them, and no other, to be their  Treafurer. Thefe were Sir Thomas Smith, Sir Thomas Roe^  Mr. Alderman John/on, and Mr. Maurice Abbot. Sir Thomas Smith and Alderman Johnfon had before been in their  chief Offices, and the Company conceived themfelves to  have little Reafon, to be fatisfied with their Conduft and  Proceedings. But in Virginia more efpecially, where the  EfFefts of their Management had been more fenfibly felt,  they were notorioufly infamous, and utterly detefted and  curfed by the whole Colony. So that this may be looked  upon, as an additional Inftance of the unhappy Turn of that  Monarch, in his Choice of publick Officers. Sir ThomasRoe was indeed an eminent Perfon, a Man of Letters, and  a very great Traveller, and is well known to the Learned, by  the Intimacy and Dearnefs, that was between him and Dr.  Donne, Dean of St. Paul's; who was himfelf afterwards  one of the Company, and of his Majefty's Council for Virginia. But Sir Thomas Roe is moft noted, for his Embafly  from King James to the Court of the Great Moguly and for  his Journal of that Embafly, a moft judicious and exquifite ■ -Book Book IV. ti>e ttistoRY of VIRGINIA. 179 Book of Travels. But fmce his Return from the Great 1620- MoguP% Court, he had been concerned in the Cufloms, and* v ' was Hkewife well known, to have had a long and intimate ^" G'^rgt  Friendfliip with Sir Thomas Smith ; both which, being fiif- Governor  picious Circumftances to the Virginia Company, would but  little contribute towards recommending him to their Choice.  As to Mr. Abhot^ little is known of him ; only that he was  a Merchant, and may feem, from fome obfcure Circumfirances, to have been of Kin to his Grace, Dr. George Abbot^ then Archbiftiop of Canterbury . But the greateft Obftacle, to the Eleftion of either of  thefe Gentlemen, was, that the Company had, almoft unanimoufly, caft their Eye upon the Earl of Southampton for  their future Treafurer, a Nobleman of eminent Quality,  Grandfon to the Lord Chanceller Wriothejly (one of King  Henry VIII's Executors, and of the Regents during the  Minority of Edward VI.) and Father to the great and virtuous Earl and Duke of Southampton^ in the Reigns of  Charles the Firft and Second. He is alfo famed in Hiftory,  for his Friendfliip to the unfortunate Earl of .£^a-, by whofe  Raflinefs and Impetuofity, he was betrayed into fome unwarrantable Adtions ; and was therefore, at the fame time  with that Nobleman, condemned to Death, but pardoned  by Queen Elifabeth, and kept in Prifon, during her Life.  He was, in Truth, an early, conftant, and great Encourager of this Settlement ofFirginia, as well as of all other  noble Works and Enterprifes ; and is particularly memorable, for his generous Patronage, and fingular Munificence,  to Shake/pear, the Glory and Prodigy of the Engiijh Stage.  For he is faid, to have given him, at one time, a thoufand  Pounds, to enable him to go through with a Purchafe,  which he underftood, he had an Inclination to make. But  altho' he had been a flrrenuous Friend of EJfex'%^ to all  whom King 'James declared a particular Regard and Obligation, as that* Lord was thought to have adted for his Interefts, and altho' *he was admitted of the Privy Council,  yet was he but little afFefted or hked at Court. For his  Friendfliip to the former Earl of EJfex was continued down  to his Son ; whofe hard Ufage ■ in fome Meafure from the  Court, in the Cafe of his Wife, could not but have been  muchfdifapproved and diigufl:ed by him. And befides, about this Time, the Encroachments of the Prerogative,  and the avowed Principles of arbitrary Ppwer, began to  raife a Spirit' of Liberty in the Nation j. a/id the Earl of  Southampton^ together with the Earls oi EJfex and Oxfori^  were "foon-diflunguiflied, as the undoubted Heads of thfe  patriot Party in the' Houfe of Lords; -^Y^iiSt 'i>\x Bicdley N 2 Digges, Governor. 180 "the History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1620. Digges^ Sir Nathaniel Rich, Mr. Selden, and others of  ■-^Y— " the Virginia Company, as well as divers Members not of  Sir Georgi that Company, appeared with equal Vigor and Refolution,  ^llf-!: in the Houfe of Commons. But however the AfFeftions of the Company might  ftand, they were much troubled and perplexed, by this  Meffage from the King. For fhould they proceed according to that Nomination, they would certainly admit a very  great and evident Breach, in their Privilege of free Ele<9:ion.  And fliould they reje<ft it, they might incur the Sufpicion  of Defeat in Point of Duty and Obedience*; an Imputation,  ever hateful and eafy of Accefs to the jealous Minds of weak  and pufillanimous Princes, and which many of their own  difaffeded Members would be too ready to improve, to the  Difadvantage of the Company. Having therefore confulted  the Letters ■ patent, it was at length agreed to adjourn to  Election to the next Quarter Court ; and after much and  earnefl: Refufal, they prevailed on Sir Edwin Sandys, to  continue in his OflBce, till that time. In the mean while,  as it evidently appeared, that the King had been much abufed and mifinformed, concerning the Management of  their Affairs, they appointed the Earl of Southampton, the  Vifcount Doncajier, Lord Cavendijh, Lord Sheffield, Sir  °John Davers, Sir Nicholas Tufton, Sir Lawrence Hyde, with  others. Gentlemen and Merchants, to deliver in, to his  Majefty, a full and true Account, as well of the former,«as  of the lafl: Year's Adminiftration of their Affairs; and to  befeech his Majefly, not to take from them the Privilege of  their Chapters, but to leave it to their own Choice, to have  a free Eleftion. To which Requeft, his Majefty readily  condefcended ; and farther fignified, that it would be highly  pleafing and agreeable to him, if they made Choice of fuch  a Perfon, as might, at all times, and on all Occafions, have  free Accefs to his Royal Prefence. And he likewife declared, that the Meffenger, in excluding therh from the Liberty of chufing any other, but one of the four nominated,  had miflaken his Intention ; which was indeed, to 'recommend thofe Gentlemen to their Choice, but not fo, as to  bar the Company from the Election of any other. This Anfwer being received by the Company with great  Thankfulnefs, Mr. Herbert obferved to them, that ftheir  Bufinefs had, of late, fufFered much, as well in Reputation,  as otherways, by Reafon of fome unhappy DifTenfions among them : That they ought, therefore, ferloufly to think,  of applying a prefent and efFedtual Remedy to this Evil :  That the late Treafurer was a Gentleman of fuch acknowledged^ Sufficiency, and of fo great Integrity and Induftry, that Book. IV. The Hi sroKY of VIRGINIA. 181 that of his Rank, there could not certainly be any found to '*"•  furpafs him : That therefore, there feemed to him no Hope ^■;"~v — -'  left, except fome of thofe honourable Perfonages, then ^" Geo>-ge  prefent, would vouchfafe to accept of the Place of Trea- Q^ygj^or.  furer ; who, by the Addition of Nobility, and by the Luftre and Influence of their high Station, might efFedt that,  which, they had found by Experience, could Hot be efFe£ied, by mere Dint of Ability and Induftry. Hereupon, the  whole Court, befeeching his Lordfliip to redeem this noble  Enterprife from imminent Danger and Deftruftion, did,  with univerfal Joy and Applaufe, nominate the Earl of  Southampton ; and to teftify their Thankfulnefs and Refpedt,  they elefted him Treafurer, without the Ballot, by a general Acclamation and Ere£tion of Hands. And his Lordfhip,  after a fhort Paufe, declared his Acceptance ; and exhorted  them all, to put on the fame Mind, with which he accepted that Place, and laying afide all private Feuds and Animofities, to labour chearfully and unanimoufly, for the Promotion of the publick Good, and the Advancement of the Colony. But as his Lordfliip's Attendance in Parliament, and  other weighty Affairs, might not always permit him, to be  fo conflant at their Courts, as might otherwife be wiflied,  they voluntarily, and without his Motion, difpenfed with  him, in that Particular. And they alfo re-eledted Mr.  jfohn Farrar, to the Place of Deputy-Treafurer ; whofe  Experience, and known Integrity and Diligence, might  well fupply the occafional Abfence of their Treafurer. Sir  Edwin Sandys likewife, who was in a clofe and intimate  Friendfliip with the Earl of Southampton, was afterwards  authorifed, at his Lordfliip's Defire, to fet his Hand, upon  Occafion, to Receipts of Money, for the Company's Ufe ;  and did otherwife, by his . private Diligence and Aftivity,  give him great Eafe and Affiftance, in the Execution of the  Office. Captain Brewjler'% Appeal from the Sentence of the  Court-Martial, in Virginia, had, all this while, hung in  Sufpence ; and it had even been declared, by a Meeting of  the Council at the Earl of Warwick'^ Houfe, the former  Year, that Trial by Martial Law was the nobiefl: kind of  Trial, being judged by Soldiers and Men of Honour. But  now, proper Certificates and dtfefted Cofjies of the Proceedings being returned from Virginia, the Caufe came to a final  Hearing and Determination, in an extraordinary Court,  held for that Purpofe, and compofed of feveral Lords and  others of eminent Quality and Difliindiion. But here there  feems to have reigned a quite different Spirit from that,  vhich appeared at the Earl of Warwick'^. For they were N3 no i82 'Ke History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1620. no way inclined, to give up the many Rights and Advan- — ■ tages of Juries and the Laws of England^ for the extraordi- Sir George j^^ry Privilege of being fummarily tried by Martial Law,  G^emor ^^^ ^T^% honourably by the Verdid of Gentlemen, of  the Sword. And therefore, being fhocked at the Cruelty  and Terror of the Proceedings againft Captain Brewjier.,  they declared them to be unjuft and unlawful, and not warrantable, either in Matter or Form, by the Laws of England^ or by any Power or Authority, derived from his Majefty's Charters: That Captain Brewjier had committed  nothing, any way Worthy of the fevere Penalty of Death :  That the, Manner of Trial by Marrial Law, in time of  Peace, and when there was no Mutiny or Rebellion, was  utterly unlawful and of no Validity : And confequently,  that Captain Brewfler was to be held a legal Man, and not  lawfully condemned. And all this then pafled and was ratified by the univerfal Aflent of the Court ; altho' Sir Thomas  fFroth, -who had married the Earl of Tf^arwick's Sifter, did,  in a fubfequent Court, declare his DiiTent, on fome falfe  and frivolous Pretences. Captain Brewjier had alfo, upon  his Requeft, a Copy of this Aft of Court granted him, exemplified under the legal Seal of the Company ; of which  he fent a Duplicate to Virginia. In May this Year, there was held another General Affembly, which has, through Miftake, and the IndoleiTce and  Negligence of our Hiftorians, in fearching fuch ancient Records, as are ftill extant in the Country, been commonly  reputed the -firft General Aflembly of Virginia. But that  Privilege was granted fooner, immediately upon the Difguft  taken, by the worthier Part of the Company, at Sir Thomas  Smith's ill Government, and the infufferable Tyranny and  Iniquity of Captain Jrgall's Proceedings. And upon Sir  George Teardley's Reprefentation of the Want of more  Counfellors, the Company appointed the following Gentlemen to be of the Council ; Mr. George Thorpe., Deputy for  the College ; Mr. Thomas Newce., who had alio been fent  over Deputy for the Company's Lands, with the Allowance of twelve hundred Acres, and forty Tenants ; Mr.  Tracy; Mr. Pouhtis ; Mr. Middkton; Mr. Bluet; and  Mr. Harwood, the Chief of Martin's Hundred. And we  are likewife told by Mr. Beverley., that a Dutch Ship, putting in this Year, fold twenty Negroes to the Colony,  which were the firft of that Generation, that were ever  brought to Virginia. To B A c c o, a ftinking, naufeous, and unpalatable Weed,  is certainly an odd Commodity, to make the Staple "and  Riches of a Country. It is neither of Neceflity nor Ornament Book IV. "The History of VIRGINIA. 183 ment to human Life ; but the Ufe of it depends upon Hu- 1620. mour and Cuflom, and may be looked upon, as one of the '^ v ' moft fingular and extraordinary Pieces of Luxury, that the ^" ^',Y^'  Wantonnefs of Man hath yet invented or given into. It is Qoyernor.  not therefore to be wondered, that the Colony's Eagernefs  and Application, almofi: folely, to Tobacco, was much  diftafted and oppofed by the Conjpany ; efpecially in thofe  early Times, before it had yet obtained fuch a general Reception and Dominion in the World. To which may be  added, that the King himfelf, to whom the Age in general,  and the Company in particular, did, on rhany Occafions,  pay great Deference, had a Sort of natural Antipathy to it,  and was perpetually haranguing, railing, and even writing  againft it. For that Solomon of England thought it not below his Royal Wifdom and Dignity, to write a Treatife,  entitled ; A Counter-Blajl to Tobacco. The Company therefore entered into and admitted various Projefts, for raifing  other things of more immediate Neceflity and Benefit to  Mankind ; fuch as the feveral Commodities, mentioned and  recommended by Sir Edwin Sandys, in his late Speech, at  the delivering up of his Office, with many others. For this  Purpofe, they . procured plenty of Silkworm Seed out of  France, Italy, and Spain ; and fent over a Perfon, who had  been brought up, many Years, in tending the King's Silkworms at Oatlands, and was thereby become very- fkilful,  in breeding the Worms, and winding the Silk, and undertook to inftrucEb others therein. And they alfo laid out for,  and had Hopes of procuring, many more fuch fkilful Artifts  from France. And as the Inhabitants were very eager, to  have the Servants and Apprentices, fent over by the Company, they made an Order, for the greater Encouragement  of thefe Commodities, that fuch Planters, as had excelled,  in building fit Rooms for Silkworms, and in planting Mulberry Trees and Vines, fhould have the firft Choice of fuch  Apprentices and Servants; and that the Company would  be paid for them, not a Whit in Smoke and Tobacco, but  in Corn, Silkgrafs, Silk, and other fuch ufeful Commodities. At Sir Edwin Sandys's M£)tioxi, there was likewife  tranflated, by fome of the Company, a French Treatife (recommended, as excellent in that Kind) - concerning the  Management of Mulberry Trees and Silk ; which was.,printed at the Company's Expence, and fent over in .fufficient  Numbers, and diftributed among the People. And they  alfo appointed a fele£t Committee of Merchants, to rate all  thofe feveral Commodities at fuch a juft Price, that the  Company and Merchants might be no Lofers thereby, and  yet that the Planter might .have good Encouragement to  raife them. N 4. BeTbe History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. Besides thefe, they entered into Projefts and Con'tracfts, for raifing various other Commodities; And Sir  Sir Giorge Edwin Sandys in particular, who was ever ftudious and inGTvemor defatigable in the Company's Bufinefs, prefented a long and  judicious Writing, containing many ufeful Inftruftions and  Projedls, for the Peace and better Government of the Company at home, and for the Advancement of the Colony  abroad ; all which, in its feveral Parfs and Branches, was  entrufted to proper Committees, to ripen and bring into  Execution. Sir William Monfon alfo, ^ Perfon of great Eminence and Note (being Admiral in the Reigns of Queen  Elifabeth, James I. and Charles I. and Author of the Naval  Traifts) together with his Aflbciates, offered to the Company, if they would, for feven Years, grant them the fole  Benefit and Importation, from Virginia, of two fuch new  Commodities, as had not yet been difcovered or planted by  any other, to pay them an hundred Pounds per Annum, to  plant twenty five Men, every Year during the faid Term,  and then to refign the Whole up into the Company's Hands.  • A Patent was therefore accordingly granted, with proper  Reftriftions ; but what thefe Commodities were, or what  was the Succefs or Confequence of this Undertaking, I do  not find. This Year 1620, Count Gondomar, the Spanijh Ambaffador, who had a great Afcendant at Court, and governed  the King, as he pleafed, prevailed with him, to fit out a  Squadron, of fix Ships of War and twelve ftout Merchantmen, in order to humble the Algerines, who then infefted  the Spanijh Coafls and Trade, but were not any way particularly tfoublefome to our Natio'n. And thus was this weak  and timorous Prince, who could not be drawn to make any  Steps, towards the Vindication of his own Honour, or to  fupport the Rights of his Family, or the Interefts of his  Subjedls, ftrangely engaged in a warlike Expedition, in Defence of a treacherous and delufive Ally. This Squadron  was put under the Command of Sir Robert Manfel, as Admiral ; together with whom. Sir Richard Hawkins, ViceAdmiral, Sir Thomas Button, Rear-Admiral, Sir Henry  Palmer, Arthur J\Aanwaring, and Thomas Love, Efqrs.  Captains of the other Men of War, and Samuel Argall, Efq;  who commanded one of the ftouteft Privateers, were appointed a Council of War. But this Enterprife was very  weakly managed ; and to ufe Sir William Monfon's Remark,  altho' it was defigned to find out and deftroy the Pirates of  Algiers, yet the Fleet did not fpend twenty Days at Sea, the  whole time, they continued in the Mediterranean ; but retired into Harbour, where the ■ Pirates might find them, but not Book IV. =ra^ History 0/ VIRGINIA. 185 not they the Pirates. So that, this ill-conduced Acftion '620.  afforded fufficient Subjedl of Scorn and Laughter to all Na-''~~~v—^  tions ; efpecially confidering the great Reputation, the En- ?J5 (^'Y^'  glijh had juftly gained, in their former Expeditions at Sea. Governor.  But Camhden tells us, that, in Revenge for this Injury and  Affault, the Jlgerines took, by the 9th of Ostober following, thirty five Sail of Englijh and Scotch Ships. About this time; there arofe a warm Difpute between  the two Colonies, concerning the Virginia Company's Right  to fifh at Cape Cod, within the Limits of the Northern Colony ; and upon Reference to the Letters-patent, it was found  clearly, that their Pretenfions were juftly grounded. But  Sir Ferdinando Gorges, with others principally concerned in  the Northern Grant, endeavoured privately to obtain a new  Patent, whereby the Southern Colony fliould be utterly excluded from fifhing upon that Coaft, without their Leave  and Licence firft obtained. This gave a juft Alarm to the  Virginia Com^zny. Forbefides fix thoufand Pounds, which  they had already expended upon that Fifliery, it was at prefent of main Confequence to them, as well for the Support  and Suftenance of the Plantation, as for defraying the vaft  Charge of Shipping and Tranfportation of People, by Returns made from thence in Y'lUk^ They therefore applied  to his Majefty, and got this Patent of Sir Ferdinando Gorges ftopped and fequeftered, in the Lord Chancellor's Hands.  And finding, how precarious their Privileges were, upon his  Majefty's foleGrant, and how liable to be perpetually violated  and impeded, it was refdlved, upon the Motion of Mr.  Smith, a fenfible, worthy, and ufeful Member of the Company, to obtain a new Grant, with all fuch furthei: Immunities, and larger Privileges, as were fitting and requifite,  and to have it ftrengthened and copfirmed in the Parliament, which was to meet foon after ; and upon the Earl  of Southampton's Application to his Majefty, he readily gave  his Confent to it. But notwithftanding the Earl of Southampton's Intereft and Endeavours, and Sir Edwin Sandys's  great Pains* and Induftry therein, it was never brought to  any final Iflue or Conclufion. But the Remedy, propofed by Mr. Herbert, for curing  the Factions and Difcords of the Company, by fetting a  Nobleman of eminent Diftindiion and Authority at the Head  of their Affairs, was far from having the intended Effedl.  For their Animofities and Diffenfions grew higher, towards  the latter End of this Year, and never ended, but with the  Diffolution of the Company. As therefore they were the  chief Occafion and Pretence of that Diffolution, it will not  be improper here, to give a fuller and more diftindt Account of them. Be- i86 "The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1620. Besides the Affairs of the Magazine, which, notwith- * ^ 'ftanding its Diffolution, ftill afforded Matter of Contention, Sr Gecrge ^^lete: were two other principal Subjects of Difpute and ConGovernor, fufion in the Company ; the fettling Sir Thomas Smith's Accounts, and the Profecution of Captain Jrgali, for his many  Outrages and exorbitant Proceedings in Virginia. Sir Thomas Smith had been Treafurer, from the firft Conftitution  of the Company in the Year 1606, till Jpril 28, 1619;  and in that time, there had pafTed through his Hands about  eighty thoufand Pounds. He had, in thofe Days, a very  great Intereft and Sway in the Company ; and to put the  befl Confl:ru6tion upon the Matter, he never expecfted to  be called to a ftrift and rigorous Account, and his Servants  had been very carelefs and remifs, in keeping his Books.  But feveral of the Company fufpecfted, that he had embezzled and converted much of the publick Money, to his  own private Ufe ; and were therefore very eager, to bring  him to an Account. Sir Thomas, on his Side, was very fair  in his ProfefEons, and prelTed, with much Warmth, the  full Settlement and finifhing the Affair ; offering to pay, not  only what fliould appear due from himfelf, but whatever  Wrong or Damage fhould have happened to the Company,  from his U.nder-Officers 0% Servants. But then his Receipts  were fo very faulty and deficient, and his Difbiirfements fo  void of all Warrant and proper Vouchers, that the. Company's Auditors, although they took much Pains, could  bring nothing to a Head ; and the whole only ferved, to  adminifter frefh Fuel to Animofities and Quarrels, without  any Profpedt of coming to a fatisfadtory Conclufion. As to Captain Argall, altho' he was under Profecution  from the Company, yet by his Craft and Management, by  the Power and Influence of his Friends, by his fhifting and  turning, and by going on the Expedition againfl the Algerines, he fo fhufHed and perplexed the Company, that he  at lafl efcaped, without any Punifhment or Reflitution at all.  And altho' Sir Thomas Smith, overpowered with the Juftice  and Neceflity of the thing, had firft commenced'the Profecution againft him, yet being now Fellow-Sufferers, and  equally aggrieved at the prefent upright and vigorous Adminiftration of the Company's Affairs, they joined Forces,  and did every thing in their Power, to difgrace, and vilify,  and retard the Succefs of the Enterprife. The principal  Perfons of their Faftion were, the Earl of Warwick ; Sir  Nathaniel Rich, the Earl's Brother ; Sir Thomas Wroth, who  was nearly allied to them by Marriage ; Sir John Woljienholme, a wealthy Merchant and a Farmer of the Cuftoms ;  with Alderman John/on, Mr, Canning, and Mr. EJftngton, three Book IV. The History of VIRGINIA. 187 three fa£):ious Citizens, and others of lefs Note, to the ifi*°Number of twenty fix in the whole, when their Fadlion'^i — r-— ^  was ftrongeft ; a very inconfiderable Party, had they not ^ ^'ff^'  gained the Ear and Support of a weak King, who had a Governor,  wonderful Inftinft and Propenfity to the wrong Side of every  Queftion, and with much Formality of Wifdom and Learning, for ever miftook the true Intereft of himfelf and his  Subje£ts. On the other Side appeared the Earl of Southampton, the Earl of Dorfet, the Earl of Devon/hire, the Vifcount Doncajler, Lord Cavendijh, Lord Sheffield, Lord  Paget, Sir Edward Sackvil, Sir Dudley Digges, Sir Edwin  Sandys, Sir fohn Davers, Sir Samuel Sandys, with a long  Roll of others, and in fliort, the whole Body of Adventurers in general, which confifted of near fifty Noblemen, fome  hundreds of Knights, .and many hundreds of Gentlemen,  eminent Merchants, and Citizens, to the full Amount of  a thoufand Perfons in all. But none acfted in the Support of  Truth and Juftice, with greater Spirit and Vigor, than the  Lord Cavendijh, afterwards Earl of Devonjhire, and Sir  Edward Sackvil. The former was a young Nobleman of  much Generofity, Spirit, and Eloquence ; and he fucceeded  Sir Thomas Smith, in the Place of Governor to the SomerIJlands Company. The latter, who afterwards became  Earl of Dorfet, was the Perfon of the greateft Fame in that  Age, for a facetious Vivacity, fparkUng Wit, and undaunted Courage, joined to a found and comprehenfive Underftanding, and an excellent Turn for Bufinefs. He was one  of the firft, that raifed theReputation of the Dorfet Family,  for Wit and Exaftnefs of Tafte and Difcernment ; but is  beft known to common Readers, fo^his Duel with Lord  Bruce, which is related in my Lord Clarendon and the Guardian, Books defervedly popular and in the Hands of every  Body. And as he appeared thus early in' the Caufe of the  Colony (for fuch is it owned to be by our AlTemblies of thofe  times) fo did he continue, to the laft, a conftant Friend and  Favourer of Virginia, As Sir George Yeardley had exprelTed his Defire to leave 1621.  the Government, at the Expiration of his Commiffion,  which would [be in the November following, the Earl of  Southampton recommended to the Company the Confideration of a proper Perfon, to fucceed him. His Lordfliip propofed to their Choice Sir Francis Wyat, a young Gentleman,  thought every way fufficient and equal to the Place, and  highjy efteemed, as he faid, on Account of his Birth, Education, Integrity of Life, and fair Fortune. However, he  earneftly prefled on the Company the Nomination of fuch  other Perfon or Perfons, as they fhould think proper, to ftand i88 The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. i6ai- ftand in Ekaion with him. But no other being fo much ' , 'as named, Sir Francis Wyat was chofen Governor,^to take Sir Georgt }jis Place at the Expiration of Sir George Teardkfs Comreardky, ^^ff^^^^ ^jjj ^^^ before. And to do him the greater Grace  " r. ^^^ Honour, as well as the better to enable and encourage  him in the Execution of his Office, they ele<aed him one  of his Majefty's Council in Mngtand for Virginia. They  alfo allowed him two hundred Pounds, for all neceflary  Provifions for his Voyage, with the free traniport of himfelf and Attendants, provided they did not exceed the Number of twenty Perfons. Dr. Lawrence Bohun, who had left Virginia in the Year  1611, with the Lord Delawarr, had now obtained a large  Grant of Land, for the Tranfportation of three hundred  Perfons. He was alfo appointed the Company's PhyficianGeneral to the Colony, tyith the Allowance of five hundred  Acres of Land and twenty Tenants ; under Covenant, to  maintain and make them good, from time to time, and at  his Deceafe, or other Removal, to leave the like Number  of Men and Stock of Cattkj as was allowed by the Company, and by them annexed to the Place. He accordingly fet  fail, in the Beginning of February, with eighty Paflengers,  in a Ship of an hundred and fixty Tons and eight Iron Guns  and a Falcon, commanded by Captain Anthony Chejier.  But about the Middle of March, they were attacked, near  Nevis in the fVeJi-Indies, by two Spanijh Men of War, of  three hundred Tons and fixteen or twenty Brafs Cannon  apeice. The Fight was fharp and defperate ; but the Englijh fo beftowed their Shot, and managed the Engagement  with fuch Dexterity and Bravery, that the Spaniards were,  glad to ftand aloof, and after following them a Day or two,  without any other remarkable Annoyance, at laft fell aftern,  and left them. There was made a very great Slaughter of  the Spaniards, fo that their Scupples ran with Blood ; and  the Captain of the Admiral-Shipj who adled the Part of a  brave Commander, was flain. On the Englijh Side, ten  were killed ; among whom was Dr. Bohun, whofe Death  was greatly lamented. He had ftudied long among the  learned Phyficians of the Low-Countries, and behaved himfelf in this Battle, like a worthy and valiant Gentleman.  In his Room, Mr. John Pot was elected, by the Company,  Phyfician-General to the Colony. He was recommended  by Dr. Guljione, an eminent Member of their Society, as  a Mafter of Arts, well prafticed in Chirurgery and Phyfic,  and expert in Chymical Procefles and other ingenious Parts  of his Profeffion ; whofe Service, he therefore conceived,  would be of great Ufe to the Colony. He was accordingly fent. Book IV. <W.5 History 0/ VIRGINIA. 189 fent, upon the fame Foot, as Dr. Bohun ; and was allowed 1621. his own, his Wife's, and two Servants Paflages. Dr. Gul-^ v ' Jione was likewife defired, to buy a Cheft of Phyfic of twen- ^" George  ty Pounds Value, and ten Pounds of Books, proper for the Governor.  rrofeflion, which (hould always belong to the Place. Captain William Newce offered, to tranfport and fettle a thoufand Perfons in Virginia^ by Midfummer, 1625 ;  and defired to be appointed their General, and to have a  Patent, with that Proportion of Land, and fuch other Privileges, as were ufually granted on the like Occafion. A  Patent was readily granted^ in the largeft and moft ample  Manner. But as to the Title and Command of General,  they refufed to grant it him ; becaufe it was a Power, properly belonging to the Governor only. Befides, it gave  fuch. an Independency, as was deftrudlive of all Order and  good Government ; and had therefore been loudly cried out  againft, in Captain Martin's extravagant Patent, and in a  Grant furreptitioufly and illegally obtained by Captain Jrgall, and therefore exprefly flopped, by the Company's Orders to the Governor in Virginia. But Captain Newce farther requefted, in order to enable him the better to go  through the Charge of fo great an Undertaking, to be appointed Marlhal of Virginia ; for which Poft he was eminently qualified, having ever been exercifed in military Affairs and Arms, and of noted Experience and Skill in Martial  Difcipline ; as appeared by his many Services in Ireland, and  by the Teftimony of divers honourable Perfons, upon their  own Knowledge. He was therefore conftituted Marfhal of  Virginia ; to take into his Charge, as well the Fortifications, Arms, and Forces of the ' Colony, as to caufe the  People, to be duly trained up in Military Difcipline^ and to  the Ufe and Exercife of ArhiS-. And th^y annexed fifteen  hundred Acres of Land and fifty Tenants to the Plac6, tb  be tranfported and furnifhed by himfelf, at eight Pounds  Charge to the Company a Man. And the' King alfo, being  highly pleafed at the Nomination of this Gentleman, conferred the Honour, of Knighthood upon him ; calling hini  his Knight-Marfhal of Virginia, and expreffing great Hopes  from the Management of a Perfon of his acknowledged Ca^  pacity and Skill. However, he did not long furvive his Arrival in Virginia ; but died, two Days after the reading his  Patent and Commiffion. i There was, at this time, above a thoufand Pounds,  diie in Virginia^ to the Company, for Rents and Duties ;  and they were likewife greatly fcandalifed and offended, to  find their frequent and preffing Orders, for raifing good and  ftaple Commodities, entirely flighted and neglefted. It was therefore  "the History of VIRGINIA. Book IV.  therefore thought neceflary, to appoint a particular Officer,  'by the Name of Treafurer ; who fhould have the Charge,  Sir George ^ot only of their Rents and Duties, but fhould alfo take  Govemo? 1"'° ^^'s more efpecial Regard and Care, to fee all Orders  and Direaions, fent from England, duly and faithfully executed, from time to time ; or otherwife to render a fufficient Reafon to the contrary. To this Office Mr. George  Sandys, the noted PoQt and Traveller was unanimoufly  elefled, as a Perfon every way fit, on Account of his Ability and Integrity. And they likewife allotted fifteen hundred Acres of Land^ perpetually to belong to the faid Place  of Treafurer, with fifty Tenants thereon ; and allowed  Mr. Sandys an hundred and fifty Pounds, to furnifli himfelf  for the Voyage, with the free Paflage of his Family, not  exceeding the Number of ten Perfons. And it was thought  proper, that two fuch eminent Officers as Marflial and  Treafurer, to which Places fuch worthy Gentlemen had  been preferred, fhould be admitted of his Majefly's Council in England, and appointed of the Council of State in  Virginia. Soon after, Mr. Richard Norwood, a Man famous, in  thofe Days, as a Mathematician, who had laid off the  Tribes and Lands, and made an exaft Plot of the Iflands  of Bermudas, was recommended to the Company for Surveyor of Virginia, and was accordingly eledled to the Place.  But I know not, how the Change came to be made, yet I  find, very foon after, Mr. William Glayborne appointed and  fent Surveyor. The Company allowed him thirty Pounds  a Year aiid a convenient Houfe, for his publick Service in  laying off their Lands ; with twenty Pounds paid in Hand,  to fiirnifh himfelf with Inflruments and Books, which he  was obliged to leave to his SuccefTors. They likewife allowed him the Tranfport of three Perfons, and gave him  two hundred Acres of Land in Fee-fimple ; and in cafe he  was employed in any private Survey, he was to receive fix  Shillings a Day, and to be found in Diet and Lodging. M R . Pory's Commiffion of Secretary was to determine, at  the fame Time, as Sir George Teardley's. He had given the  Company little Satisfadiion in that Office, but had been  plainly detefted, although a fworn Officer, of betraying  the Proceedings, and fecretly conveying the Proofs, againfb  Captain Argall, to the Earl of Warwick. And as he was  befides known, to be a profefTed Tool and Inflrument to  that Fadiion, the Company was at no Lofs or Hefitation,  about renewing his Commiffion. But four Gentlemen being ftrongly recommended to them, as fully qualified for  that Poft, in Point of Learning, Honefly, and Experience, they Book IV. rhe History of VIRGINIA. 191 they made Choice of Mr. Chrijlopher Davifon, and ad- '6*»mitted him a free Brother of the Company, and one of the"-; — r-^— '  Council of State in Virginia. And as the Company's ^i' Gwrfr  Ships were often delayed in the Country, through Neg- Qg^g^^^J^  ligence and Mifmanagement, it was refolved, to appoint  an OiEcer, by the Title of Vice-Admiral, who ftiould  take into his Charge the Care and Difpatch of them.  Mr. yohn Pountis therefore, one of the Council, who  had deferved well of both the Company and Colony,  was, this Summer, appointed to that Place provifionally,  and afterwards confirmed by the Quarter Court in November, with the Allowance of three hundred Acres of Land  and twelve Tenants. The late large Tranfportations of People, the furnifhing and fitting out the new Governor and thefe other Officers, with the vaft Charge of providing them with Tenants  and Servants, and other needful and well-defigned ExpenceSj  did fo entirely exhauft the publick Treafury of the Company, that it never afterwards recovered itfelf to any tolerable  Degree of Affluence or Wealth. And befides, the Lotteries were now at an End, which were the only Means of  raifing a Fund again, and which alone had brought twenty  nine thoufand Pounds Sterling into the Company's Stock.  Wherefore Mr. Smith obferved to them, that the Lotteries,  which had thus far fupplied the real and fubftantial Food,  by which Virginia had been nouriflied, did now no longer  fubfift. To the End therefore, that flie might ftill be preferved, by divulging Fame and good Report, he propofed,  in the Name of himfelf and many others of the Society,  to have a fair and perfpicuous Hiftory compiled of the Country, from the firft Difcovery to that Time ; wherein the  Memory and Deferts of many of her worthy Undertakers,  as Sir Walter Ralegh, Sir George Somers, the Lord Delawarr. Sir Thomas Dale, and Sir Thomas Gates (for both  thofe Knights, after their Return from Virginia, had gone  to the Eaji-Indies, and there died) together with divers  others then living, might be commended to eternal Thankfulnefs. He regretted their prefent Inability, in having no  other Coin, wherewith to recompence the great Pains and  Merit of the well-deferving. But he affirmed, that the beft  planted Parts of America, under the Spanijh Government,  at the like Age, afforded not better Matter of Relation,  than Virginia then did. And he faid, that the Effedl, which  fuch a general " Hiftory, deduced to the Life, would have,  throughout the Kingdom, on the popular Opinion of the  common SubjecS:, might be gathered, from the Succefs of  the little Pamphlets or Declarations, lately publiflied. And he  The History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book IV, he further urged the immediate Performance thereof, be- 'caufe a few Years would confume the Lives of many. Sir George ^hofe Memories retained much, and might alfo devour Governo'r ^^^^^ Letters and Intelligences, which yet remained in loofe and neglefted Papers. This Speech was received by the whole Court, with  very great Applaufe, as fpoken freely, and to an excellent  Purpofe ; and it was refolved, to have it confidered, and  put in Practice, in due Time. Mr. Smith was alfo exceedingly commended, as well for this, as for always preferring  Motions of efpecial Confequence. And it was from this  Motion, I fuppofe, that Captain Smith was requefted, in  the Company's Name, to write his Hiftory of Virginia ;  as he himfelf tells us, p. 168. However the Captain's Deferts feem not, about this Time, to have been fully underftood or regarded. For I find him, foon after, preferring  a Petition to the Conipany, fetting forth ; That he had  not only adventured Money, but had alfo twice built JamesTown, and four other Plantations ; and had difcovered the^  Country, and relieved the Colony, three Years together,  with fuch Provifions, as he got from the Savages, with great  Peril and Hazard of his Life ; and therefore he defired, in  Confideration thereof, that the Company would be pleafed  to reward him, either out of their Treafury at home, or  their Profits in Virginia. And certainly, confidering his  many great and extraordinary Services, he was highly worthy their Regard. But the Court referred Tiim to the Committee, appointed for rewarding Men upon Merit ; and from  whatever Caufe it happened, I find nothing farther done  in the Matter. So that he, with a Fate very ufual to publick Spirits, had "Reafon to complain, that every Shilling,  which he had gained by thefe Enterprizes, had coft him a  Pound ; and that what he had got, in fome fuccefsful Cam  paigns at War, had been chearfuUy fpent on Virginia and  New-England, for the publick Good. Yet he begrudges  it not, but fhould think himfelf happy, to fee their Profperity and Advancement. A T the Court of Election, the Earl of Southampton was  again chofen Treafurer for the enfuing Year, with an unanimous Voice. His Lordfliip was then abfent, having been  long detained, that Day, in Parliament. But at his coming  to Court, he was pleafed to accept the Place, in a very noble Manner ; and he had the hearty Thanks of the whole  Court returned him, for his honourable Care and Pains,  ever fince his Entrance into that Place of Government, to  uphold and advance the Plantation. And at his Lordfhip's  Requeft, Mr. John Farrar, of whofe Fidelity and Sufficiency Book IV. The History of VIRGINIA. 193 ciency they already had fo much Experience, was moft wU- '6^'lingly continued in his Office of Deputy. -; — t ■ The Earl of Warwick was highly offended at Su- George^" '^df^'  Teardley^ for intercepting a Pacquet of Letters, and difco- Governor,  vering the Correfpondence between Secretary Pory and  himfelf. He therefore loudly declared his Difpleafure, and  took all poffible Methods to daunt and difcourage him, from  proceeding vigoroufly in JrgalPs Profecution. To this End,  he caufed it to be rumoured over all Virginia, even to Opechancanough, and had it confirmed by Letters from England,  that he himfelf was coming over mort'y, in Perfon, to be  their Governor, with Captain Argall for his Pilot ; and that  then he would ca'l Sir George Teardly feverely into Queftion,  for his own Government, and would take a fliarp and full  Revenge. Thefe Reports much weakened the Strength and  Authority of the Government ; and they likewife fo affedled  Sir George Teardley, a Man of a meek and gentle Nature,  and threw him into fuch a Dejeftion of Spirit, that he fell  into a long and languifhing Sicknefs, to the general Hurt  and Negleft of the publick Bufinefs, as well as Captain Ar~  gair% AiFair in particular. The Company alfo, tins Year, entertained fome ProjecSs for producing ufeful Commodities ; and as three of the  Mafter Workmen of their Iron Works were dead, they  fent over Mr. John Berkeley, and Maurice, his Son, who  were commended, as very (kilful in that Way, with twenty  other experienced Workmen. They likewife ordered ' a  Bill to be prepared for the Parliament, for fending over the  Poor, which were now become very numerous and burthenfome to the feveral Pariflies, to be fet to work, and ufefully  employed, in Virginia. Sir George Teardley complained,  that the Council of State lived very diftant and difperfed ;  and having no Allowance for their Attendance, could fcarce  be got together. Whereupon the Company ordered, that  the Council ftiould meet, four times a Year, and fliould  hold Quarter Seffions, a whole Week ttogether ; to aflift  the Governor, from time to time, as well in Matter of  Counfel and of State, as in all Caufes of Importance, and  for Redrefs of general and particular Grievances. And that  their Number might make their Meetings the more eafy,  befides the feven, laft Year appointed, and the new Officers  of State, now going over, they alfo added, in the Room of  Dr. Bohun and two others, that were dead, Mr, Pot, the  Rev. Mr. Robert Pawlet, Captain Roger Smith, and Mr. Leech.  This lafl: Gentleman was going over, to view the Country,  and to pitch upon a proper Place of Settlement, for the famous and munificent William Earl of Pembroke ; who had  ^'^ O underI'he History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. undertaken, with his Affociates, to plant thirty thoufand 'Acres of Land, and confequently to tranfport fix hundred arG«r^« Perfons. GoveS. The latter End of July, or Beginning of ^ugujf. Sir  Francis Wyat fet out for his Government, with the Treafurer. Secretary, Phyfician-General, and Surveyor, in Company with nine Sail of Ships ; all which arrived fafe in Virginia, about OSlober, without the Lofs of one fingle Paffenger. With him, was fent a Body of Inftruftions to the  Governor, for the time being, and the Council of State in  Virginia ; confifting of forty feven Articles, and figned by  the Earl of Southampton, Sir Edwin Sandys, Sir John Da^  vers, and others of the Council. In thefe, it was firft recommended to them, to take into their efpecial Regard the  Service of Almighty God, and the Obfervance of his divine  Laws ; and that the People fhould be trained up, in true  Religion and Virtue. And fmce their Endeavours, for the  Eftablifliment of the Honour and Rights of the Church and  Miniftry, had not yet taken due EfFedl, they were required,  to employ their utmoft Care, to advance all things appertaining to the Order and Adminiftration of Divine Service,  according to the Form and Difcipline of the Church of  England; carefully to avoid all fadtious and needlefs Novelties, which only tended to the Difturbance of Peace and  Unity ; and to caufe, that the Minifters fhould be duly refpecfted and maintained, and the Churches, or Places appointed for Divine Service, decently accommodated, according to former Orders in that Behalf. They were, in  the next Place, commanded, to keep the People in due  Obedience to the King ; to provide, that Juftice might be  equally adminiftered to all, as near as could be, according  to the Fdrms and Conftitution of England; to prevent all  Corruption, tending to the Perverfion or Delay of Juftice ;  to proteft the Natives, from Injury and Oppreflion ; and to  cultivate Peace and Friendftiip with them, as far as it fhould  be confiftent with the Honour of the Nation and Safety of  the People. They were likewife required, to make the  People apply themfelves to an induftrious Way of Life ;  and to fupprefs all Gaming, Drunkennefs, and Excefs in  Apparel. To this End it was ordained, that no Perfon,  except the Council, or the Heads of Hundreds and Plantations, with their Wives and Children, fhould wear Gold  on their Cloaths, or any Apparel of Silk, except fuch as  had been raifed by their own Induftry. But the Governor  and Council anfwered to this, that they knew of no Excefs  in Apparel, except in the Price of it ; and had it not come  from them, they fhould have thought it a Flout upon the  Colony, for their Poverty and Nakednefs. They  Book IV. rhe History of VIRGINIA. They were alfo enjoined, to ufe great Care, that no i'uft Caufe of Offence be given to any other Prince, State, or'  'eople ; to permit no Captain, or other Perfon, under Pre- ^" ^'""S'  tence of Trade, to fail to the Wejl-Indies, to rob and fpoil ; Governor,  not to give Harbour or Refuge, on the Coafts or in the  Country, to any Pirates or Banditti, but feverely to profecute and punim them ; and to take better Care, for proper  and efFeftual Fortifications. They further prefled upon  them, in a particular Manner, the ufing all probable Means  of bringing over the Natives, to a Love of Civility, and to  the Know^ledge of God, and his true Religion. To which  Purpofe, they obferved to them, that the Example, given  by the Englijh in their ovi^n Perfons and Families, wfould be  of Angular and chief Moment : That it would be proper,  to draw the bell difpofed among the Indians, to converfe  and labour with our People, for a convenient Reward ; that  thereby, being reconciled to a civil Way of Life, and  brought to a Senfe of God and Religion, they might afterwards become Inflrruments in the general Converfion of their  Countrymen, fo much defired : That each Town, Burrough, and Hundred, ought to procure, by jufl Means, a  certain Number of their Children, to be brought up in the  firft Elements of Litterature : That the rnoft towardly of  thefe fliould be fitted for the College ; in building of which,  they purpofed to proceed, as foon as any Profit arofe from  the Eftate, appropriated to that Ufe ; and they earneftly  required their utmoft Help and Furtherance, in that pious  and important Work ; not doubting the particular Blelling  of God upon the Colony, and being afliired of the Love of  all good Men, upon that Account. They next proceeded to give InftruiStions, for the  Reception and Accommodation of the new Governor,  and of the other Officers and People, then fent. And  they prefled upon them the raifing feveral ufeful Commodities ; as well Corn, Wine, Silk, and others heretofore frequently mentioned, as alfo the making Oil of  Walnuts, employing their Apothecaries in Diftillation, and  fearching the Country for Minerals, Dyes, Gums, Drugs,  and the like. And they ordered them particularly, by the  King's Advice and Defire, to draw the People off of their  exceffive planting of Tobacco. To that End, they were  commanded to permit them, to make only an hundred  Pounds of Tobacco a Head ; and to take all poffible Care,  to improve that Proportion in Goodnefs, as much as might  be, which would bring their Commodity into Requeft, and  caufe a more certain Benefit to the Planter. They likewife  added many other Advices and Inftrucftions, for the Admini- O 2 flration  rhe History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. ftration of Juftice, the good Government, and happy Ad' vancement of the Colony.  Sir Gcorgt J ^ Q^fe of the Death, Removal, or Sufpenfion of the  Gov«^r. Governor, the Council, or major Part of them, then refident in Virginia^ w^ere ordered, immediately to aflemble  themfelves, vi^ithin fourteen Days, or fooner, and out of  their own Body, to eledl a Perfon, to fupply the Place, for  the Time, ^ut if the Voices ftiould happen to be equal,  then Eleftion vi^as to be made of the Lieutenant-Governor ;  and in his Abfence, or neceffary Caufe of declining it, the  Marflial fhould fucceed ; next, the Treafurer ; and then  one of the two Deputies, for the College and Company's  Lands ; till the Government fhould be fettled in one of thofe  chief Officers. And the Governor was authorifed, to determine and punifli, at his Difcretion, any fudden and emergent Bufinefs, and all Negledl or Contempt of Authority,  in any Kind or Perfon whatfoever ; except only the Council in their own Perfons, who were, in fuch Cafes, to be  fummoned to appear, at the next Quarter Seffion of the  Council, and there to abide their Cenfure. But if the Governor thought, it concerned the Peace and Welfare of the  Colony, to proceed more fpeedily with fuch Offender, that  then it fhould be lawful for him, to fummon an extraordinary Council, at which fix of the Council, at leafl, fhould  be prefent with the Governor ; and by Majority of Voices,  any Counfellor might be committed, or obliged to give Bail  for his Appearance. Sir Francis Wyat alfo brought over with him an Ordinance or Charter, from the Treafurer, Council, and Company in England^ for fettling the Conflitution and Government of Virginia^ in the Governor, the Council of State,  as his Affiflants, and the General AfTembly. This AfTembly was to confift of the Governor, Council of State, and  two Burgeffes, chofen by every Town, Hundred, or particular Plantation. All Matters were to be decided, determined, and ordered in it, by the Majority of Voices, then  prefent ; referving to the Governor a Negative upon the  Whole. And they were empowered, to treat, confult, and  conclude, as well concerning all emergent Occafions, relating to the publick Weal of the faid Colony, and every  Part thereof, as alfo to make, ordain, and enad): fuch general Laws and Orders, as fhould, from time to time, appear  neceffary : Provided neverthelefs, that no Law, or Ordinance, made in the faid General AfTembly, fhould be of  Force or Validity, unlefs the fame fhould be folemnly confirmed and ratified, in a General Quarter Court of the  Company in England^ and returned under their Seal : As alfo. Book. IV. "the History of VIRGINIA. 197 alfo, when this Form of Government ftiould be once well '6ii- framed and fettled, that no Orders, of the Court in England^ ^ — v ' fliould bind the Colony, befisre they were ratified and con- Sir George  firmed, in like Manner, by the General Aflembly in Virgi- Governor  nia. But in all other things, they were commanded, to  follow the Policy, Form of Government, Laws, Cuftoms,  Manner of Trial, and other Adminiftration of Juftice, ufed  in England. The Company's Treafury was fo reduced, that it could  not now fuffice for feveral things of the utmoft Necellity and  Advantage. Wherefore, to fupply this Deficiency, they  entered into a Method of preparing Rolls, and offering them  to the voluntary Subfcription of the Adventurers. Whatever was fent to Virginia upon thefe Rolls, was there fold,  by the Cape-Merchant or fome other Fa£tor, at fuch a moderate Price, as fliould indemnify the Subfcribers for their  Money advanced, and for all Charges incident thereupon.  At this time, four Rolls were prepared and brought into  Court, for the Company's Subfcription. The firfl: was for  Apparel, and other neceflary Provifions and Utenfils, for  the Colony. The fecond, for fending an hundred more  Maids, to make Wives ; and fixty were accordingly fent,  young, handfome, and well recommended to the Company,  for their virtuous Education and Demeanor. With them  was fent over the feveral Recommendations and Teftimonials of their Behaviour, that the Purchafers might thence  be enabled to judge, how to chufe. The Price of thefe  Wives was ftated at an hundred and twenty Pounds of Tobacco, and afterwards advanced to an hundred and fifty, and  proportionably more, if any of them ftiould happen to die ;  fo that the Adventurers might be refunded their original  Charge. And it was alfo ordered, that this Debt for Wives  fliould have the Precedency of all others, and be firfl: recoverable. And it was fl:ri£tly enjoined, that they fliould  be well ufed, and not married to Servants, but to fuch Freemen and Tenants, as could handfomely fupport them ; that,  by their good Fortune, Multitudes of others might be allured to come over, on thd Profpedt of advantageous Matches. And the Company likewife declared their Intention,  that, for the Encouragement of fettled Families, and fecuring a Pofterity, they would prefer and make Confignments  to married Men, before fingle Perfons ; and that as many  Boys fliould be fent, as there were Maids, to. be 'Prentices  to thofe who married them. They alfo granted the Adventurers, who fubfcribed to this Roll, a ratable Proportion  of Land, according to the Number of the Maids fent, to be  laid oiF together and formed into a Town, by the Name of O 3 Maidjiown.  The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV.  Maidjiown. The third Roll was for a Glafs Furnace, to  'make Beads, which was the current Coin in the Indian  Sir George Xrade ; and one Captain Norton^ with fome Italian WorkG^e^r. "len, was fent over for that Purpofe. The fourth was for  fetting out a trading Voyage with the Indians, for Skins and  Furs. For, the Company was informed from feveral Hands,  that the French and Dutch carried on a very profitable Trade  of that fort, in Delawarr and Hudfon's Rivers, which were  within the Limits of their Grant, and then efteemed Parts  of Virginia. They therefore refolved, to vindicate their  Right, and not to permit Foreigners to run away with fo  lucrative a Branch of their Trade. One Captain Jones  was accordingly fent upon the Voyage ; but by the Wick^  ednefs of him and his Mariners, the Adventure was loft,  and the whole Projedl overthrown. To thefe Rolls,  the Earl of Southampton and Sir Edwin Sandys, each fubfcribed two hundred Pounds ; and fuch was the Zeal and  Refolution of the Adventurers to advance the Colony, that  they were foon compleated, and put into Execution. At  the fame time, the Company, in their Letters to the Governor and Council, recommends to them the Prevention  of Fraud and Deceit in Tobacco ; and that fome Provifion  fliould be made, for burning all bafe and rotten Trafli, and  none fufFered to go home, but what was very good ; whereby, they faid, there would certainly be more advanced in  the Price, than loft in the Quantity. But Tobacco was, at this time, a very linking Commodity. For altho' the Planters magifterially forced it on  the Company and others, at the current Price of three Shillings a Pound, yet it would not turn out at home, after  Shrinkage and Wafte, and the Difcharge of the Duty and  Freight, (which laft alone was three Pence, and fometimes  four Pence, a Pound) at above two Shillings for the beft,  and the inferior Sort at icarce eighteen Pence a Pound. And  befides, the Trade was ftrangely hampered and perplexed,  by the weak and unfteady Counfels of the puny Monarch,  then on the Throne. For altho', in the Beginning of the  former Year, the Company had yielded to his unreafonable  Demand of twelve Pence a Pound, yet foon after, in the  fame Summer, he iffued a Proclamation, prohibiting a general Importation of Tobacco, and reftraining the Quantity  from Virginia and the Somer-IJlands, to fifty five thoufand  Weight. At the fame time, taking Advantage of an OfFer  of Sir Thomas Smith and Alderman John/on, in the Name  of the Company, but without their Knowledge or Authority, and fo utterly difclaimed by them, he granted a Monopoly of Tobacco ; the fole Importation whereof was granted, Book IV. i:he History 0/ VIRGINIA. 199 granted by Letters patent, firft to Sir Thomas Roe and his 1621. Aflbciates (at whofe Defire and Inftigation the Proclamation, ' v — —' above mentioned, was iffued) and the Year after, to Mr. ^^ ^f""^"  Jacob and certain other Patentees. They proceeded moft Governor,  injurioufly againft both Companies, not only ftinting them  to too fcant a Proportion, but alfo reftraining them from  felling their Tobacco, without their Seal and Allowance  firft had ; for which, under the Pretence and Title of Garbling, they were obliged to pay four Pence a Pound. This  Garbling was an ancient Cuftom of the City of London ; and  an Officer was appointed, who had Power to enter into any  Shop or Warehoufe, to view and fearch Drugs and Spices,  and to garble the fame ; that is, to make them clean from  all Garbles or Trafli. And it was now put into Execution,  and arbitrarily applied to Tobacco (a new Commodity in  England, and therefore nor legally fubjed: to Garbling,  without an exprefs Law) in order the more efFedtually to  opprefs the Companies and Plantations, and to fqueeze the  greater Gain out of them. Thus injured and diftrefled, the Company prefented  their Petition and Reprefentation to his Majefty, to which  they received a gracious Anfwer, with large Profeflions of  his Love to the Colonies, and that it never was his Intention  to grant any thing to their Prejudice; but without any Redrefs of their Grievance. It was therefore at laft refolved,  to prefer a Petition to the Houfe of Commons, and therein  to complain of thefe Oppreffions, which tended to the utter  Deftruilion and Overthrow of the Colonies ; and as that  Houfe had called into Queftion, and intended to fupprefs,  other Monopolies (a great and crying Grievance of thofe  Times) they doubted not, to receive from them a full and  ample Redrefs. They likewife, at the Motion of Sir Edwin Sandys, prefented Mr. Edward Bennet, a Citizen of  London, with the Freedom of their Company ; becaufe he  had written a Treatife, fetting forth, in a clear and lively  Manner, the great Inconvenience and Damage to the Nation, by the Importation of Spanijh Tobacco ; and becaufe  he had frequently attended the Committees of the Houfe of  Commons, who were well inclined, to aiFord their utmoft  Affiftance, for the Prohibition of foreign Tobacco. This  Mr. Bennet immediately became the moft deeply engaged,  and was far the largeft and moft confiderable Adventurer  of any, then known, in the Affair of Virginia ; whofe  Foundations, in that early time, have continued down to  the prefent. For his Nephew, Richard Bennet, Efq; was  the firft Governor of Virginia, by the Election of the Colony, in the time of CromivelPs Ufurpation ; and the Re- O 4 main  The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. main of the Family, now feated in Maryland, is ftill the  richeft and moft wealthy, in all Kinds of Fortune and ESir Giorgi {[^te, of any in this Part of America. However, fince the  GOTeS Somer-IJlands could not well fubfift without the Profits of  their Tobacco, and as the Territory of Virginia was large,  their Soil good, and great Hopes conceived, that many other  valuable Commodities would foon be produced and returned  from thence, it was agreed, that the whole 55,000 Weight  fliould be imported from thofe Iflands ; and the Virginia  Company procured Storehoufes, and appointed Fadlors, at  Middlehurg and Flujhing, and compounded with the States  of thofe Cities, for a Half Penny a Pound Cuftom, for the  Import, and the fame Rate for the Export, of their Tobacco. So that no Virginia Tobacco was imported into  England, this Year, but all was carried and difpofed of in  Holland. The News of this State of their Affairs coming to Virginia, the Colony was greatly alarmed, and drew up an  humble Petition to the King, fetting forth : That his Majefty, out of his religious Defire to fpeed the Gofpel of  Chrift, and princely Ambition to enlarge his Dominions,  had given Encouragement to fuch, as would go to Virginia, and granted them many goodly Privileges and Liberties,  under the great Seal of England, than which they thought  no earthly Affurance more firm and inviolable : That in  Confidence hereof, they, his Majefty's poor Subjedls, had  adventured their Lives and Fortunes thither ; and in the  Profecution of the Enterprife, had undergone fuch incredible Difficulties and Sufferings, as would be fhocking, in the  Relation, to his Majefly's facred Ears : That they had now,  by the Divine Affiflance, in fome Meafure, overcome thofe  Difficulties, and brought themfelves to an Ability of fubfifting, without any other Help from England, than the ufual  Courfe of Commerce ; but that they had, of late, been  brought into Danger, of returning into their former, or even  worfe Circumftances, by the finifter PratSices of fome Members of the Company at home ; who, pretending his Majefly's Profit, but really aiming at their own exorbitant  Gain, had obtained a Proclamation, to prohibit the Importation of Tobacco into England: That other things, of  greater real Value, required more time, than their prefling  Neceffities would allow, and more Help, to bring them to  Perfecftion, than they had, till of late, been furniflied withal ; and that, therefore. Tobacco was the only Commodity,  they had yet been able to raife, in order to fupply themfelves  and Families with Apparel, and other needful Supplements  of Life : That, if it fhould be thus fupprefTed and prohibited, Book IV. rbe History of VIRGINIA. 201 bited, they muft all, of Neceflity, perish, for Want of i6»iCloathing, and fuch Neceflaries, as both their Nature and *"- — v— '  Education required : That his Majefty would, thereby, not S'"" George  only lofe fo many good and loyal Subjefts, as had adventu- Q^y^^^^  red their Lives and Subftance to Virginia, for the Promotion of thofe great Ends, the Glory of God, and his Majefly's Service, but muft likewife be deprived of the Hope  and Profpeft, of acquiring a Territory, as large, and capa-,  ble of becoming as opulent, as any of thofe Kingdoms, he  at prefent poflefled : Since therefore they were aflured, that  his Majefty tendered the Lives and Welfare of his SubjecSs,  above Thoufands of Gold and Silver, and fince his Royal  Word was engaged, and even ratified under the great Seal  of England, they befought him, out of his princely Companion, either to revoke that Proclamation, and to reftore  them to their ancient Liberty, or elfe to fend for them  home, and not fufFer the Heathen to triumph over them. This Petition was tranfmitted to the Treafurer and Company, and was feconded by a Letter, from Sir George Yeardley and the Council, to the Company ; defiring, that it  might be prefented to his Majefty, in as humble and effectual a Manner, as pofEble ; becaufe, as they conceived, the  very Life of the Colony depended upon the Succefs of it.  But before .it came to hand, the King was become fenfible  of the Damage, that hence accrued to himfelf, by the Diminution of his Cuftoms. The Deputy therefore, and fome  others of the Company^ were fent for, in Oliober this Year,  and received an angry Rebuke from the Lords of the Privy  Council ; importing, that Complaint had been made to that  Board, that the Company had fet up a Trade in Holland,  and carried all their Commodities thither ; and requiring an  Anfwer, whether they would bring all their Commodities  into England, or continue their Trade in the Low-Countries.  To the former Part of this, the Anfwer was ready and obvious ; that they had indeed carried their Tobacco to Middleburg, not out of Choice, but being conftrained thereto  by his Majefty's Proclamation, and an Order of their own  Boa'rd. And as to the latter Part, concerning bringing all  their Commodities into England^ as it was a new and unexpetSed Propofition, and a Point of great Weight and future Confequence, they took fome time to confider of it,  and then returned a long and very refpedlful Anfwer : That it was a Liberty and Privilege, generally taken  and enjoyed, by all his Majefty's Subjedis, to carry their  Commodities to the beft Markets : That many Commodities were now fet on Foot, and expected foon to be returned  from Virginia, which, altho' in fome Demand in other  28 Countries,  The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. Countries, yet would not be vendible in England, nor pay  ' the Expence of Freight and Cuftom : That neither the  Sir George Mufcovy Company, nor any other ancient Corporation, was  Govelnor. ^^^^"^ ^uch a Reftraint, to whofe greateft Privileges and Inrimunities, they were entitled, by the exprefs Words of his  Majefty's Charter : That the Company had granted feveral  Patents, with the fame Privileges, as they themfelves enjoyed, to divers Perfons of noble and worthy Families, who  had thereupon expended great Sums of Money, and fome  their whole Eftates in the Plantation ; and that it was not  in their Power, nor would it be confonant to Law or Equity, now to revoke or reftrain them: That they conceived  themfelves to have no Right or Authority, to difpofe of the  Goods of the private Planters in Virginia, who are declared,  by his Majefty's Charter, to be as free, as any other his Subjedls, and who had merited, by their long and hard Services,  all Manner of Immunity and Encouragement : That they  could not forbid or reftrain them, from trading and bartering their Commodities freely, with fuch Ships, as carried  Paflengers, moft of which proceeded on trading Voyages,  and returned not direftly to England : That a Trade had  lately begun between Ireland and Virginia, for Cattle and  other Neceflaries, for which Contrafts were made in Tobacco ; and that this Trade would hereby be nipped in the  Bud, to the exceeding great Prejudice, and the Hazard of  the utter Ruin of the Colony : And laftly. That it was not  in the Power of the few Members of the Company, then in  Town in the time of Vacation, to conclude any thing pofitive, in an Affair of that vaft Importance ; wherein above a  thoufand Adventurers in England, and near four thoufand  Inhabitants of Virginia, were deeply interefted and concerned. After which they concluded, with afluring their Lordftiips, that they affeflred no foreign Trade, but in Cafes of  mere Neceffity, and for the better Support and Advancement of the Colony ; that they ftiould always endeavour at  fuch a mutual Commerce between England and Virginia,  as fliould be conliftent with the Honour and Benefit of both ;  and that, next to God's Glory, they chiefly aimed at the  Good of their Country, his Majefty's Honour, and the Advancement of his Profit and Revenue ; for which Ends,  they had, out of their own private Eftates, befides their  Labour and Time, expended above an hundred thoufand  Pounds, without any Return, not only of Profit, but even  of the leaft Part of the Principal itfelf, to any one of the Adventurers, that they knew of. This Anfwer gave no Satisfadtion to their Lordfhips ;  but they were referred to Mr. Jacob, their old Antagonift and  Book IV. rbe History of VIRGINIA. and Oppreflbr ; and were likewife ordered, to give in their  peremptory Anfwer, whether they would import, not all '  their Commodities, but all their Tobacco only, into En-^" *j7'^'  gland. With Mr. Jacob, they could come to no fatisfac- Qg^^^^gJ  tory Accommodation ; and as to importing all their Tobacco into England, they befought their Lordfhips, to be left  at Liberty, either to import, or not import it into England,  as they fhould find it moft beneficial to the Colony. But  if they muft be obliged to import all or none, they declared, it was their Choice, to import none into England, the  enfuing Year. But their Lordfliips termed this an undutiful Anfwer, and commanded them, at their Peril, to bring  all their Tobacco into England. And the Deputy and Committee, appointed to attend their Lordfhips, offering fome  Reafons, they were told, that they were not to difpute at  that Board, but to obey ; and fo were difmiffed, with high  Marks of their Difpleafure and Indignation. These Proceedings, being reported to the Company,  caufed great Grief and DejeSion among them. For the  Importation of Spanijh, and all other Tobaccoes, was then  free ; and altho' the Houfe of Commons, in their laft Seffion, had entered into fome Confideration about it, yet I  cannot find, that any thing material was done in the Matter. And as to the King, out of his doating Fondnefs for  the Spanijh Match, and his eager Defire, to give all poffible  Pleafure and Advantage to his good Friend and Brother, the  King of Spain, he was even a£tive and diligent, to protedt  and advance the Importation of Spanijh Tobacco. However the Deputy exhorted the Company, not to be difcouraged at thefe Difafters. For he hoped, that God would  ftill exert himfelf i-n the Protection of Virginia, who had  turned for the beft, divers former Projects, which threatned  the Ruin and Deftruftion of the Colony. And he defired,  that having put their Hands to the Plough, they would not  now look back, or be weary of well-doing. For -the Action was univerfally confeffed, to be moft chriftian, honourable, and glorious, and of extreme Confequence to the  Commonwealth and Realm of England; and altho' they  might feem to have caft their Bread upon the Waters, yet  after many Days, he doubted not, but they ihould find it  again, to their great Comfort and Advantage. And he farther told them, that altho' their exhaufted Treafury had  been able to do little, that Year, for fending People to Virginia, yet it had pleafed God, to ftir up fo many worthy  Minds, for the Advancement of the Colony, that no lefs  than twenty .Ships were already gone, or ready to go, in  whick would be tranfported above a thoufand Perfons, But by 204 "^^^ History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1 621. by Captain Smiths Account, there were twenty one Sail ■ > ■ of Ships fent this Year, with thirteen hundred. Men, Wo- Kr George ^jg^, and Children ; which might likewife be true, as it Governor. ^^^ °"ly O£iober, and the Year not concluded, when Mr. Deputy Farrar made this Report to the Company. Mr. Copeland, Chaplain to the Royal James^ an EajlIndia Ship juft returned to England, by his Example and  Perfuafions, prevailed on the Ship's Company, to contribute  feventy Pounds, towards building a Church or a Free-fchool  in Virginia ; and an unknown Perfon gave thirty Pounds  ■ more, to make the Benefaftion an hundred ; to which twenty five Pounds were afterwards added, by another unknown  Perfon. It ^as therefore determined, to build a School at  Charles-City (which was judged the moft commodious Place,  and moft convenient to all Parts of the Colony) by the Name  of the Eaji-India School ; and the Company allotted, for  the Maintenance of the Mafter and Ufher, a thoufand Acres of Land, with five Servants and' an Overfeer. This  School was to be collegiate, and to have Dependence upon  the College at Henrico ; into which, as foon as the College  was fufficiently endowed, and capable to receive them, the  Scholars were to be admitted and advanced, according to  their Deferts and Proficiency in Learning. Mr. Copeland  was alfo prefented with the Freedom of the Company, and  with three hundred Acres of Land in Virginia. And Car* penters were accordingly fent over for this Purpofe, early the next Year.  Sir Francis On the 1 8th of November, Sir Francis Wyat entered  Wyat, Go- upon his Government ; but inftead of his hundred Tenants,  vernor. j^^ received only forty fix from Sir George Yeardley, who  refufed to make the Number good, as he was under no  fuch Contrail with the Company, when he came Governor, and as he had even offered to furrender them all back  again, into the Company's Hands. Sir Francis fent Mr.  Thorpe immediately, to Opitchapan and Opechancanough, to  confirm all former Leagues, between the Englijh and them.  They both expreffed great Satisfaction at the Arrival of this  new Governor, and were content, that the Englijh fliould  inhabit the Country ; and Mr. Thorpe thought, that he perceived more Motions of Religion in Opechancanough, than  could eafily be imagined, in fo great Ignorance and Blindnefs. He acknowledged his own Religion, not to be the  right Way ; and defired, to be inftrucfted in the Chrijiian  Faith. He confeffed, that God loved the Englijh better  than them ; and he thought, the Caufe of God's Anger  againft them was their Cuftom of conjuring their Children,  and making them black Boys. He had alfo feme I^ow- ledge Book IV. rbe History of VIRGINIA. 205 ledge of the Heavens ; had obferved the North Star and i6!'i- the Courfe of the Coriftellation about it ; -and called the^ v — -^ Great Bear, Manguahaian, which, in their Language, fig-^'"" ^''«"f"  hiRed the fame. He gave Mr. Thorpe Hopes of their en- yj,fnor  tertaining fome Englijh Families among them, and their  fending fome of theirs to cohabit with the Englijh ; and  confirmed a former Promife, of fending a Guide with the  Englijh to fome Mines beyond the Falls. But all thefe fair  Profeffions and Promifes feem to have been only Diflimulation and Policy. For that favage Prince certainly never  had any real Friendfliip or Love for the Englijh ; but  watched all proper Opportunities and Pretences, to do them  Mifchief, or even utterly deflroy them. It was likewife  ordered, upon the Acceflion of this new Governor, that the  Colony fhould only tend a thoufand Plants, for every Head,  with nine Leaves on each Plant ; which, by their Computation, would amount to about an hundred Weight, according to the Company's exprefs InftrucSions, in Confequence of his Majefly's Defire and Advice. Mr. Gookin  too, who was under Contraft with the Company for Cattle, arrived with them out of Ireland^ on the 22d of November ; and he brought with him fifty Men of his own, and  thirty Paflengers, exceedingly well furniflied with all Kinds  of Provifion, and feated himfelf at Newport' s-News. The  Inhabitants alfo made a Contribution of fifteen hundred  Pounds, to build a Gueft-Houfe, for the Reception and  Entertainment of New-Comers ; which was accordingly  undertaken, and in a Way of being well executed, by  Lieutenant Jabez Whitaker, to his own great Commendation, and to the general Satisfa<Sion of the People here, and  the Company in London. Before I finifli this Year, it will not be improper,  briefly to remark, what then pafled in the Parliament of  England. There were two Seflions of Parliament, this  Year. The firft began in yanuary, and pafl^ed oflF peaceably. They granted the King Money, to fupport the Palatine of the Rhine, againft the Houfe of Aujiria ; and  were content to fupprefs .fome Monopolies, without touching on their Author, the Marquifs of Buckingham, altho'  he was generally known, and even plainly accufed of it, by  Sir Henry Telverton, the late Attorney General. However  I do not findj that the Monopoly of Tobacco came under  their Reftraint. Only the eminent Lawyers of the Houfe  of Commons declared the Patent for Garbling utterly illegal, and a great Grievance in the Ereftion, but much more  lo, if it fliOuld be brought into Execution. And this Seflion  had alfo another good Effeft : For at their very firft Meeting, 2o6 T^ff History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1621. ing, the Reftraint on Tobacco was taken ofE, and Liberty "■^-Y—- ' given, at leaft by Connivance, freely to import it into En- Sir Francis gia^^ .^ which indeed, I fuppofe, was the Reafon, that nei- ^"J;®"' ther the Company's Petition was delivered, nor any thing elfe done in the Houfe of. Commons, with Relation to that unlawful, unjuft, and oppreffive Monopoly. T H E fecond Sellion began the 20th oi November, and  was hot and angry. The Difpute between the King and  the Houfe of Commons, concerning the Extent of the  Royal Prerogative, and the Rights, Franchifes, and Privileges of Parliament, rofe fo high, that the King firft adjdurned, and then diflblved them, in a Paflion, However,  before that could be done, the Commons entered upon  their Journals a Proteftation, afferting their. Parliamentary  Rights and Privileges, But the King, eleven Days after  the Adjournment, called for the Clerk of the Houfe of  Commons ; and demanding the Journals, he declared, in  full Council, and in the Prefence of all the Judges then in  Town, that it was invalid, annulled, void, and of no Efk&. ; and did moreover, with his own Hand, take the faid  Proteftation, out of the Journal-Book of the Houfe of  Commons. And not content with thefe Marks of his Difpleafure, he proceeded farther againft fome of the warmeft  of the Houfe of Commons ; whom he stiled fiery, popular, and ill-tempered Spirits. Sir Edwin Sandys was imprifoned, during the Seffion, whic'h caufed a great Tumult  in the Houfe. And altho' the King, upon the Houfe's  fending a Meflage to Sir Edwin, to know the Reafon of his  Confinement, declared, in a Letter to the Speaker, that it  was not for any Mifdemeanor in Parliament, yet I fufpe<9:,  his Imprifonment was defigned, to prevent him 'from adding with Vigor, in the Cafe of the Monopoly, and other  illegal Oppreffions on Tobacco ; and this the more efpecially, as I can no where find, that any Reafon or Pretence  was given for his Commitment. However the King's  Opinion, concerning his Power over the Members, was  plainly exprefled in that Letter. For he orders the Speaker, to tell the Houfe, in his Name, that he conceived  himfelf, to have both Right and Ability, to punifh any  Man's Mifdemeanors in Parliament, as well during their  fitting, as after ; which Power he meant not hereafter to  fpare, as Occafion fliould be adminiftered, by the infolent  Behaviour of any of their Members. And agreeably to  this Declaration, Sir Edward Coke, the great Lawyer, Sir  Robert Philips, Mr. John Selden, anothei: Prodigy of Law  and all Kinds of Knowledge, Mr. Pym, and Mr. Mallery,  were imprifoned, after the Recefs, profefledly for their Behaviour  Book IV. rhe Hi &TORY of VIRGINIA. haviour in Parliament. And Sir Dudley Digges, Sir Thomas  Crew^ Sir Nathaniel Rich, and Sir fames Perrot, were fent '  into Ireland, under Pretence of enquiring into fundry Mat-^ Francis  ters, relating to his Majefty's Service in that Kingdom, but, veraor. °'  in reality, by Way of Baniftiment. The Earls of Oxford  and Southampton were likewife fent to the Tower, soon after the Diffolution, on fome far-fetched. Pretences. But the  true Reafon was eafily and publickly perceived, and that  their real Crime was, having fpoke too freely in Parliament,  concerning the King's Conduft. I have made this Relation, not fo much as it is a remarkable iEra in the Englijh Hiftory, which gave Rife to two  profelTed Parties, the one for the King's Prerogative, and  the other for the Rights of Parliament and the Liberty of  the Subjedl ; nor as it was alfo the firft open breach, between the King and the People, which, by fubfequent Provocations and Heart-burnings, at laft broke out, into a moft  unhappy and virulent Civil War. But I have mentioned  thefe things chiefly, as they relate to my Subject, and will  contribute to let the Reader more fully, into the Springs  and Motives of fome future Tranfadlions. For it will be  readily perceived, that many of the moft eminent and adiive  Oppofers in Parliament, of the King's arbitrary Views,  were alfo principal and leading Members of the Virginia  Company ; and it is well known, with what an Eye of  Jealoufy and Difpleafure, that Prince ever looked upon fuch,  as dared to ftand up for the Liberty of their Country, or  were fo far infe£led, with the mortal Taint of a publick  (or as he thought it) a republican Spirit, as to oppofe his  Claim to an unlimited and defpotic Power. It will not  therefore be furprifing, to find him hereafter, notwithftanding his many affe<9:ed and anile Profeffions of Love and Affe&ion to the Colonies, not only much difgufted at the  Company, and little yiclined to do them any Favour, but  ev£n, in their Diffolution, making a Stretch of that Prerogative, which many of them had the Boldnefs, to queftion  and withftand. But the Colony being now much enlarged and en- i6»*creafed, it was found very troublefome, to bring all Caufes  to fames-Town. Inferior Courts were therefore, in the  Beginning of the Year 1622, appointed in convenient Places,  to relieve the Governor and Council from this vaft Burthen  of Bufinefs, and to render Juftice the more cheap and acceffible. This was the Original and Foundation of our  County Courts ; altho' the Country was not yet laid off in  Counties, but ftill continued in Townfliips and particular  Plantations, as they called thofe Settlements, which were not 2o8 rhe History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1622. not confiderable enough, to have the Title and Privileges of *~- — V 'Burroughs. Sir Francis B u T this Year is rendered moft memorable in our An^*; °°' nals, by a cruel and bloody Maffacre, concerted by Opechancanough and the Indians^ and executed on the Englijh  Colony, upon the 22d of March^ on the following Occafion and Manner. There was a noted Indian^ called Nemattanmx)^ who was wont, out of Bravery and Parade, to  drefs himfelf up, in a ftrange antic and barbaric Fafhion,  with Feathers ; which therefore obtained him, among the  Englijh, the Name of ■'Jack of the Feather. This Indian  was highly renowned among his Countrymen, for Courage  and Policy ; and was univerfally efteemed by them the greateft War-Captain of thofe Times. He had been in many  Skirmifhes and Engagements with the Englijh, and hravely  expofed his Perfon ; yet by his Ailivity, Condu£t, and good  Fortune, he had always efcaped without a Wound. This,  aided by his Craft and Ambition, eafily wrought, in the  Minds of thofe ignorant and fuperftitious Barbarians a fond  Conceit, that he was invulnerable and immortal. This  Captain came to the Houfe of one Morgan, who had many  fuch Commodities, as fuited the rude Tafte of the Indians.  Being fmit with the Defire of fome of thofe Baubles, he  perfuaded Morgan to go with him to Pamunkey, upon the  Promife and Aflurance of a certain and advantageous Traffick. But, upon the Way, he murdered the poor credulous Englishman ; and within two or three Days, returned  again to his Houfe. There were only two fturdy Lads there,  the late Morgan's Servants ; who feeing him wear their  Matter's Cap, afked for their Matter, and Jack frankly  told them, he was dead. Being confirmed in their Sufpicion, they feifed him, and endeavoured to carry him before  Mr. Thorpe, who then lived at Berkeley, But Jack fo provoked them, by his Refittance and Jnfolence, that at laft  they fhot him down, and put him into a Boat, in order to  carry him before the Governor, who was then within feven  or eight Miles of the Place. Qn the Way, our fainting  Immortal felt the Pangs of Death very ttrong upon him,  and earnettly entreated the Boys, to grant him two things ;  firft, never to make it known, that he was flain by a Bullet ;  and fecondly, to bury him among the Englijh, that the certain Knowledge, and Monument of his Mortality, might  be ftill concealed, and kept from the Sight of his Countrymen. Such was the Vanity of this poor Barbarian, and  fo ttrong his Defire of falfe Glory in the Opinion of others,  againft the Experience and plain Convidtion of his o.wn  Senfe. • Opechancanough  Book IV. rhe History of VIRGINIA. Opechancanougb was a haughty, politic, and bloody Man,  ever intent on the Deftruftion of the Englljh^ and ready '  to catch at every Pretence, for effefting his Purpofe. He ^ Francis  had been difcovered, the Year before, tampering with a^^^^^Jj  King on the Eajiern Shore^ to furnifh him with a Poifon,  either real or fuppofed, in order to Poifon the Englijh Colony. He had alfo been accufed to the Governor, of a Defign, to draw together a very great Force, under Colour of  celebrating fome funeral Rites to Powhatan, but really with  Intent to cut off all the* Englijh. But Sir George Teardley,  by this Information, was rendered very watchful of his Motions ; fo that he was either difappointed in his Scheme, or  elfe, as Sir George thought, had never really formed any  fuch Defign. As to this Warrior, he was fo far from being in his Favour, that he had fent Word to Sir George  Teardley, fome time before, that he fhould be content, if his  Throat were cut. Yet he being a popular Man, and much  lamented by the Indians, Opechancanougb pretended, the better to enflame and exafperate them, to be much grieved at  his Death, and was very loud, at firft, in his Threats of  Revenge. But the Reafon and Juftice of the thing being  evinced, and receiving alfo' fome ftern and refolute Anfwers  from the Englijh, he cunningly diffembled his Intent for the  prefent, and treated a Meffenger, fent to him about the  Middle 'of March, with extreme Civility and Kindnefs ;  affuring him, that he held the Peace fo firm, that the Sky  fhould fall fooner, than it fhould be violated on his Part.  And fuch was the Treachery and Diflimulation of the reft  of the Indians, that, but two Days before, they kindly  condu<Sed the Englijh through the Woods, and fent home  one that lived among them, to learn their Language. Nay,  on the very Morning of that fatal Day, as alfo the Evening before, they came, as at other times, unarmed into the  Houfes of the Englijh, with Deer, Turkies, Fifh, Fruits,  and other things to fell ; and in fome Places fat down to  Breakfaft with them. Yet fo general was the Combination,  and their Plot fo well laid, to cut off the whole Colony, in  one Day, and at the fame Inftant, that they had all Warning, one from another, through all their Habitations, though  far diftant from each other, and every Party and Nation had their Stations appointed, and Parts affigned, at the Plantations of the Englijh, fome being direfted to one Place,  and fome to another. The Englijh, on the other hand, were by this Behaviour, as well as on other Accounts, lulled into a fatal Security. They. thought the Peace fure and inviolable, not  fo much becaufe of their folemn Promifes and Engagers P ments.  I'be History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. ments, as becaufe it was highly ufeful and neceflary to the  ' Indians themfelves. For thofe poor, weak and naked BarFrflnni barians were, every way, advantaged by the Englijh. By  SJ the Peace, they were fafely flickered and defended, from all  other Enemies ; they were fupplied with feveral neceflary  Tools and Utenfils, and other Commodities of Pleafiire and  Entertainment ; they were fomething acquainted with, and  got a Tafte of Civil Life ; and were befides no ways in, a  Condition to withfl:and an Englijh War, becaufe of the  Superiority of their Arms, the Advantage of their Diftipline and native Courage, and their greater Skill in all military Arts and Stratagems. The Englijh, had likewife evei;  treated them, with the utmoft Humanity and, Kindnefe, out  of the Hope and Defire, of thereby alluring and bringing  them over, to the Knowledge of God and his true Religion.  For nothing was more earneflly recommended from England, or more heartily defired and endeavoured by many  good and pious Perfons of the Colony, than their Converfion ; which, agreeably to the Spirit of the Gofpel, and of  the Proteftant Religion, and greatlyto the Honour of our  Nation, was always purfued, by the Ways of Gentlenefe  and Perfuafion, and never by thofe unchrifl:ian Arguments  of Fire and Sword. On all thefe Accounts, the Englijh  were fo confident and fecure, that there could feldom be met  with, in their Houfes, a Sword or a Firelock, and moft of  their Plantations were feated in a fcattered and fl:raggling  Manner, as a convenient Situation, or a choice Vein of rich  Land invited them ; and indeed it was generally thought,  the further from Neighbours the better. All Indians were  kindly received into their Houfes,*fed at their Tables, and  even lodged in their Bedchambers ; fo that they feemed:,  entirely to have coalefced, and to live together, as one  People. And the Englijh were fo far infatuated, by an  Opinion of their Simplicity, and of their Inclination, and  even Interefl:, to maintain the Peace, that they lent them  their Boats, as they paffed backwards and forwards, to conr  cert their Meafures, and to confult-upon the execrable Defign of murdering and utterly extirpating the whole Nation.  The Hour appointed being come, and the Indians, by  reafon of their Familiarity, knowing exadMy, in what  Places and Quarters every Englijhman was to be found,  rofe upon them at once, fparing neither Sex nor Age, Man,  Woman, nor Child ; and they were fo quick and fiidden in  their Execution, that few perceived the Weapon or Blow,  that brought them to their End. Some entered their  Houfes, under Colour of Trade ; others drew them abroad,  upon fpecious Pretences ; whilft the reft fell fuddenly on thofe.  Book IV. I'he History of VIRGINIA. thofe, that were at their feveral Works and Labours. And  thus, in one Hour, and almoft at the fame Inftant, fell '  three hundred and forty feven, Men, Women, and Chil- ^" Francn  dren ; mofl: of them, by their own Tools and Weapons, -^J^ow  and all, by the Hands of a perfidious, naked, and daftardly  People, who durft not ftand the prefenting of a Staff, in  Manner of a Firelock, nor an uncharged Piece, in the  Hands of a Woman. Neither were they content with their  Lives only ; but they fell again upon their dead Bodies, defacing, dragging, and mangling them into many Pieces, and  carrying fome Parts away, with a bafe and brutifli Triumph. In this Havock, fix of the Council were flain. For  thofe Blood-hounds, with equal Spight and Barbarity, murdered all before them, without any Remorfe or Pity, and  without having any Regard to Dignity, or even to thofe  Perfons who were beft known to them, or from whom  they had daily received many Beneifits. Among thefe was  that pious, worthy, and religious Gentleman, Mr. George  Thorpe, Deputy to the College Lands, and both in Command and Defert, one of the Principal in Virginia. He  had been of the King's Bed-Chamber, and was a Perfon of  confiderable Figure in England. Yet fo truly and earneftly  did he aSeSt their Converfion, that he left all at home, and  came over chief Manager to the College, a Foundation  defigned for their Education and Converfion. And here he  feverely puniflied, whofoever, under him, did them the  leaft Difpleafure. He thought, nothing too dear or precious  for them, nor ever denied them any thing. Infomuch that,  being frightened at the Englijh Mafl:ives, he caufed fome of  them to be killed in their Prefence, to the great Grief of  their Owners, and would fain have had all the reft gelt,  to make them mild and peaceable. He alfo built the King  a handfome Houfe, after the Englijh Fafhion ; in which he  took fuch Pleafure, efpecially in the Lock and Key, that he  would lock and unlock his Door, an hundred Times a Day,  and was fo taken with the Device, that he thought nothing  in the World comparable to it. And thus infinuating himfelf into that Barbarian's Favour, he would often confer  with him about Religion ; and that treacherous Infidel  would feem much pleafed with his Difcourfe and Company, and very defirous to requite all his Courtefy and Kindnefs. Yet did this ungrateful and viperous Brood, not only  murder this good Gentleman, but with fuch Spight and  Scorn abufe his dead Corps, as is unfit to be heard, or related. At the very Minute of the Execution, his Man,  perceiving fome Treachery, warned him to look to himfelf ; P 2 and 212 rhe History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 162s. and withal ran ofF, and (o faved his own Life. But his ^■^-Y-—' Mafter, out of his good Meaning, was fo void of Sufpicion, Sir Francis ^^^ f^jj pf Confidence, that they had flain him before he «raor. ^^ could, or would believe, they intended any Harm. Captain Nathaniel Powel, another of the Council, who had fome time been Governor of the Country, was alfo killed. He was one of the firft Planters, a brave Soldier, had deferved well in all Ways, was univerfally valued , and efteemed by all Parties and Fadiions, and none in the Country better known among the Indians. Yet they flew . both him and his Family ; and afterwards haggled their Bodies, and cut off his Head, to exprefs their utmoft Height of Scorn and Cruelty. This Slaughter was a deep and grievous Wound to the  yet weak and Infant Colony ; but it would have been much  more general, and alitioft univerfal, if God had not put it  into the Heart of a converted Indian, to make a Difcovery.  This Convert, whofe Name was Chanco, lived with one  Richard Pace, who treated him, as his own Son. The  ' Night before the Maffacre, another Indian, his Brother,  lay with him ; and telling him the King's Command, and  that the Execution would be performed the next Day, he  urged him to rife and kill Pace, as he intended to do by  Perry, his Friend. As foon as his Brother was gone, the  Chrijiian Indian rofe, and went and revealed the whole  Matter to Pace ; who immediately gave Notice therepf to  Captain William Powel, and having fecured his own Houfe,  rowed off before Day to James-Town, and informed the  Governor of it. By this Means, their Defign was prevented at "James-Town, and all fuch Plantations, as could  poflibly get Intelligence in time. For where-ever they faw  the Englijh upon their Guard, or a fingle Mufket prefented,  they ran off, and abandoned their Attempt. Such alfo, at other Places, as had fufficient Warning  to make Refiftance, faved their Lives. Nathaniel Caufie,  one of Captain Smith's old Soldiers, being cruelly wounded,  did, with an Ax, cleave down one of their Sculls ; and  tho' they were all about him, yet they fled away, and he  efcaped. At another Place, two Men only, having Notice  of their Delign, defended a Houfe againft fixty or more,  that affaulted it. At Warrafqueake, one Mr. Baldwin,  when his Wife was fo wounded, that flie lay for dead, yet  by often difcharging his Piece, drove them off, and faved  both her and his Houfe, together with himfelf and divers  others. At Mr. Harrifon's, about half a Mile from Baldwin's, was Mr. Thomas Hamer, with fix Men, and eigh^  teen or nineteen Women and Children. To him the Indians,  Book IV. rhe History of VIRGINIA. dians came, with many Prefents and fair Profeffions. They  pretended, they wanted Captain Ralph Hamer, to go to"  their King, then hunting In the Woods. - Mr. Hamer fent ^ Fi-ancU  immediately for his Brother, who was at a new Houfe, he vernor ""  was then building. But he not coming according to their  Wifh, they fet Fire to a Tobacco Houfe, and came and  told them in the Dwelling Houfe of it. The Men ran towards it ; and the Indians following, firft (hot them full of  Arrows, and afterwards beat out their Brains. Mr. Hamer,  having finiflied a Letter he was writing, ran out to fee  what was the Matter. But he foon received an Arrow in  his Back, which obliged him to retire into the Houfe, and  barricade the Doors. Hereupon the Indians fet Fire to the  Houfe ; but Harrifon's Boy, juft at that Inftant, finding  his Mafter's Gun loaded, fhot at Random. At the bare  Report, the Indians all fled ; and thereby left the Way  open, to Mr. Hamer and twenty two more, to get to Baldwin's Houfe. Captain Ralph Hamer, all this while, was  wholly ignorant of what was pafling ; but coming to his  Brother, who had fent for him, he met the Indians, chafing feme of the Englijh, Whereupon he retired to his  new Houfe, and with only Spades, Axes, and Brickbats,  defended himfelf and his Company, till the Savages departed. Soon after, the Matter of a Ship, lying near, and perceiving the Confufion, fent him fix Mufketeers ; with whom  he recovered their Merchant's Store-houfe, and armed ten  more ; and fo, with thirty other unarmed Workmen, he  found out his Brother and the reft, at Baldwin's. But in  the Midft of this miferable Slaughter and Uproar, a little  Houfe and fmall Family, not far from Martin's Hundred,  at which Place alone feventy three were flain, not only  efcaped, but never heard any thing of it, till two Days after.  At this time alfo. Captain Ralegh Crojhaw was in Patowmack River, trading in a fmall Bark, commanded by  Captain Spilman. There an Indian ftole aboard, and told  them of the MaflTacre ; and that Opechancanough had been  praftifing with his King and Country, to betray them, which  they refufed to do ; but that the Indians of Wighcocomoco had  undertaken it. Hereupon Captain Spilman went thither.  But they, feeing his Men fo vigilant and well armed, fufpedied themfelves to be difcovered ; and therefore, the better to colour their Guilt, and delude him, they gave him  fuch Satisfaction in his Trade, that his VeiTel was foon near  loaded. After this. Captain Crojhaw went up to Patowmack. He had been long acquainted with that King ; who  now very earneftly entreated him, to ftay with him, and to  be his Friend, his Diredlor, and Captain, againft feveral P " neigh- 214 "^^^ History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. i6aa. neighbouring Nations, his mortal Enemies. Crofliauj very * V ' readily embraced his OfFer ; as well to promote fome pri- Sir Francis y^te Vicws of his own in Trade, as to keep him firm to the Zt^or.^°' Englijh Intereft, and make him an ufeful Opponent and In- ftrument againft Opechancanmgh. Therefore, relying on the Faith of this Barbarian, he ventured, with one, Man only, to ftay behind at Patowmack. I N the Beginning of this Year, before the Contrivance  and Perpetration of this bloody Confpiracy in Virginia, the  unknown Gentleman in England, who had given five hundred and fifty Pounds, towards the Converfion and Education of Indian Children, having waited two Years, and received no fatisfa£l:ory Account of the effeftual Profecution  of his Defign, wrote a Letter to the Company. Herein  he complains, that what was done in that Affair, did by no  means anfwer his Expectation or Intent. And he requires,  of the whole Body of the Company, towards which he expreffes much Refpeft, and an entire Confidence in their  Uprightnefs and Integrity, that, as he had entrufted the Difpofal of that Money, a great and painfully gotten Part of his  Eftate, to their Care and Management, fo they would, fee  the fame, fpeedily and faithfully applied, to the Ufe intended.  And he further propofed to them, the procuring fome of the  male Children of the Indians to be brought over into England (where they might be immediately under the Company's Eye and Infpeftion) there to be educated and taught,  and to wear a Habit, as the Children of Chriji-Church Hofpital do. In that Cafe, he defires, that the five hundred  and fifty Pounds might be converted to that Ufe ; and he  faithfully promifes, to add four hundred and fifty Pounds  more, to make the former Sum a thoufand, as fpon as  eight or ten Indian Children ihould be placed in London,  either in Chriji' s-Hofpital, or in the Virginia School or Hofpital, as it might be called ; which, he doubted not, would  be Yearly augmented, by the Legacies and Gifts of good  Men. But if they liked not this Propofition, then it was  his humble Suit and Motion, that the former Gift, of five  hundred and fifty Pounds, fhould be immediately applied,  and wholly beftowed, upon a Free-fchool in Southampton  Hundred, or fuch other Place, as he or his Friends fliould  approve : That in this School, properly endowed with fuch  Privileges, as they, in their Wifdom, fliould think fit, both  Englijh and Indians fliould be promifcuoufly taught and  brought up together ; and that great Care fliould be taken,  to fend over fuch a Mafl:er, as fliould bring a found Teftimonial, of his Sufficiency in Learning, and Sincerity of Life.  And fo praying, that the Lord would give them wife and underBook IV. Tbe History 0/ VIRGINIA. underftanding Hearts, that his Work herein might not be  negligently performed, he concludes, and fubfcribes himfelf"  Duji and AJhes ; a Name which he had ever, from the firft, ^" Frawis  affumed and made Ufe of, in this Affair, f?"'' ^°- ■ T 1 • 1 • rf->i rt »-i vernor. This important Letter bemg read m Court, Sir Edwtn  Sandys gave the Company a particular Account of that  whole Bufinefs : That the Money had been brought, in the  Time of his being Treafurer : That, upon mature Deliberation, it was refolved by the Company, to divide it between Smith's, since called Southampton Hundred, and Martin's Hundred ; each to undertake for a certain Number of  Infidel Children : That Martin's Hundred, being then in a  very weak and confufed Condition, was afterwards, at the  Entreaty of the Adventurers, eafed from that Burthen and  Charge, and the Whole laid on Southampton Hundred ; That  that Society, confidering the Weight and Difficulty, as well  as the Hazard of fucceeding, were alfo very unwilling to  meddle with "it, and offered an hundred Pounds, to be added  to the former five hundred and fifty, if they might be excufed from it ; but being earneflly preffed, they did at laft  yield to accept and undertake it : That after much and  careful Confultation, it was agreed by that Society, to employ the faid Money, together with a far greater Sum out  of the Society's Purfe, to furnifli out Captain Bluet, with  eighty able and fufficient Workmen, for fetting up an IronWork in Virginia ; whereof the Profits accruing, were intended and ordered, in a ratable Proportion, to be faithfully employed, in educating thirty Indian Children, according to the Diredtions and Intent of the Donor : That  Letters were likewife fent to Sir George Teardley, then Governor of Virginia, and Captain alfo of Southampton Plantation ; not only giving him large Advice and Direction  therein, but alfo commending the Excellency and Piety of  the Defign, and adjuring him to employ his utmoft Care  and Induftry in it, as a Work, whereqn the Eyes of God  and Men were fixed : That in Anfwer hereto. Sir George  informed them, how difficult it was to obtain any of the .  Children, with the Confent and good Liking of their Parents ; as well on Account of their Tendernefs, and Fondnefs of them, as out of their Fear o'f hard Ufage from the  Englijh : That he therefore recommended a Treaty with  Opechancanough ; which was accordingly ordered, and Sir  Gaorge promifed, to ufe his utmoft Endeavours thereim:  That this Backwardnefs and Jealoufly of the Indians was not  the only Hindrance to that pious Work ; for Captain Muet  dying foon' after his Arrival, it occafioned another great Stop :  That, however. Care had fince been taken, to reftore that P 4 Iron- 2i6 Tke History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 162a. Iron-Work, by a frefli Supply ; fo that he hoped, the Gen- ' . ■ tleman would foon receive good Satisfadlion, concerning the Sir f rflOT/j j>ifpofal and EfFed of his Charity, as he was fure, they  ^nor.°°' would, at all times, be both ready and willing to give a  faithful Account of the Employment of the faid Money. Sir Edwin Sandys further faid, that as he could not but  highly commend the Gentleman, for this his worthy and  moft chriftian Aftion, fo he had obferved great Inconveniency to arife from his Modefty, by fhunning Oftentation and  vain Glory, and concealing his Name. For they were thereby deprived of that mutual Help and Advice, which they  might, otherwife have, by Conference with him. Neither  ' could he receive fuch clear Satisfaction, or fully know, with  what Integrity and Care, the Affair had been managed ; the  fuccefs whereof muft be fubmitted to the Will and Pleafure  of Almighty God, as it had been already commended to his  BleiEng. But as to the two Methods, now propofed in his  Letter, he doubted greatly for his Part, whether either of  them would attain thedefired KffeQ:. For, to fend for them  to England, would be far from anfwering the End, if he  might judge from the Experience of thofe, brought over by  Sir Thomas Dale.' And to build a Free-fchool for them in  Virginia, he feared, confidering, in their prefent Dotage on  Tobacco, that no proper Workmen could be had, but at  exceflive Rates, it would rather tend to exhauft this facred  Treafure in fome fmall Edifice, than to accomplifli fuch a  Foundation, as might fatisfy Mens Expediations and Defires.  He therefore again wiflied, that a Meeting might be had,  between the Gentleman, or his Friends, and the Society of  Southampton Hundred. That fo, all things being fully debated, and judicioufly weighed, fome Courfe might be entered upon and purfued, for advancing and bringing to Effeft  fo pious and excellent a Work ; for which he prayed the  Bleffing of Almighty God to be upon the Author : And all  the Company anfwered, and faid. Amen. But this charitable Gentleman, however ftudious he was  to conceal himfelf, was afterwards (if any Credit may be  given to Captain Martin^ % Report ) found to be Mr. Gabriel Barber, the chief Manager and Book-keeper of their  Lotteries, and a very worthy, honeft, and ufeful Member  of the Company. He was himfelf then prefent, and heard  this Account, with which he feems to have been fatisfied.  For he made no farther Demand or Stir in the Matter ; but  continued afterwards, in the time of their fubfequent Quarrels and Diffenfions, a very hearty and ftrenuous Friend to  the Company. Mr. George Ruggles alfo. Fellow of ClareHall, in Cambridge, and a Brother of the Company, did, the  Book IV. rhe History ef VIRGINIA. the latter End of this Year, notwithftanding the News of  the Maffacre, bequeath an hundred Pounds, for the Educa-""  tion of Indians. He is reprefented as a Gentleman, who was ^" Francis  efteemed, in that Univerfity, fecond to none in Knowledge yj^^l °'  and Learning, of very great Wifdom and Underflanding,  of Angular Honefty and Integrity of Life, and very fincere  and zealous in Religion. And he had, for the three laft  Years of his Life, almoft wholly exercifed and employed his  Time and Abilities, in the Service of the Colony. For, befides the Counfels and Affiftances of himfelf and his Brethren,  ^in their feveral Places, he wrote divers Treatifes, for the,  Benefit of the Plantation ; particularly one concerning the  Government of Virginia, which is often mentioned, in the  Company's Records, with Commendation, efpecially by  Sir 'Edwin Sandys. But there fucceeding, immediately upon this violent and  injurious Affault, a continual and exterminating War between the Engli/h and the Indians, all the Difficulties of their  Converfion were greatly encreafed ; and I do not find, what  farther was done, with Relation to thefe Benefactions. The  College People alfo received a great and deadly Slaughter  in the Maflacre ; which, together with the Death of Mr.  Thorpe, their grand Principle of Life and Adtion, caufed  them to abandon the College Lands, and to retire lower  down the River, to fuch Places as were more defenfible  againft the fudden Aflaults and Inroads of the Indians, beeaufe of the greater Numbers of People, and the nearer  Situation, and more ready Affiftance, of other Plantations.  Thus did that brutifli and unhappy People tear up, as it  were, with their own Hands, the Foundations, which had  been laid, for their Converfion to Chriftianity and Civility  of Life. • For altho' the Company, in London, did afterwards frequently enter upon ferious Confultation, about reftoring again and fetting forward this charitable Work, yet  by reafon of their own Troubles, and of the Factions and  Difcords among themfelves, nothing therein was ever brought  to Effeft. So that, from this time, there was no publicfc  Attempt, nor any School or Inftitution, purpofely defigned  for their Education, and Converfion, before the Benefa^ion  of the late Honourable Robert Boyle, Efq; which Ihall be  fully related, in its proper Time and Place. But whilft the Colony in Virginia lay under the Pxefliire  and Calamity of this bloody Maflacre, the Company in En-r'  gland were greatly rejoiced and encouraged, by the favourable Account of things, which they received, about that  time, from the Governor and Council. For they were informed, by their Letters, that all the Ships were fafely arrived,  80 without 2i8 The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1622. without the Lofs of one Perfon, by Sea or Land ; that Mr. ' V ' John Berkeley had put the Iron Works in fo good a For S\r Francis ^ardnefs, that he doubted not to begin to make Iron, by  Zrlot Whitfuntide ; that the Cotton Trees profpered exceedingly  well ; that the Frenchmen declared the Mulberry Trees of  Virginia to be of the very beft Kind ; and daily, by their  Example, encouraged the People to plant them in Abundance, fo that they were in high Expeftation, of fliortly  fucceeding in, and bringing to Perfedlion, that rich Commodity of Silk ; that the French Vignerons had conceived  great Hopes, of fpeedily making Plenty of good Wine, _  whereof they had already made an Experiment, and fent  home a Tafte by that Ship ; and in fliort, that they now  had a fairer Profpeft, and more certain Hope, than ever yet,  of foon becoming a rich and flourifliing Country. For  which joyful News, and happy Succefs, the Company voted  and refolved, that a Sermon fhould be preached, to teftify  and exprefs their Thankfulnefs to God, for his BlefEng on  their Labours and Undertaking. And Mr. Copeland, a Brother of the Society, who, by his hearty Zeal for the Enterprife, was well acquainted with the Succefs of their Affairs, for the laft Year, was requefted to undertake the  Performance of this holy Exercife ; which he accordingly  did, at Bow Church, the 1 7th Day of April. M R. Copeland was alfo himfelf, foon after, publickly entreated by the Company, to go over in Perfon to Virginia^  and to apply himfelf to the Miniftry there. And in Confideration of his good Services and worthy Endeavours,  which had redounded much to the Honour and Benefit of  the Colony, as alfo in Refpedt of his known Sufficiency and  Worth, they conftituted him one of the Council of State,  and appointed him Redlor of the College for the Converfion  of Indians^ to receive, as a Salary, the tenth Part of the  Profits arifing from their Lands and the Labours of their  Tenants ; and alfo to have the Paftoral Charge of the College  Tenants about him, which were to be erefted into a Parfonage, according 'to the Company's general Order in that  Behalf. But this Defign, together with all their fanguine  Hopes and Ideas of an immediately rich and ■ profperous  Country, was daflied to Pieces, and cut off, by the Maflacre. The Iron-Work on Falling Creek, in particular,  was entirely ruined and demoliflied, and Mr. John Berkeley  flain, with all his Wofkmen and People, except one Boy  only and a Girl, who feund Means to hide themfelves, and  efcape. Their Preparations likewife, for other Commodities and Manufactures, were quite deftroyed and deferted ;  the People, all this Summer, being in fuch a State of Terror  Book IV. 'The History of VIRGINIA. ror and Flight, that they did not even make Corn for their  Support and Subfiftence. To this fad Pofture of Affairs in the Colony, was added ^ ^''''""'  the continual Increafe of the Company's Diflenfions and A- yJ^oL  nimofities at home, which became daily more furious and  irreconcileable. Captain Jrgall and that Fa£t:ion, omitted  no imaginable Methods of Vexation and Trouble ; and the  more to difparage and perplex the Company's Proceedings,  they were perpetually raifing new Authors and frefli Subjects of Complaint, as well to the Publick, as moft efpecially to the King, and to the great Lords and powerful  Perfons of his Court. It hath been already faid, that Captain John Martin came over, one of the Council of State,  in the firft Adventure ; and there hath been frequent Occafion fince, to mention his weak Condudl and Behaviour  here. This Gentleman was well born, and nearly related  to Sir Julius Cafar^ then Maflier of the Rolls. In the Time  of Sir Thomas Smith's Treafurerftiip, he had furreptitioufly  obtained a' Grant, to be Mafter of the Ordinance in Firginia ; as alfo a moft extravant and illegal Patent for Land,  at the Place, which he himfelf named Martin's Brandon,  For, by the exprefs Words of his Majefty's Charter, the  Company was reftrained to their four great and general  Quarter Courts, one to be held each Term, for tranfadling  any Bufinefs of great Importance, and particularly for granting Lands in Virginia. But both thefe Grants, to Captain  Martin, had been pafled in a private Court, called purpofely  for that Jobb, and could never after receive the Aflent and  Confirmation of a Quarter Court. For the Company, being apprifed of the Matter, ftrongly oppofed their Execution, and endeavoured to keep them from taking EfFedl.  Captain Argall in particular, when Governor of Virginia,  had fent home grievous Complaints, againft the Exorbitancies oi Martin's Patent and Behaviour-, and both Sir Thofnas Smith and Alderman John/on, at that time Treafurer  and Deputy of the Company, had been willing and afEfting,  to ftop and prevent thefe Grants from being further confirmed, and receiving the legal SaniSion of a Quarter Court. But now', the Company's witholding Captain Martin  from the Fruition of thofe Privileges and Immunities, which  appeared to have been granted under their Seal, being, at  firft Sight, a fpecious Pretence of Clamour and Complaint,  which might be turned to difgrace and vilify the Juftice and  Honour of their Proceedings, thefe very Gentlemen inftigated and aflifted him, to get a Certificate under the Hands  of feveral noble Lords, and others, and to have it dehvered  in to the Company, by one Captain Hafwell. The Purport 22d tbe History of VIRGINIA. Baok IV. i6ai. port of this Writing was : That whereas John Martin Efij; ""-^Y 'having been a long and faithful Servant to the Colony of Sir Francis f^irgtnia, defired a Teftimonial of his Carriage and De^"J; ^""meanor in all things, according to their Knowledge and  the Truth, they did thereby certify : That, by the general  Confent of his Majefty's Counoil in England, for Virginia^  the faid Captain John Martin was, in the Face of the publick and open Court, eleifted, chofen, and fworn, one of  his Majefty's firft Council of Virginia: That afterwards^  in the faid honourable and open Court, he was, with the  free and full Confent thereof, appointed, chofen, and  fworn, Mafter of the Ordinance in the faid Colony : That,  befides his firft Adventure, which was very laudable and  good, he had, ever fince, conftantly and very worthily endured all the Miferies and Calamities of fore-paft Times,  with the Lofs of his Blood, the Death of his only Son (the  fole Hope and Comfort of his Age) together with Sicknefs,  Famine, and many other inexpreffibly hard and miferable  Sufferings ; That he had alfo providently and very carefully endeavoured all the Good and Benefit to the Plantation,  that was in his Power ; in all things, upholding and labouring to maintain, with equal Juftice and Clemency, all his  Majefty's Laws, Prerogatives, and Rights whatfoever;  That for thefe hondft and wortihy Services, They, the Company and Council for his Majelty, refident in England, had  formerly granted him fundry Privileges, by Charter under  their Great Seal, for fettling a private Plantation upon his  own Allotment of Land in Virginia ; wherein he had fince  proceeded with much 'Charge and Expence, and for which  they neither faw nor knew any Reafon, why he fliould not  be permitted to enjoy the fame, according to the true Intent  and Meaning of his faid Grant. This Certificate was figned by the Earls of Pembroke^  Warwick, Leicejler, and Montgomery, by Lord Sheffield^  Sir Robert Manfel, Sir Thomas Smith, Alderman Johnfon^  Captain Argall, and a few others, to the Number of twelve  in all. Being prefented to the Company, they conceived  themfelves much wronged and affironted, that a few Members of their Body fliould, in this Paper, affume to themfelves the Name and Authority of the whole Company;  ftiling themfelves. We, the Company -and Council for his  Majefiy, here refident in England. And they found themfelves under a Neceflity of doing fomething, to avoid the  foul Afperfion, contained therein, as if they now went about to difavow their own K8i. and Deed ; as alfo to prevent the evil Confequences, that might follow, and the ill  Conftrudlions, that might be made thereon. Being therefore Book IV. <Ke Hi STO-RT 0/ VIRGINIA. 221 fore fuJly apprifed, that fome of tbe Lords, and others, had 'Sa*- been miflead and betrayed into it, by tbe falfe Reprefenta- ' > ' tions and malicious Praftices of the reft, they drew up an ^'" f''"""'  Anfwer, and ordered their Secretary to malce divers Copies ^g^^g[ °'  thereof, which they entreated Sir yohn Davers and Mr.  Tomlins, to deliver, as well to fuch Lords as had figned  the Certificate, as alfo to his Majefty's Matters of Requeft.  For, by reprefenting Captain Martin, as labouring to maintain the King's Laws, Prerogatives, and Rights (a Stile  exadlly fuited to the Tafte and Views of the Court) it was  eafy to perceive, which Way it was chiefly intended and  addrefled. But as to ithe other Subfcribers, the Secretary  was commanded, to deliver each of them a Coipy himfelf. I N this Anfwer they fet forth : That the 'Company are  limited and diredted, by his Majefty's Claarters, to their  ■Quarter Courts only, for paiEng of all Matters of greateft  Weight, and particularly for difpofimg >of Lands in Virginia:That, contrary to this fundamental Law, notorioufly known  to all the Company, amd frequently puibliflied and declared  to the Planters, as an Ordinance from his Majefty to be inviolably obferved, Captain Martin's two Grants were prefented to an inferior private Court, ready eragpofled, the  Company not being before acquainted with tihe Matter:  That by this Court, called extraordinarily, and as it feems,  for this Bullnefs only, the faid Patents were unlawfully and  unduly pafled, notwithftanding tbe Diiffant and Oppofition  of divers then prefent ; and that they never could afterwards have the Confirmation of a Quarter Court : That  the faid Patent for Land contained fiindiy tranfcendent Liberties and exorbitant Privileges, apparently inepugnant to  Juftice and the good 'Government of the Colony, and  which the Company, by his Majefty's Charters, had no  Power to grant : That thenein was given an Exemption of  all the People within tJhe Limits of his Patent, from tbe  Command and Government of the Governor and Council,  and from all other Charges and Services of the Colony  whatfoever, except in Cafe of War only ; as likewife a  Grant of an uinlimited Filibing, of the fifth Part of all rich  Mines, with many other general amd indefinite Liberties :  That, under Colour of thefe extraordinary Privileges, many great Inconveniences had arifen, to both the Company  and Colony : That Captain Martin refufed to fubmit himfelf to the Laws and Orders of Government there : That  bis Plantation was made a Receptacle and Harbour for all  diflblirte Perfons, who fly thither from ordinary Juftice :  That all thefe, and many other Mifchiefs, bad been often  complained of by the Colony, in their particular and general  The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. ral Aflemblies ; as alfo by the Governors there, and moft  > efpecially by Captain Jrgall, notwithftanding his SubfcripSir Frmch tjoj, jq tjjjg Certificate : That, upon his Letter to the Com^OT.°°' P^ny? ^" Order was made, in a Great and General Quarter  Court, held in May 1618, and a Committee appointed, to  examine and reform the faid Patent : That Sir Thomas  Smith and Alderman Jdhnfon then prefided, as Treafurer  and Deputy to the Company ; fo that it feemed ftrange to  them, to find their Hands alfo to that Certificate, contradicting the KQ. of that Great Court, wherein themfelves  were the principal Managers and Direftors : That the faid  Inconveniencies had moreover been lately teftified, by feveral  Perfons, before the Company, in open Court : But that the  Company had nevertheless frequently off^ered, and was always  ready to grant Captain Martin (whofe Merits they fhould  be glad to hear of, and to cherifh) upon the Surrender of  his former, a new Patent, with as large and ample Privileges, as any other had, or could enjoy. Notwithstanding the Truth, Juftice, and Reafonablenefs of this Anfwer, Captain Martin preferred a  Petition to the King, containing many fcandalous Suggeftions, as well againft the whole Body of the Company, as  againft fome fpecial Members in particular. And he obtained an Order from his Majefly, to have his Caufe heard  and determined, at Sir Thomas Smith's Houfe, before fuch  Referees, as he himfelf named ; among which were thofe,  who chiefly inftigated and fet him on. In Anfwer to this,  the Company made two Addrefles ; one to the Referees, in  like Manner as they had done in the Cafe of the Certificate ; and the other to the King, as well to clear the Company and fuch particular Perfons, as flood accufed and defamed in Martin's Petition, as alfo to inform his .Majefty,  that fome of thofe, unto whom the Reference was procured, were violently fufpedted, to be Captain Martin's chief  Abettors and Supporters in this Affair. They therefore  defired, that the Matter might be referred, together with  thofe Lords in Martin's Reference, to certain other Lords  of the Privy Council, whom they named. But upon Lord  Cavendifh's prefenting this, his Majefty faid, that he was  much furprifed at this new Cuftom, lately fprung up, that  Petitioners fhould chufe their own Referees. To which his  Lordftiip anfwered ; that, in that Point, Captain Martin  had been their Example, who in his Petition, which his  Lordftiip then produced and ftiewed his Majefty, had named  his own Referees, which his Majefty had approved and appointed accordingly. But Book IV. The History of VIRGINIA. 223 But not content to give the Company this Trouble and '622. Difturbance, Captain Martin, together with one Captain ' — ~v ' Robert Hafivsll, prefented another Petition to his Majefty, S'l- Francis  fetting forth : TRat in the Time of Sir Thomas Dale's yj"^l  Government, there was a large Quantity of Woodland,  Marfli, and other Ground, being in Circumference by  Eftimation about fourfcore Miles, for which Sir Thomas  Dale compounded with Powhatan, the Indian King, and  bounded the fame by Trees, and other Marks of perpetual  Knowledge and Remembrance, with a folemn Proceflion of  many of his Majefty's Subjedits, then and there living, commanding Notice to be taken thereof, to be, and always fg  called and entitled, The King's Foreji : That within the  faid Foreft, there was of Deer and wild Hogs a very great  Number ; which being preferved, with Care and Judgment,  from the Spoil and Havoc.k, which continually was, and  would be made, both of them and their Brood, the Colony  might therein have a conftant Stock and Support, and Shipping might, at all times, be plentifully viftuatled and fupplied : And that there were befides, within thofe Limits,  many other profitable Commodities, already known. They  therefore humbly befought his moft facred Majefty, to take  the faid Foreft into his own Royal Hands, and to appoint  fome honourable Perfon, to be Commander thereof, authorifing him, to gtve Order for converting the Plantations  thereon to his Majefty's heft Ufe and Behoof, and for appointing a Juftice of Oyer, and Rangers, with fuch other  Officers, as fliould be thought moft proper and convenient  for the faid Foreft and Plantation. To fuch a Height of Falfliood, Fraud, and Impofture,  did the Paflions of thefe unhappy Men carry them, as thus  to give the King at once, as far as it was in their Power, all  the Lands and Poffeffions of a very great and principal  Part of the Colony ; who had, by their Labours and Sufferings, ftruck out new Branches of Trade and Profit to  the King and Nation, and well deferved all Manner of Indulgence, and the utmoft Security and Stability in their  Properties. But King "James was not of a Temper, to  forego any Views of Profit and Advantage. He therefore  referred the Examination of the Matter to Sir Chrijiopher  Perkins, one of the Mafters of Requefts ; who fummoning  the Company, received for Anfwer : That they held not their Lands from King Powhatan,  nor acknowledged any King of Virginia, but King James :  That it was true, for a perpetual Memorial and permanent  Honour to his Majefty and his Royal Iflue, they had named  their chief Towns, and other moft remarkable Places, after the 224 The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1622. the King and his Children : That they however fuppofed, ' V— -' this did no way alter the Property of Inheritance in thofe Sir i^'-"""* Places, which his Majefty, by Letters-patent under the  ^moi°°~ Great Seal of England, had granted to the faid Company,  for and throughout all Virginia : That as to the King's  Foreft, it was a Name happily known to Captain Martin  and his Aflbciates, but never before heard of by the Company : That within the Circuit, which they had been  pleafed to appropriate for the Foreft, were placed James-^  City, thejr chief Town, and Place of Refidencefor the Governor and Council, and divers other principal Seats and  Plantations : That as for the Deer, it was true, the whole  Country did generally abound in them ; but the Swine were  no other, but the Breed of fuch as had been tranfported  thither by the Company : That Captain Martin was a Perfon, who had ruined his own Eftate, (if ever he had any) as  alfo the Eftates of others, who had put him in Truft :  That he made his Territory in Virginia a Receptacle of  Vagabonds and Bankrupts ; and was famous for nothing,  but all Kinds of bafe Conditions and Adiions, as had been  publifhed in Print, above ten Years before : That he had  been therefore difplaced from the Council, by Lord Delawarr, as a moft unworthy Perfon, who had prefumed, of  his own Authority, no ways derived from his Majefty, to  pafs unjuft Sentence of Death upon divers of his Majefty's  Subje£ts, and to fee the fame put into cruel Execution :  That it was therefore a Matter of great Surprife to them,  to find such a Man dare to offer himfelf to his Majefty, as  an Agent, either for Matter of good Huftiandry, or good  Government : That as to Captain Ha/well, he was neither Adventurer in the Company, nor Planter in the Colony, but a mere Stranger to both ; nor otherwife known to  them, than as Interpreter to a Polonian Lord, of his own  creating : That however, if the King was pleafed, to have  a Royal Domain laid ofF for him in Virginia, nothing could  be more joyful and agreeable to the faid Council and Company, nor wherein they would more willingly employ their  Endeavours. At the fame time, Mr. Pierce, who had been CapeMerchant in Virginia, underftanding, that Captain Martin  denied, that he ever protcfted any within his Territories,  averred, that he had delivered feveral Warrants, to be  ferved upon Perfons, that lived loofely within Captain  Martin's Plantation, and that the Provoft Marftial made  Return, that the faid Captain Martin refifted the Officer,  and drew Arms upon him, and would not fufFer him to  execute the faid Warrants. Others alfo affirmed, that it was  Book IV. "The History of VIRGINIA. was generally reported in Virginia^ that Captain Martin's  Plantation was a Place of Refuge for all Debtors ; and ^  that, if he had been of Power, there would have been no ^" f''"""'  living in Virginia. To which Mr. Jefferfon added ; that, ^^^^^i.  to his Knowledge, Captain Martin, being fummoned, had  refufed to obey the General Affemblies. All which, they  all declared themfelves to be ready and willing, whenever  required, to confirm and juftify upon- Oath. Wherefore,  in a Cafe of this clear Evidence and Truth, 'Captain Martin was not able to carry his Point againft the Company.  He was afterwards induced to deliver up his illegal Patent  in open Court, to be cancelled ; and Orders were given for  drawing a new one, with as large and ample Privileges,  as the Earl of Southampton, or any other Adventurer had.  But when this was drawn. Captain Martin complained,  that he was therein abridged of a great Quantity of Land,  granted in his former Patent. For, in that, ten Shares  were given him, in Reward of his Services ; and he pretended, that each of thofe Shares ought to be five hundred Acres of Land ; and he therefore claimed five thoufand Acres. For this, he defired that Spot of Land, as he  called it, at Martin's ' Brandon, where he had formerly  feated, containing about fix thoufand Acres, with all  Marfhes and funken Grounds thrown in, as an Overplus.  But the Court, having never heard of any Shares of five  hundred Acres, and finding it exprefly diredted by their  Charters, that no Share fliould exceed an hundred Acres,  abfolutely refufed to grant his^ Demand. However, to  give him Satisfaction, if poffible, they gave him to a certain Day, to produce any Inftance or Evidence, that there  had ever been Shares of five hundred Acres, and promifed,  to fhew him all lawful Favour. But he afterwards perverfely demanded the Re-delivery of his old Patent ; and  the Court, being quite wearied out with his Obflinacy and  Impertinence, gave him for their lafl: and refolute Anfwer ;  That, if he would accept fuch a Patent, as they could lawfully grant, he might have it ; but as for his old Patent,  they could not deliver it to him again, being void, not fo  much by his Refignation, as by the Extravagance and Illegality of the Grant itfelf. Whereupon he went away, and  never fpared, upon all Occafions, to load many very worthy and deferving Members of the Company, with all poffible Scandal and Reproach. But at laft he accepted the  new Patent, and pretended to be fully reconciled to the Com- *  pany; and came to Virginia, with a Recommendation from  the Priyy Council, and by their Means and Interpofition,  even from the Company themfelves ; which Favour he  81 Q_ accordingly 226 The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1622. accordingly requited, by propagating and fpreading through '"- — V ' the Country all the Falflioods and Calumnies againft them, Sir Franmthat he could invent or utter. fTyat, Go- B u T befides Captaip Martin, fome others were raifed  vernor. ^p ^j^j fyborned, to give in Complaints to the King, againft  the Company. One Jdam Dixon, in his Petition, pretended to have been hired, for the Service of the Company  and Colony, as Mafter-Calker of their Ships and VelTels in  Virginia, at thirty fix Shillings a Month, and that having  ferved them many Years, he only had received three  Pounds thirteen Shillings ; fo that there was now due to  him an hundred and fifty Pounds, or there-abouts : That  Captain Argall alfo, in the time of his Government, had  given him and one John Berry a Piece of uncleared Ground,  on which they had expended an hundred Pounds in a  Houfe ; but that, contrary to all Juftice and Equity, they  had been turned out of their faid Houfe and Ground, the  former Year, by Sir George Yeardley, to their great Difcomfort and utter Undoing. To this the Company anfwered : That the Matters of the faid Petition were to  them utterly unknown ; that there ■yas not, in their Books,  the leaft mention of any fuch Officer or Contract ; neither had they any Inducements, to believe it to be true :  That if any fuch thing had pafled, it muft have been in Sir  Thomas Smith's Time, to whom they referred him, for Anfwer and Satisfaftion : That as to the Outrageand Wrong,  pretended to have been done by Sir George Yeardley, the  Petitioner had never yet complained thereof to them ; but  they would take a*Courfe for fpeedy Juftice therein, by  commending the Matter to the Care and Examination of  the Governor and Council in Virginia. And the Affair was  accordingly examined and tried in our General Court, the  2ift of January 1623-4. It then appeared, by the Oath  of Thomas Gates and the faid Adam Dixon, that they, together with John Berry and Thomas Dingley, were hired  by Sir Thomas Smith, upon Wages, for a certain Term ;  that their Wages were not only never paid, but they themfelves were detained, many Years longer, in very hard Servitude ; and that at laft, to free themfelves, they were  obliged to give Captain Argall an Acquittance, under their  Hands, for their Wages ; without which, he threatened,  they fliould never be fet free. And they further fwore,  that Captain Argall kept them a Year after, in his own  proper Service, without any Allowance of either Wages  or Cloaths. But I cannot find, in our Records, that they  profecuted or made any Complaint here, againft Sir George  'Yeardley, about their Houfe and Land. One Book IV. rhe History of VIRGINIA. 227 One William Kemp alfo prefented a Complaint to his '622.  Majefty, of the Grievances of certain Inhabitants of Kic- ■-; — . — ;'  quotan in Virginia ; that William Julian:, John Bujh, and ^ ^^"q",  fome others, ancient Planters, and deferving Inhabitants of y^/^^Jj  the beft mechanical Trades, had been turned out of their  lawful Poffeffions, by Sir George Yeardley^ with many Circumftances of Oppreflion and Cruelty. To which the  Company anfwered : That the Parties, pretended to be  wronged, had never made any Complaint to them : That  Kemp had been in England above a Year, and had never  laid the Matter before the Council and Company, where  Juftice might have been done : That he did not even pretend to have Authority from the Parties grieved, to exhibit  this Complaint to his Majefty : That fhey therefore faw no  Caufe, to believe his Allegations to be true ; but fufpeiSted  him, rather to be fet on by the Malice of others, than  moved by his own Zeal for Right and Juftice : That however, according to their Cuftom in Caufes of the like Nature, they would, by the firft Opportunity, tranfmit this  Complaint to the Governor and Council in Virginia ; that,  if there appeared any Truth in any Part thereof, they  might proceed, as well to the due Redrefs of the faid Grievances, as to the condign Punifhment of the Authors and  Delinquents. And this Complaint appears, from, our Records, to have had this Foundation in Truth and Matter  of Faft ; that fome Perfons had fet down, at Kicquotan,  upon the publick Land of the Company, and were obliged,  by the Governor and Council, to go off. But they however had, either by this time or afterwards, (I cannot exadily fay which) Satisfadtion made them for their Clearing  and Improvements. Captain Matthew Somen, who had returned to England With his Uncle's Body, in the Year 1610, had, long  before this, been a Prifoner in the King's Bench. From  thence he often pelted and tiezed the Company, with an  extravagant Demand for his Uncle's Adventure ; and altho'  fomething confiderable in Adventure appeared, by their  Books, to be due to Sir George Somers, yet they refuftd to  pafs it over to him, becaufe he had an elder Brother ,in the  Country, who was Heir at Law to Sir George, and he could  not make fufficient Proof, that either his Uncle had bequeathed it by Will, or that his Brother had made over all  his Right and Intereft therein to him. In this time therefore of prefenting Petitions to the King, Captain Somers alfo  preferred his ; informing his Majefty : That Sir George Somen was forced, by Strefs of Weather, to fave himfelf and  Company, on the Iflands of- Bermudas, where he loft his 0,2 • Ship, 228 'rbe History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book IV. i6aa. Ship, and foon after, his Life : That he, the Petitioner, *^" — V ' being his immediate Heir, and then prefent, built a fmall ^ ^'■''"" Bark, to convey his Company to England; and left three  verCr. "' Men, to Continue the Pofleffion of thofe Iflands, in his  Majefty's Name : That the Virginia Company, hearing  of this Difcovery, challenged thofe Iflands, as their Right,  altho' they were above an hundred Leagues without the  Limits of their Grant ; and they fent a Gavernor, with  Men, to take the Pofleffion from his Majefl:y : That finding the Petitioner's Men had, by their Induftry, found a  Cake of Ambergreafe of an hundred and fixty Pounds  Weight, the faid Governor took it violently from them,  for the Ufe of the Company, who fold it for twelve thoufand Pounds, and likewife threatened Violence to the poor  Men, to make them confefs more : That the faid Coiiipany, fhortly after, fold the faid Iflands to a particular Company, for two thoufand Pounds ; and the poor Petitioner  could never yet obtain any thing, either for his Adventure  or otherwife, altho' he had long and often folicited it, to  his great Charge and utter Undoing : That thefe, and no  other Comforts, could they, the ancient Adventurers, receive from the Company ; and therefore he humbly befought  his Majefty, to take into Confideration his own Royal Rights  therein, and to give Order for the Relief of him, the poor  Petitioner. T o this falfe and exaggerated Account of that Affair, the  Somer-IJlands Company gave in, for Anfwer, much the fame  in Subftance and Purport, as I have before related concerning it. And as for Captain Somers, they deny him to have  any jufl: Pretence, to ftile himfelf, either an ancient Adventurer, or Planter. For he made a very fhort Abode there ;  and contrary to his Duty and Trufl:, returned fuddenly to  England^ where he had ever fince continued, without performing the leaft Service to either Plantatio'n. . They confefs,  that a Block of Ambergreafe of very great Value was found,  of which they got about a third Part ; but were not able to  deliver in an exadt Account of its Worth, becaufe Sir Thomas Smith, at that time Governor and Treafurer of their  Company, had hitherto refufed to give in any Account of  their Treafury. And they further fay, that they conceived  the Right to that Ambergreafe to be in the Virginia Company, at whofe Charge, and in whofe Service, thofe three  Men had been fet out and employed ; but that they had  neverthelefs, fince compounded with the Finders, fo that none  of them had any jufl: Caufe of Complaint, and leafl: of all  Captain Somers, who could have no Title or Pretence of Intereft therein. As Book IV. T/6e History of VIRGINI-A. 229 A s Captain Argall had been long and aftively employed 1622in Virginia^ and was confequently well acquainted with moft ^— — <-• — '  Perfons and Paflages there, he was ftrongly fufpecSed to be Sir Franch  at the Bottom of thefe Complaints and Petitions agiainfi: the ^"'i ^°Company. They therefore, on their Part, refolved to purfue their Profecution againft him with greater Vigor ; and  they appointed a felecft Committee, to warn him peremptorily to exhibit his Accounts, and to make a full and fubftantial Anfwer to fuch things, as the Company fhould charge  him withal. But he, being a Man of good Senfe and Capacity, and of great Induftry and Refolution, ftill foiled  and perplexed their Proceedings, and gave them much Trouble and Annoyance, without their being able to bring him  to any Account or Punifliment, for all his unrighteous  Gains and Extortions in Virginia. Captain Samuel Each was fent, this Summer, in a  large Ship of three or four hundred Tons, to build a Blockhoufe or Fort, on thofe Banks which lie out in 'James River,  near Blunt Point. This was defigned, to command the  Paflage up the River ; and it was judged, by divers of the  Inhabitants, to be that, which ought firft to be attempted,  and would be moft eafily efFefted. Captain Each alfo, who  was efteemed a very honeft and fkilful Man, having viewed  the Place, when in /^/rg-zW«, thought the thing very feafible.  But this Undertaking, like many others, ended with great  Charge to the Company, and without any real EfFeft or  Advantage. However, in this Ship went over the Lady  Wyat, and Mr. Barret, a Mafter-Shipwright, (whom Captain Smith calls CaptaSi 5^rwzV/J) with twenty five Men,  to build Ships and Boats, together with many Houfe-carpenters for the Eaji-India School, and other Ufes. All thefe  Perfons, for publick Services, were fent in the common  Method, ufed ever fince the Company's Fund was exhaufted, by the voluntary Subfcription of the Adventurers to a  Roll. And I likewife find, that one Mr. Howe., who ftiles  himfelf a Chronicler, made a Demand upon the Company,  about this time, for twelve Pounds of Tobacco ; which,  he faid, had been promifed him annually,, in Confideration  of his Pains and Willingnefs to ferve the Company, and to  relate, in his Book, the feveral Paflages concerning Virginia. They granted him his Penfion for that Year, which  he moft thankfully accepted. But he either never performed the Service, or is at leaft a Writer of that Obfcurity and  Infignificancy, that I neither know, nor can find any thing  of him. • Before the Eledlion of Officers came on this Year,  the Company, in a previous Court, expreflTed their great Q. 3 Satif- 230 The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV- i6m. Satisfaaion in the Earl of Southampton's Adminiftration ; ^— V 'and they made it their humble Defire and Entreaty to his Sir Francis Lordfliip, which was entered upon their Records, that he  rant; °°' would vouchfafe, to hold the Place of Treafurer, for one  Year more. But the Earl of Southampton was very obnoxious to the Court, on Account of his Principles of Liberty,  and his bold and refolute Oppofition to an exceflive Prerogative. The King therefore endeavoured once more, to put  him out of the Government of the Company. For, at the  time of Ele(ftion, Alderman Hamerjley and Mr. Bell delivered a Meffage, in his Majefty's Name, fignifying : That  altho' it was not his Defign or Defire, to infringe their Freedom of Elecftion, yet it would be highly pleafing to- his Majefty, if they would make Choice, for Treafurer and Deputy, of any of thofe Gentlemen, whofe Names were written  in a Paper, then prefented to the Court. In this. Sir John  Woljienholme, Sir William Rujfel, Mr. Clitheroe, Mr. Maurice Abbot, and Mr. Handford, were propofed to their Choice  for Treafurer ; and for Deputy, Mr. Leat, Mr. Robert  Offley, Mr. Stiles, Mr. Jbdy, and Mr. Bateman. The  Company expreffed great Joy and Satisfaftion, for this Teftimony of his Majefty's Notice and good Wiflies to the Colony, and of his gracious Intention, not to infringe their  Privilege of free Eleftion. But becaufe, by their Rules and  Orders, three only at a time could ftand for either of thofe  Places, they firft put it to the Vote, which two, of the five  recommended by the King for Treafurer, ftiould be put in  Election, with one, whom the Company fliould name.  Mr. Clitheroe and Mr. Handford w^e chofen to ftand in Eledtion, and the Company named the Earl of Southampton ;  who was, upon the Ballot, chofen by a vaft Majority, he  having an hundred and feventeen Balls, Mr. Clitheroe thirteen, and Mr. Handford feven. In like Manner, they chofe  Mr. Leat and Mr. Bateman, to ftand for the Place of Deputy Treafurer, to whom the Company added Mr. Nicholas Farrar, who was alfo elefted, by having an hundred  and three Balls, Mr. Bateman ten, and Mr. Leat eight. The Earl of Southampton was then abfent ; and indeed  feems, purpofely to have abftained from their Courts at fuch  times, to ftiew, that thefe things were carried, not by any  Art or Ambition of his own, but merely by the free Choice,  and unbiafled AfFe<ftion of the Company. But Mr. Nicholas Farrar, being prefent, took his Place, as Deputy Treafurer, and returned Thanks to the Company, for this honourable Teftimony of their Love and Efteem, wherein he  fhould, all his Life, exceedingly glory and rejoice. And he  farther declared his Senfe of the Weight and Difficulty of the Office, Book IV. "The History of VIRGINIA. 231 Office, and of his own Inability. But not to trouble them »6"- with any felf-denying Intreaties, he promifed, to the Utmoft ' » ' of his Power, to perform the Charge they had laid upon^ Francis  him ; and befought the Honourable the Lords, and the other ^g/^^J  worthy Gentlemen and Officers, with their Counfels to direft, and the whole Court, with their Prefence to affift him,  in the Execution of his Office. And, in particular, he defired them, to requeft his Brother, Mr. John Farrar (in  Confidence of whofe Affiftance and Direftion, he well knew,  they had chofen him) to continue the fame Care and Pains,  he had formerly done. Whereupon Mr. John Farrar promifed, not to flack any thing of his former Zeal and Diligence, in the Bufinefs ; and the Company, in thankful Acknowledgement and Approbation of his great and faithful  Services, in the Place of Deputy-Treafurer, for the three  laft Years, beftowpd upon him twenty Shares of Land, old  Adventure. And they further ordered, that together with  the Gift, it fhould be entered on their Records, that the  Court conceived his Services and Merits to be fo great, that  had not their Liberality been bounded, within the Compafs  of twenty great Shares, they would, for him, have exceeded it with a much larger Proportion. And the fame Quantity had alfo been bellowed upon Sir Edwin Sandys^ in his  Abfence, the former Year, with a like honourable Teftimony and Acknowledgment of his Services and Deferts. The Company alfo requefted the Lords Cavendijh, Paget^ and Houghton, to prefent their moft humble Thanks to  his Majefly, for his Remembrance and good Wiflies to  their Affairs ; and to inform him, with what Reverence  and Refpeft, his Meffage was received ; but that the Election had fallen upon the Earl of Southampton, with an almoft unanimous Confent, the Company having found, that  the Plantation had profpered, each of the three laft Years,  more than in ten before ; and that more ha4 been done  with ten thoufand Pounds, than formerly with fourfcore  thoufand. And they further conceived, that as their Staple  Commodities were then in eftablifliing and perfecting, and  as the Government of the Country was to be fettled and  confirmed, equal Sufficiency, in their Governors and Direftors, would not fo much advance the Plantation, as the  Variablenefs of Infi:ru£tions and Methods, in the Change of  Officers, proceeding from different Conceptions and Ways  of thinking, would prejudice and retard the Bufinefs. But  his Majefty was not well pleafed to find, that out of fo large  a Number, as w.ere recommended by him, not one had  been chofen ; and he faid, he conceived Merchants to be  fitteft, for the Management of fuch Undertakings, becaufe 0.4 of  T:he History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. of their Experience and Skill in Staple Commodities. In  ■ Confirmation of which, he inftanced Sir Thomas Smith's  Sir Francis Government, in whofe time many Staple Commodities had  ff^yat, Go- ^^^^ ^gj. yp^ vvhich were now laid down, and only Tobacco  """"■ raifed or attempted. To which Lord Cavendijh replied,  that in this, as well as many other Particulars, relating to  the Company and their Proceedings, his Majefty had been  very grofly mifinformed ; that the following Tobacco only,  and neglecting all other Staple Commodities, had been the  Fruits of Sir Thomas Smith's and Alderman Johnfon'% Government ; but that fmce, they had laboured, with all Induftry, Care, and Diligence, to eredl Iron- Works, plant  Vineyards, make Silk, and raife other fuch valuable Commodities, of fome whereof, they hoped, ihortly to give his  Majefty a Proof; and he faid, that fince Sir Thomas Smith's  Time, the Colony had grown to almoft as many thoufands  of People, as he left hundreds, befides a very great Increafe  of their Cattle. And his Lordfliip further affured his Majefty, that fome of the Perfons recommended, being in  Court, did then, and moft of them have otherwife fince,  publickly acknowledged and declared, that they would ne- *  ver have accepted thofe Places ; profefling themfelves, thro'  Want of Experience, and a Multitude of other Bufinefs, fo  very unfit and unequal to the Charge, that they fliould certainly have brought back the Bufinefs more, in one Year,  than it had gone forward and profpered, in the laft three. Soon after this, the News of the Mafifacre in Virginia  arrived. This Event, fo unexpected, and fo contrary to  all their Hopes and Profpefts, was received, by the Company, with inexpreffible Grief; which was not a little aggravated, that fo many had fallen, by the Hands of Men fo  contemptible, and after fuch plain Warnings, as Opechancanough's .Attempt to poifon the whole Colony, and efpecially the Death of Nemattanow had given. And they were  therefore very loud in their Complaints againft the Condu£t  of the Governor and Colony ; never confidering, how eafy  and natural it would be, to retort upon them (as the Governor and Council a<Slually did) their own conftant and  preffing Inftrudlions, to win the Indians over by Courtefy  and Kindnefs, to give them familiar Entertainment in their  Houfes, and if it were poffible, to draw tliem to live together and cohabit with the Englijh. However, all good and  fenfible Men thought not the worfe of the Enterprife, for  thefe Difafters ; but many publick-fpirited Adventurers underto6k feveral new Plantations, and divers Ships were difpatched away, with fuch Supplies and Afliftance, as were  thought fufficient. The King alfo was fo far fenfible of the Lofs Book IV. T^^ History of VIRGINIA. 233 Lofs of fo many of his SubjecSts, and of the miferable State "6".  of the Colony, that he made them a Gift of Arms out of the ^~ — ■r—'  Tower ; fuch indeed, as were unferviceable in Europe a- ^" ^'■«™"  gainft equal Enemies, yet might, with a little Trimming yj^g|,_  and Repair, be made very ufeful againft the Indians. And  for immediate Difpatch, his Majefty lent twenty Barrels of  Powder, upon the Security of the Company's Seal, afterwards to repay it. He likewife promifed, to levy four hundred young Men, out of the feveral Shires, to be fent to  Virginia^ in Supply of thofe, that had perifhed in the Maffacre ; but he never could be brought, tho' often follicited  by the Company, to make that Promife good. The Lord  St. "John of Bajing., alfo gave fixty Coats of Mail, for the Defence of the Colony ; and the City of London, with many  private Perfons, were much concerned at, and very forward  to contribute towards the Repair of this Lofs. Captain Smith, with Mr. Stockham and Mr. Whitaker, two Clergymen of Note in the Colony, had ever been  of Opinion, that the Ways of Gentlenefs and Kindnefs would  never be fufficient to bring the Indians over ; and had therefore recommended, that Mars and Minerva fhould go Hand  in Hand, as well in their Converfion, as in all other Tranfa£tions and Intercourfe with them. But they were too fanguinary in their Notions of the Matter. For Mr. Stockam  plainly declares, that, until the Throats of their Priefts and  Elders were cut, there could be no Hopes of their Converfion ; and Captain Smith frequently mentions, and infinuates  to Imitation, the detefl:able Example of the Spaniards, in  their Conqueft of the Weji-Indies. They were indeed fomething excufable, if, their Patience being worn out by a long  Experience of the Perfidioufnefs, Bafenefs, and almoft invincible Brutality of that People, they at laft gave too much  Way to the Diftates of Anger and Violence. Captain Smith,  in particular, thought, that there had long fince been given  jufl: Occafion, to profecute them with War, and entirely to  conquer and fubdue them ; and he now looked upon the  Maflacre, as rather an Advantage than Detrf?iient, as it  would open the Eyes of the Englijh, and fet them upon their  Guard, and would give them jufl Grounds for a War, even  to their utter Extirpation, and thereby contribute to the future Security and fpeedy Advancement of the Colony. And  this indeed feems to have been the general Opinion of the  Times. For the Company themfelves, in a Letter this  Year to the Governor and Council, declare, that they faw  fuch a Difpofition in Mens Minds, as made them think,  that this Addition of Price had endeared the Purchafe, and  that the Blood of thefe People would, be the Seed of the  82 PlantaTbe History <?/ VIRGINIA. Book IV. Plantation. And, for their own Parts, they thought it a  Sin againft their dead JBrethren, who had loft their Lives in  ^}L ^'''•""' it, to abandon or give over the Enterprife, till they had fulvS. ly fettled and got Poffeffion of the Country. Captai-n Smith likewife, upon this Occafion, offered  his Service to the Company. He propofed, that they fhould  tranfport him, with an hundred Soldiers and thirty Sailors,  and all proper Provifions and Ammunition ; and fhould give  him a Bark of an hundred Tons, with Means and Materials,  to build fix or feven Shallops, to tranfport his Men from  Place to Place, as Occafion required ; and then he undertook, to form a flying Camp, and to range about and torment the Indians, till- he either obliged them to quit the  Country, or brought them into fuch Fear and SubjecSion,  that every Man fhould follow his Bufinefs in Peace and Security. And as to the Support and Subfiftence of this Party, he thought, if his Majeflry were truly informed of the  Neceflity and Benefit of the thing, he would give the Cuftoms of Firginia for a time. For, without fome fuch Method, it was much to be doubted, whether there would  come, in a few Years, either Cuftom, or any thing elfe,  from thence to England. And he doubted not, but that  the Planters would, according to their feveral Abilities, contribute towards fo ufeful and necefTary a Defign. But he infifted, that the Governors fhould not be permitted, by Virtue of their Authority, to take his Men away, or any thing  elfe, to employ them, as they thought proper. And he farther promifed, to make the beft Ufe of his Experience, as  well within the Limits of Virginia, as New- England, to  bring them both into one Map, with all the Countries, that  lay between them. As to the Reward of his own Pains  and Danger, he aflced not any thing, but what he could  raife, from the proper Labour of the Savages themfelves. This Propofal was well, approved by moft, that heard  it ; but fuch were their Divifions and Confufion at that  time, that he could obtain no other Anfwer, but that the  Expence would be too great, and their Stock was exhaufted ;  and they thought, the Planters fhould do fomething of that  Nature themfelves, if they could find fufBcient Means to  effeft it. However, he was given to underftand, as he tells  us, that if he would undertake the thing upon his own private Account, he might have the Company's Leave ; provided, they might have half the Pillage. But he rejefted  this Intimation with Scorn ; thinking, that all the Pillage ,  of thofe poor and naked Barbarians, except a little Corn, to  be had at fome times of the Year, would not, in twenty  Years, amount to twenty Pounds. But I fufpeit, that all this  Book IV. T:he History of VIRGINIA. this only pafled in Converfation, or was at moft privately  talked at their Courts, without ever being brought regular-''  ly before the Company. For I have the Company's Re- S^ ^''"""'^  cords of that time, now in my Poffeffion, in which there vei^nor.  is not the leaft Mention of any fuch Propofition, altho'  things of a trivial and much more minute Nature are moft  exactly entered. ": Neither does it feem confiftent with the  Charafter of the Company and its Leaders, who gave a  fair Courfe and Debate to all Propofitions offered, and were  rather profufe in their Expences for the good of the Colony,  than lying upon the Catch for little Advantages and rhean  Gains. However, the Captain's open Nature, and Simplicity of Honefty, might be blinded by crafty and defigning  Men, and eafily made believe, that that came from the  Company, which had really never come under their Cognifance, or been laid before them. In the mean time, the Colony in Virginia, being much  frightened at this lamentable and unexpected Difafter, refolved to abandon all the petty Plantations, and to draw the  People together, to make good five or fix of the beft and  moft defenfible Places. Nay, fo great was the Terror and .  Alarm, that many Perfons were urgent, to abandon Jama  River, and to retire to the Eaflern Shore, where they might  eafily fortify and defend themfelves againft the Indians. And  for quieting thofe, who were many, the Governor was  obliged to hold fome Councils, under Colour of confidering  their Propofal, but yet with a full Refolution, never to take  fo unadvifed and deftruftive a Step. However, many Plantations were quitted by Authority ; and all the People were  drawn together to Shirley Hundred, Flower-de-Hundred,  'James-Town, with Pafpahey and the Plantations right oppofite, Kicquotan, and Southampton Hundred ; to which  were added, by the Obftinacy and Refolution of their Owners, Mr. Samuel Jordan's Plantation, now called Jordan's  Point, and Newport' s-News. For Want of Boats and other  Conveniencies, it was impoflible, on fuch a fudden, to fecure and bring off all their Cattle and other Goods, which  were, for the moft part, after their Departure, burnt, ruined, and deftroyed'by the Indians. But Mr. Gookin, at  Newport's-News, refufed to obey the Order of Government,  and draw off his People ; and having got together thirty  five of all Sorts, he fecured his Plantation, and defended  himfelf and Company againft all their AfTaults and Incurfions. The like was alfb done by Mr. Samuel Jordan ; and  by Mrs. ProSior, a proper, civil, and modeft Gentlewoman, who, with an heroic Spirit, defended her Eftate for  a Month, till flie, with all with her, were obliged, by the Englijh  The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. Englijh Officers, to go with them, and to leave their Sub- 'ftance to the Havock and Spoil of the Enemy. Mr. Ed- Sk Franchjfjgf.^ ^n ajfo^ ^f Elifabeth-City, altho' much Mifchief vefnor ° was done to his Cattle, yet did himfelf alone defend his Houfe, whilft all his Men were fick and unable to give him any Affiftance. Captain Thomas iWwf^, Deputy and Superintendant  of the Company's Lands, forefeeing the Difficulties and  Famine, that muft neceflarily enfue, caufed as much Corn  as ppffible, to be planted at Elifabeth-City, where he commanded ; whilft others deftroyed even that, which had  been before planted, fearing, it might be of Service to the  Indians, and trufted wholly to Relief by Trade or from  England, which had ever been one of the principal Caufes  of their Miferies. For, Supplies from England were very  precarious, and liable to many Accidents and Difappointments, and had been, formerly at leaft, very ftingily afforded : And the Trade for Corn, with the Natives, .was  ufually carried on by Men of. Subftance, to their own Gain  and Advantage, and as it was complained, efpecially by  the Company's Enemies, to the great Oppreffion of the  poor and fufFering Inhabitants. But Captain Neuice called  all his next adjoining Neighbours to his Houfe, and omitted  nothing, to relieve their Wants and Neceffities. He likewife, with all Speed, entrenched himfelf; mounted three  Pieces of Ordinance ; funk a Well of frefli Water ; and  foon put himfelf into a Pofture of Defence, above the Fear  of any Danger or Aflault from the Enemy. In all thefe  Works, he a(fted the Part of a Sawyer, a Carpenter, or a  Labourer ; till he brought upon himfelf many SicknefTes,  and at laft a Dropfy, to the very great Grief of his Family, and of all under his Government. The latter End of  yt^ne, B\t George Teardley, in his Way to Accomack, ftaid  three or four Days with Captain Newce, being accompanied by the Council, and many other gay Gentlemen. The  Captain, being oppreffed with fo large a Company, complained, to one of the chief among them, of the Want of  Provifions. Whereupon he gave the Word to the reft,  and they entered the Fields of Corn near the Fort, which  were the beft guarded and preferved from the Ravage of  the Enemy, and altho' the Ears were fcarce half grown,  they devoured and made a miferable Wafte among it. But  it muft be obferved, that this Particular relies wholly on  the Authority of Captain Smith, who was himfelf abfent,  and whofe Relations of thefe ' times were, chiefly taken from  Perfons of the opponent Faction. They are therefore always  to be fomewhat fufpedled ; and efpecially in this Story, as it claflies  Book IV. rbe History of VIRGINIA. clafhes fo much with Sir George Teardley's general Character, and the univerfal Love and Efteem, which he obtained  from the Colony. However Captain Newce was certainly a ^" Prandi  Man of great Goodnefs and Merit. As long as he had any ^^^^^^ °'  thing, his Company fhared it equally with him ; and when  all was fpent, being obliged to live on Crabs and Oyfters,  they fell into a very weak and feeble Condition. Yet  Captain Newce diftributed among them, as he faw Occafion, a little Milk and Rice, which he ftill had left ; and  behaved himfelf, in all things, with fuch a fatherly Tendernefs and Care, that he obtained the Reputation, of being the Commander, throughout the whole Country, that  took the moft continual Pains for the Publick, and did the  leaft Good for himfelf, of all others. On the 9th of September, his Men were attacked at their Labours, by the  Indians, which was the firft Aflault, they had made fince  the Maffacre, and four were (lain. The Captain, altho'  extremely fick, fallied forth to engage them ; but they,  hiding themfelves in the Corn and other lurking Places,  efcaped his Vengeance. Soon after, this worthy Gentleman died ; and the Company, in Confideration of his, as  well as her own Merit, granted his Widow a Moiety of  the Labours of the Tenants, due to his Place, till another  Perfon fhould be appointed to fucceed him. And afterwards, in a Letter to the Governor and Council, they ordered her the whole Profits of their Labour for the following Year, with no fmall Commendation of her Virtue and  Defert. Captain Ralegh Chrojhaw was, all this while, at Patowmack, with one Man. He had not been long there,  before Opechancanough fent two Balkets of Beads to Japazaus, the King, to kill them ; affuring him of the Slaughter he had made, and that before the End of two Moons,  there fhould not be an Englijhman left in all their Countries. yapa%aus difclofed this to Captain Chrojhaw, who  exprefled great Scorn and Contempt for Opechancanough,  whofe Treachery and Cowardife he had feen fufficiently  tried by Captain Smith, when he took him Prifoner, at the  Head of feven hundred Men. After two Days Deliberation, fapazaus made Anfwer, that the Englijh were his  Friends, and Opitchapan, the Indian Emperor, his Brother ;  and that therefore, there fhould be no Blood fhed between  them, by his Means. He alfo returned the Prefent of  Beads, advifing the Pamunkeys to come no more into his  Country, left the Englijh, though againfl his Will, fhould  da them a Mifchief. But the Englijh Colony concluded  Chrojhaw undoubtedly dead, till Captain Hamer came to Pa- towmack. 238 "The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. i6zz. towmack^ in June, to trade for Corn ; where he found him  ^-—^<~' fafe, and was kindly entertained by both him and the King.  Sir Franch By the King's Diredion and Affiftance, he affaulted and  ^nOT °° to°l^ a Town, where was fome Corn ; and at his Departure, he left Captain Chrojhaw four Men more. Chrpjhaw  receiving continual Alarms, retired with thefe to a Place of  Advantage, where, with the Affiftance of the Patowmacks,  he foon fortified himfelf, fufficiently againft all fuch wild  Affailants. Soon after, he was vifited by Captain Newce ;  from whom underftanding the miferable State of the Colony, he offered, if they would fend him a bold Shallop, with  Provifion to trade, and proper Arms and Men, to provide  them Corn fufficient, after the getting in their. Corn ; but  as yet, it being but the latter End of yune, he told him,  there was little or none in all the Country. Newce communicating this to the Governor and others.  Captain Ifaac Maddifon was fent, with thirty odd Men,  in a Ship and fmall Bark. -His Commiffion from the Governor, exprefly charges and requires him, to affift and defend their Friends and Confederates, the Patowmacks, againft the common Enemy ; to protedl them and their Corn,  to his utmoft Power ; and in his Carriage, as well towards  them as the Enemy, to difcharge, faithfully and circumfpeftly, the great Truft, repofed in him, as he would anfwer the fame, at his Peril. But juft at that time. Captain  Chrojhaw had received a Letter from Mrs. Boyce, a Woman  of Figure, who was Prifoner, with nineteen more, at Pamunkey. Having fome Profpecft of recovering their Liberty, he went to James-Town, with two Chiefs of the Patowmacks, to foUicit the Governor, and to enter into Meafures for their Releafe. But before this, Opechancanough  had returned an infolent Anfwer to the Governor's Meflage,  concerning reftoring the Englijh Captives, and had treated  the King's Pidiure with great Diflionour and Contumely.  The Englijh alfo diflembled their Intents, and pretending  Peace and Friendfliip, invited the Indians back, to plant  their Corn at their ufual. Habitations ; which being now  grown up, fo as to make the Lofs irreparable by a new  Crop, the Governor was preparing, with five hundred Men,  to make a fharp and vigorous War upon them, efpecially  upon Opechancanough and his bloody Adherents ; and hoped,  by deftroying their Corn, and other Means, to drive them  quite out of the Country. As to the lawful Emperor, Opitchapan, who by this time indeed was only an Emperor  in Name, he feems very greatly to have difapproved of the  Maflacre. For I find him, early the next Year, fending  Chanco, Pace's Chrijiian Convert, who difcovered the Indian Book IV. rh History of VIRGINIA. 239 dian Confpiracy, to aflure Sir Francis Wyat, that if he i6"would fend ten or twelve Men, he would give up the reft' — "y- — '  of the Englijh Prifoners, that were in his Poffeffion ; and ^" ^•'"""^  would alfo deliver his Brother Opechancanough^ the hnihov ^J^^^  of the Maflacre, into the Hands of the Englijh^ either  alive or dead. Captain Tucker was accordingly fent upon  .this Service, but without the defired Succefs. However  Opitchapan fent back Mrs. Boyce^ naked and unapparaled,  in Manner and Faftiion, like one of their Indian Queens. For thefe Reafons, the Governor was unwilling, at that  Juncture, to hear of any Treaty with Opechancanough ; and  Captain Chrojhaw's Journey to James-Town was in vain ;  but his Abfence from Patowmack had a very unhappy Confequence, on another Account. For, Maddifon was a Man  of a jealous and timorous Nature ; and not liking to live  among the Savages, as Chrojhaw did, he built himfelf a  ftrong Houfe, within Chrojhaw's Fort, and there foon rofe  great Coldnefs and Referve between him and the Patowmacks. There was alfo then at Patowmack an exile King,  who was inwardly exafperated at • Japazaus, becaufe he  would not aflift him in the Recovery of his Kingdom.  This fubtle and malicious Barbarian did therefore, in Revenge, forge a Plot, as if yapazaus and the Patowmacks  were in Treaty with Opechancanough, how to cut off and  deftroy the EngUJh there. And to give his Lye the greater  Credit and Air of Probability, he wrefted and applied feveral Circumftances, that had lately happened, to this Defign. Maddifon, naturally fearful and fufpicious, was alarmed at this, and made his Men ftand pundtually to their  Arms. Some time after, under Pretence of Bufinefs, he  fent for the King to his ftrong Houfe ; where having locked  him, his Son, and four others up, and fet a Guard of five  Englijhmen upon the Houfe, he fell on the Town, with  the reft of his Company, and flew thirty or forty. Men,  Women, and Children. The poor King, being furprifed  at fuch an unexpected Aflault, called out, and begged him  to ceafe from fo undeferved a Cruelty. But he gave not  over the Execution, till he had flain, or put to Flight, all  in the Town. Then, he returned, and taxed the King of  Treachery, who denied it bitterly, and told him, it was  fome Contrivance of thofe, who wiflied- his Deftrudlion,  for being a Friend to the Englijh. After that, Maddifon led  him, his Son, and two others to his Ship, promifing to fet  them at Liberty, as foon as his Men were all fafely fliipped ; and the King, very readily and effe£l:ually, ordered  his Subjedls, not to (hoot at, or annoy the Englijh, whilft  they were going on board. But notwithftanding this. Mad- 240 The History 0/ VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1622. Maddifon, contrary to all good Faith, carried them Pri- ' ^ 'foners to James-Town; where they lay, till the OSfober Sir ■f'-"""! following, when they were carried home by Captain HaZiloi mer, who took a Quantity of Corn for their Ranfom.  However, this perfidious Dealing did not pafs ofF, entirely  without Notice or Animadverfion. For, Mr. John Pountis^  as a Cafe properly belonging to his Office of Vice-Admiral, .  afterwards lodged a Complaint againft fome Perfons, who  going out to trade with the Indians, under Pretence of  Friendfliip, and in the Governor's Name, had feifed their  Perfons, and fometimes taken their Lives, and fometimes  their Goods, for nothing, or at their own Rates, contrary  to all Laws human and divine, and to the Diflionour of  God's Name, of the King, and the whole Englijh Nation.  Altho' this was conceived in general Terms, fo as to reach  all other Perfons, guilty of the fame Crime, yet we are  told, in the A£i: of Court itfelf, that it was chiefly levelled  againft Maddifon and Hamer. And fome Examinations againft them were accordingly taken ; but by Reafon of Hamer's Sicknefs, and Maddifon'% Abfence, who foon after  returned to England, the Suit dropped, and never proceeded to full Trial. T-His rafti and unadvifed Aftion of Maddifon (not to  call it by any worfe Name) was of very ill Confequence to  the Colony. For they were thereby cut off from all Hopes  and Pretenfions, to trade for Corn on that River ; which  was then their only Refuge and Dependance, as the Indians, in all the other Parts of the Country, were in an  open and declared War with them, and as they themfelves  had not attempted any thing of a Crop, left the Corn,  when grown up, fliould give Means and Opportunity for  Affaults and Ambufcades. Captain Chrofiaw's Defign was  alfo quite defeated ; who intended to make Japazaus a proper Inftrument and Ally againft Opechancanough. For he  had at his Command above two hundred fighting Men, in  the Town of Patowmack ; and was, befides, a Perfpn of  great Intereft and Authority, throughout the whole River,  being a Kind of petty Emperor there, and unwilling to  own Subjedtion to the other Emperors, whom he always  affefted to treat, rather as Brethren than Superiors. It was  therefore probably thought, that Chrojhaw would have  fucceeded in his Scheme, and might eafily have made him  rife againft a Power, which he was before jealous of, and  always looked upon, as ufurped and oppreffive. However Captain Henry Spilman, who had been preferved by the Means of Pocahontas, and had lived feveral  Years at Patowmack, relying on his Intereft and Acquaintance  Book. IV. Tbe History ?/• VIRGINIA. tance with them, ventured to go thither, in a Bark, with  twenty fix Men, to trade for Corn. But himfelf, with*  twenty one more, were furprifed and flain by the Pafcoti- ^" F''"""'  cons, the greateft People in thofe Parts. They immediate- venfor.  ly boarded the Veflel in their Canoes, and entered fo faft,  that the five Men, left fd guard her, were in the utmoft  Amazement, till a Sailor gave fire to a Piece of Ordinance  at Random ; the bare Report whereof fo frightened the  poor Savages, that they leaped overboard, and forgetting  their Canoes, fwarm afhore. Soon after, they heai'd a great  Noife among them, and faw a Man's Head thrown down  the Bank; whereupon they weighed Anchor, and returned..  And thus died this unfortunate Gentleman, who was of a  good Family in England. He had, three Years before,  been tried and found guilty, of depreciating and undermining the Governor's Authority, by teUing Opechancanough,  that a Great Man (meaning the Earl of Warwick) would  foon come, and take his Place. For which Crime, they  thought it a Mercy to fpare his Life ; but they however  degraded him from his Captainftiip, and condemned him,  to be a Servant to the Colony -for feven Years, in Quality  of Interpreter ; for which Office he was peculiarly fitted,  by having long lived, and been very converfant, among the  Indians. Edward Waters, one of the three, that ftaid in the Iflands  of Bermudas, and found the great Block of Ambergreafe,  dwelling in Virginia, at the time of the Maflacre, was  himfelf, together with his Wife, taken and kept Prifoners  by the Nandfamonds. But this Fall, forhe Englljh, near  Newport' %-News, were furprifed in fo great a Storm, that  altho' the Men faved their Lives, the Boat was loft ; which  was caft, by the Winds and Waves, upon the Shore of  Nandfamond. The Indians, finding it, were fo bufied,  with Songs, and Dances, and Invocations, according to  their Manner of Triumph, that Waters and his Wife found  Means, to get fecretly into one of their Canoes, and crolTed  the River, nine or ten Miles over, to Klcquotan ; where  they were received with no lefs Joy and Wonder by the  Englljh, than their Efcape gave Anger and Vexation to the'  Indians. Shortly after. Sir George Yeardley and Captain Powel,  each with a Company of Gentlemen Volunteers, went to  feek the Enemy. But all being fled, except three, which  Captain Powel met by Chance and flew, they burnt their  Houfes, deftroyed every thing, they could find, and fo returned. Three hundred Soldiers, the beft, they could  chufe, were, not long after, raifed and embarked in con^ R venient 242 "The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 162a. venient Veffels, under the Conducft of Sir George Teardley^  '—Y- — -with all things neceflary for the Expedition. They went  Sir Fr««.r, firft to Nandfamond ; where the Indiam fet fire to their  ^Cr. own Houfes, fpoiled all they could, and then fled away,  with what they could carry ofF. So that the Englijh had  no Opportunity to make any Slaughter of them. But  their Corn being newly gathered, they feized all, they  could find ; burnt the Houfes, which the Inhabitants had  I in their Hurry left unburnt ; and fo departed. From thence they went to Pamunkey^ the chief Seat of Opechancanough.  He did not appear himfelf ; but the Indians there feemed  exceedingly aftonifhed, and promifed to bring them all the  Englijh^ yet living, and to reftore their Arms, and whatever elfe they had ; pretending, much to defire Peace, and  to give them any Satisfaction in their Power. But this was  only a Device, to procraftinate the Time, till they could  convey away their Corn from all other Places, except  where the Englijh were quartered. At length, the Englijh,  perceiving their Defign, feifed on the Corn in their Power,  burnt their Houfes, and purfued them into the Woods.  But they fled before them, and eafily efcaped, not without  Contempt and Infult. For fome lurked about in Ambufh,  and ' difcharged fome Shot out of Englijh Pieces, which  hurt and wounded feveral diforderly Stragglers. After this.  Sir George returned, with a thoufand Bufhels of Corn, and  each of the Soldiers had three Bufliels a piece. Captain  Smith tells us, that they were however obliged to pay ten  Shillings a Bufliel, before they received it, for Freight and  other Charges of the Expedition. But the Governor and  Council's Letters to the Company, an Authority not to be  contefted, exprefly fay, that Sir George Teardley freely employed his own Shipping, Shallops, Mariners, and Servants,  without any Recompence or Freight at all. But this is not  the only Inftance, in which that Gentleman's Adlions are  mifreprefented in Smith's Hiftory. For, he immediately preceeding and coming after Captain Argall's Government,  and having a Commiflion to examine and punifli his Offences, became a peculiar Mark of Hatred and Calumny  to that Fadtion. The fame Letters inform us, that three  thoufand Bufliels of Corn more were taken from the Enemy, by Force or Trade, and brought in, by different Parties of Men. By thefe, and other fuch fmall Inroads and  Depredations, the Indians were reduced to great Want and  Neceflity that Winter, and endured no fmall Mifery and  Famine. So that many of the Englijh^ in Confidence of  their Weaknefs, and Inability to hurt them, returned to  their former Habitations. For, befides plundering and ruining Book IV. "fhe History of VIRGINIA. 243 ing their Corn, and other Ways of diftrefling and deftroy- '6='2- ing them, the Governor and Council, in the aforefaid Let-"' v ' ter, affur? the Company, that more Indians were flain that ^ F'-amh  Autumn and Winter, than had ever fallen by the Hands of ye/nJ^  the Englijh, put them all together, from the firft Beginning  and Settlement of the Colony. The Earl of Warwick, not fatisfied with the Spoils of  Virginia, had alfo, by his Intereft and Intrigues, procured  his Follower and Dependent, Captain Nathaniel Butler, to  be fent Governor of Bermudas for three Years ; where he  exercifed the fame bare-faced Oppreflion and Extortion,  that Captain Argall had done here. But from the petty  Offence of plundering the Colony, he proceeded to a higher  Crime and Mifdemeanor, and committed fqme Pillage upon  a Spanijh Wreck. This incenfed Gondomar, and the Lords  of the Privy Council fent a fliarp Order to the Company,  to make an immediate and ftrifl: Enquiry into the Matter.  The Time of his Government being therefore now expired, a Commiffion was given to Mr. Bernard, who was  going over to fucceed him, to enquire into the Affair of th-e  Spanijh Wreck, as well as the Truth of many other Complaints and Allegations, fent over againft him to England.  But, as had been done in Captain Argall'i Cafe, a Bark  was difpatched from Barnjiaple, in which he efcaped, iuft  before the Arrival of the new Governor, and came to P^irginia. He left thofe Iflands in a moft miferable Plight, being reduced to Beggary and Ruin, by his Rapines and Extortions ; and coming hither in the Extremity of Winter,  he found the Colony labouring under the Diftreffes and unhappy Confequences of the Maffacre. Sir Francis Wyat  received and entertained him, with great Hofpitality and  Good-manners ; but his Behaviour here was infamoufly  lewd and riotous. Among other things, he demanded to  be admitted of the Council, and grievoufly refented his  being refufed, altho' he could fhew no Colour of Right or  Title to it. After about three Month's Stay, and having  gone up as high as Chickahominy, where, like a common  Robber or free Booter, he fell upon, and made Spoil of  Lady Dale's Cattle, he fet Sail, and returned for England. But before this, in the Beginning of the Summer,  there had been fet afoot a moft unhappy Affair for the Company ; which gave it, as it were, a fettling Blow, and not  without fome Face of Reafon, was the Occafion of greater  Clamours and Animofities than ever. It hath been frequently related, how the King took all Opportunities of  grinding the Company and infant Colony, \)y laying op- R 2 preflive ^44 "T^^ History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. 1622. preflive and illegal Impofitions on Tobacco. This he ^- — V 'did, partly out of his natural Abhorrence and Averfion to Sir frfl»aitijat Weed, but chiefly out of a Defire of Gain. For,  ^nor. with a Conjun<aion not unufual to be found in Men's Charafters, Profufion, and a voracious Appetite after Money,  had met together in that Prince's Nature. In all thefe  Exadiions, Sir Lionel Cranfield had been his principal Inftrument. He had been at firft a Merchant of London, and  then an Officer in the Cuftoms, from whence he was introduced to Court, as a Projeftor; which, in the Language of thofe Times, fignified a Perfon, who could furnifli Expedients to the Minifters, to raife Money, in the  Vacancy, and without the Afliftance, of Parliament. He  was a very wife and dextrous Officer ; and in this Execrable  Function, had been fo ufeful and fuccefsful, that, together  with the Advantage of having married one of Buckingham's  Relations (an extraordinary Merit then, and an infallible  Road to the higheft Preferments) he had rifen, before this  time, to the Dignity of Earl of Mtddlefex, and Lord High  Treafurer of England. He was himfelf an ancient Adventurer in the Affair of Virginia ; and well knew, how  uneafy they were, under the PrelTure of the Monopolies,  Garbling, and other illegal Patents. He therefore refolved  to try", whether he could not make the Company confent  to their own Oppreffion, and fqueeze out of them a greater  Profit and Revenue to his Majefly, by making a particular  ContraiS with themfelves. To this End, he firfl broached the Matter privately to  Sir Edwin Sandys ; offering a Grant, to the two Companies  of Virginia and the Somer-IJlatids, for the fole Importation  of Tobacco into the Realms of England and Ireland, referving to his Majefly a certain valuable Rent. This he  did, with large Profeffions of his Love and AfFeftion to the  Colony of Virginia, whereof he was an ancient Counfellor ;  and declared, that, befides the perfonal Duty of his Place,  as Lord High Treafurer, his principal Motive herein was  the Profit and Advancement of the Colonies. Sir Edwin  profefTed his . Ignorance, in Affairs of that Nature ; but  after fome Thought, he confulted with Sir Arthur Ingram,  another Member of the Virginia Company, then prefent,  but a faft Creature and Retainer to the Lord Treafurer.  At length, confidering, that Tobacco was a deceiveable  Weed, and the Ufe of it wholly founded on a Humour,  which, might foon vanifh into Smoke, and come to nothing, he told his Lordfhip, that to fettle any great Rent  in Money, upon fuch. an uncertain Commodity, might  foon bankrupt the Companies, and utterly ruin the Plantations.  Book IV. "The Hist OKv of VIRGINIA. tions. Wherefore, he conceived it much the fafer Way for the Companies, to yield his Majefty a certain Propor-^ tion, in Specie, out of the Tobacco itfelf; whereof, he^'*' F''"""' thought, they might be induced to give a fourth Part, pro-^J^^l °' vided they might be difcharged from all other Burthens upon it. But his Lordfhip, falling into a Calculation, told him, that without the Grant of a Third, there could not be that Revenue raifed to his Majefty, as was expedited ; and for the old Cuftom, of fix Pence a Pound upon Roll, and four Pence upon Leaf Tobacco, it was already granted to his Majefty's Farmers^ and could not be reverfed. After this, Sir Edwin Sandys, by his Lordfhip's Command, communicated this Propofal to the Lords Southampton and Cavendijh, and the tv^o Deputies ; who having imparted it to their Councils, brought it before the Companies.  Such a Contraft, if it could be concluded on any reasonable  Terms, was certainly of very great and vifible Advantage  to the Companies and Colonies. For it would enable them,  by having the whole Commodity in their own Hands, to  exclude all foreign Tobacco, and to raife, or at leaft keep  up, the Price of their own ; and would as well eafe them  from the Extortions and Infults of other monopolifing Patents, as fecure them from any farther Impofitions. For  the Court, as the Colonies advanced in Strength, was ftill  loading them with new Impofitions, and kept them always  ftaggering, and fcarce able to go forward, under the Burthen of Taxes and Impofts. And this was then done, folely  by the King's Authority, without granting Parliaments their  undoubted Right, of giving Money, and laying new Duties  on the Subje<5t. And what was a notorious, and (if the facred Charafter of Kings and Minifters would allow the Expreffion) an impudent Breach of Faith, it was done againft  the plaineft and moft exprefs Words and Tenor of former  Grants ; which was, beyond Doubt, the prefent Cafe of  the Virginia Company, as hath been before obferved and  recited. However, the Companies, fitting down peaceably  under thefe Oppreffions, readily embraced this Overture,  and appointed each a Committee, to treat with the Lord  Treafurer about it. But in the Progrefs of the Bufinefs, his  Lordfliip was ftill fqueezing in new Hardftiips upon them ;  and particuliarly furprifed and fhooked them with a Propofal, that for each of the two Years, then next enfuing, the  Companies fliould be obliged, to bring in fixty thoufand  Weight of Spanijh Tobacco, or otherwise permit forty thoufand Weight to be imported by fome other. This Propofition feemed very grievous to the Committees, and crofted R 3 one 246 -K^ HisTOR-v- 0/ VIRGINIA. Book IV. i6i2. one of their chief Purpofes. They therefore replied : That < ' no fuch Obligation was laid on the former Patentees for the Sir Francis f^jg Importation of Tobacco : That the Example of obliging  ^mo?.°°'Men to bring in any foreign Commodity, whereof there  was fufficient of the Growth of the King's own Dominions,  would feem very flrange and accountable ; and fuch a thing,  as they thought, had not been heard of, in any Part of the  World : That to prohibit the planting Tobacco in England,  and yet to command the importing fo large a Quantity from  a foreign Country (efpecially when it was confeffedly a great  Drain of the Cafli of the Nation) would be very grievous  to the Englijh Subjedl ; and was fo odious a thing, that they  were afliamed to be concerned in it : That the Quantity of  fixty thoufand Weight of Spanijh Tobacco was very exceffive, and more than had been imported, in divers Years,  when there was no Reftraint at all : That fo large a Proportion (the whole Import of Tobacco into England, upon  an Average for the laft feven Years, being only an hundred  forty two thoufand and eighty five Pounds Weight a Year)  miift utterly abafe the Pripe of the Plantation Tobacco, as  manifeftly appeared from that Year's Experience ; fo that the  Colonies would part with a third of their Tobacco to the  King, without any Retribution in the Price of the reft, as  was at firft propofed : And that, in excluding all Spanijh  Tobacco, there could be no Room for Fraud or Error ;  whereas, under the Colour of fo large an Importation, it  would be impoflible to prevent the running and ftealing in  a much greater Quantity. These Objedtions were certainly very fharp and home,  and did not a little expofe the partial and mfift unpatriot  Meafures of the Court. But it was the Misfortune of that  Time, that the Company dealt much in Reafon, and the  Courtiers in Command. They were therefore peremptorily  told, that this was a Point of fuch Importance, that it could  not be difpenfed with, without diflblving the whole Contraft. For we muft remember, that the Spanijh Match  was ftill on Foot ; and therefore his Majefty would facrifice fo large an Intereft of his own Subje<Ss to that Nation,  to gratify and oblige his good Friend and Ally, the King of  Spain ; who had been now, for many Years, bubbling and  abufing him, to the open Scorn and Mockery of all Europe.  Befides which, it is not to be fuppofed, that Gondomar, who,  about this time, bore a very great Sway in the Affairs of  England, would let flip fuch an Opportunity, of acquiring  fo great a Profit to his Country. And indeed we are told  by Mr. Oldys,ih2ii the Obftru£tion of thefe Plantations, was  a main Branch of the Aims and Endeavours of that Spanijh Buffoon ; Book IV. "The History <?/ VIRGINIA. 247 Buffoon ; and that he oppofed all Voyages to the Weji-Indhs^ 1612. and particularly crofled thefe Undertakings of Virginia and '— ~v ' Bermudas^ left from them there {hould afterwards arife ano-^''^ Framis  ther England in America^ of equal Dread and Annoyance to ^^^^^^ °'  New Spain, as that in Europe was to the Old. But the  Company, having had fome Gleams of Hope, and dreading  nothing fo much, as falling into their former Calamities and  Oppreilions, did at laft, after much Difpute and Conteftation, confent to this Article; and the whole- Contract was  concluded and agreed upon, chiefly on thefe Conditions.  For I fhall in this, as I have done in other Cafes, take the  Liberty, for Brevity's Sake, only to give the main Subftance  of Matters, and to leave out fuch Points, as are immatCT  rial, and of little or no Confequence to be known. I. That the fole Importation of Tobacco, into the  Realms of England and Ireland, fhould be granted to the  Virginia and Somer-Iflands Companies, by Patent under the  Great Seal of England ; which Grant fhould be drawn and  conftrued, in the moft beneficial Manner for the Companies Behoof, and the Advancement of the Colonies ; his Majefty's Profit, hereafter recited, only referved. II. That his Majefty fhould, by Proclamation, prohibit all others from importing, as alfo from planting Tobacco in England and Ireland, during the faid Contrail:, under grievous Penalties ; and that what was already plarited,  fliould, by Virtue of the former Proclamation, be confifcated, III. That his Majefty, and the Lord High Treafurer,  fhould take all proper Methods, for preventing and confifcating all Tobacco, unduly imported ; and fhould endeavour, in all Points, to keep up effe£tually to the true Intent  and Meaning of this Contraft ; and particularly, that his  Majefty fhould grant no Licences to Retailers of Tobacco,  that the Market might ftill remain free and open, as it had  hitherto done. IV. That in Confideration hereof, as alfo for that the  Companies fhould be difcharged from all other Payments on  Tobacco (excepting only the ancient Cuftom, in the Book  of Rates, of fix Pence a Pound on Roll Tobacco, and four  Pence upon Leaf) the faid Companies fhould pay to his Majefty the clear Proceed of a full third Part of all Tobacco,  Yearly imported and landed by them in the faid two Realms :  Provided neverthelefs, that they fhould not be obliged to  import more Tobacco of the Growth of the two Colonies,  than they themfelves thought proper. R 4 V. That 248 The History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. i6z2. V. That the Lord High Treafurer fliould caufe the ^■^ — ■y~~-' Cuftom to be reduced to a Medium for feven Years laft fflr Fra^i! p^fl.^ ending at Michaelmas, 1621 ; wherein fhould be fpe- vemor. °' cified, how much was Roll Tobacco, and how much Leaf, becaufe of the different Cuftom ; and that the Whole fliould be reduced to a certain Sum of Money, whereof one Third to be paid by the King, for his Part, and two Thirds by the Companies, and the Cuftomers to make no farther Demand on any Tobacco, either imported or exported. VL That his Majefty fliould be difcharged from Payment of Freight, and all other previous Charges ; but that  immediately upon the Arrival of the faid Tobacco (at which  time his Majefty 's Intereft therein would commence) he  fliould bear the third Part of all Charges, for landing, houfing, keeping, and tranfporting by Land, Sea, or frefli Water, into divers Parts ; as alfo his third Part of all Law-fuits,  of the Salaries of all Officers, Agents, Factors, and Servants ; and in general, of all Matters and Bufinefles whatfoever, incident to the faid Tobacco, or Contraft. VIL That all the Tobacco imported, fliould be configned into fuch Hands, as fliould be appointed by the faid  Companies ; who ihould, in their General Courts, have the  fole Nomination of all Officers, Agents, Faftors, Minifters,  and Servants, and the entire Management of the faid Tobacco : Yielding to his Majefty, a true and perfe<3: Account  thereof, and' paying the clear Profits, which fliould become  due to his Majefty for his Third, and come into their Hands :  In which Account the third of all Charges fliould be allowed  and defalcated, as aforefaid. Vin. That the Companies fliould be obliged to import, not above fixty thoufand, nor under forty thoufand  Weight of Spanijh Tobacco, for each of the firft two Years  of this Contraft, and no longer : Upon Condition neverthelefs, that the King and State of Spain did not purpofely  (upon Knowledge of their being obliged to import fo large a  Quantity) raife the Cuftom, or impofe new Burthens and  Charges upon their Tobacco ; and on Condition likewife,  that the Price of Tobacco, at which it was then fold in Spain,  be not purpofely enhanced, and that the Markets be, in all  refpe(9:s, as free and open, as formerly they have been :  Provided alfo, if any of the faid Quantity of Spanijh Tobacco do, in any wife, mifcarry by Cafualties at Sea, that  in that Cafe, the faid Companies fliould not be bound, to  reftore and make good the Proportion fo loft, by any new  Provifion and Importation. IX. That this ContraiSt fliould commence at .MV/i»i7^/mas, 1622, and continue for the Space of feven Years, then  next enfuing. This Book IV. "The History of VIRGINIA. This Contradt was certainly very well and cautioufly  worded, by Sir Edwin Sandys, who drew it, and was indeed  their conftant Draughtfman upon all fuch Occafions. But it  was at laft efteemed a very hard and pinching Bargain upon  the Trade ; and as a certain noble Perfon exprefled it, was  not to be looked upon as a pleafant Difh, well fauced and  feafoned, but as a bitter Potion, which muft, of neceiEty, be  fwallowed down, for avoiding greater Evils. The Earl of  Southampton therefore, earneftly defired the Company, duly  to confider each Article, and not to fpare to give their beft  Counfel and Advice, in fo weighty a Bufinefs, which fo  nearly concerned themfelves and the Colonies, it being not  only free, but demanded, as a Duty, from every Man, to  fpeak his Mind boldly, as his own Reafon fhould fuggeft.  But after a long Paufe, it appearing, that nothing more  could be faid, than had formerly been delivered, his Lordfliip, at the Company's Requefl, put it to the Queftion,  and it was ratified and confirmed, by an almoft unanimous  Confent, one Hand only being held up againft it. After  which, it was, by the Lord Cavendijh, their Governor,  propofed to, and confirmed by the Somer-IJlands Company,  with the like Unanimity. For the Adventurers in that Plantation, being abotit an hundred and twenty fix in Number,  were all likewife Members of the Virginia Company. But before the Bargain was throughly concluded and ratified by the Lord High Treafurer, he prefled in upon them  an Obligation, to import the forty thoufand Weight of Spanijh Tobacco, in the 'beft Varinas, with a Promife (which  however he did not keep) not to trouble them any farther,  if that was granted. The Company therefore yielded to it ;  on Condition, that fuch a Quantity of beft Varinas could be  procured. For there had been fome Years, when the  whole Importation of that Kind of Tobacco into Spain did  not amount to forty thoufand Weight. But if Varinas  could not be had, they undertook (to give his Majefty and  the Lord Treafurer Satisfaflion ) to import the ,reft of their  Quantity, in the beft and moft coft-ly Sorts of Spanijh Tobacco. It will doubtlefs be very furprifing to every thinking  Reader, to find a King thus load and opprefs his SubjecSs,  with the Im|)ortation of a foreign Commodity, of no Ufe  or NeceiEty, but of mere Luxury and Wantonnefs, and  that too, in the deareft and moft grievous Manner ; efpecially when that Commodity might be fupplied by our own  Colonies, and muft, in Spain, be paid for in hard Cafli,  as the Cafe then was. But to account for fo unconfcionable  a Proceeding, it muft ftill be obferved, that herein were anfwered the two grand Ends, which at that time lay neareft  84 to  250 rhe History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. i62z. to that Prince's Heart ; fince by taking oiF their deareft To- '^7 — V 'baccoes, he did the more oblige the Spanijh King and Na- S^ Franch fj^j,^ ^jjj (^rew motc Money into their Pockets, out of his  vemor. °' SubjecJts Purfes (which was, in Truth, fo much clear -Lofs  to the Englijh Nation ) and did alfo, at the fame time, advance his own Profit and Revenue. For as the King was,  by the ContracS, to have the clear Proceed of one Third  of all Tobacco imported, it was more to his Gain and Advantage, to have the beft Spanijh Tobaccoes, which would  then fell for eighteen or twenty Shillings a Pound, and fometimes more, than the Plantation Tobacco, which would  fcarcely fetch two and fix Pence a Pound. The Affair of the Contra£l:, being thus fettled and concluded, the next thing that fell under their Confideration,  was appointing proper Officers, with their Salaries ; and the  refolving on a fleady Courfe, for the Management of the  Bufmefs. For this Purpofe, a Committee was appointed  out of both the Companies, confifling of the Earl of Southampton, the Lords Cavendijh, Paget, and Houghton, Sir  "John Brooke, Sir Edwin Sandys, Sir fohn Davers, Meffirs.  Nicholas and yohn Farrars, the Deputies of the two Companies, Mr. Samuel Wrote, and otbers, Gentlemen and  Merchants, to the Number of twenty one in all. After a  whole Day's Confultation and Debate, they at lafl agreed  upon all Matters ; and the Lords Southampton and Cavendijh,  Treafurer and Governor of the Companies, reported the  Refult of their Deliberations, to their refpeftive Courts.  But firft, the Earl of Southampton, with much Candor and  Earneftnefs, entreated the Virginia Company, to deliver  their Opinions freely, either for, or againfl, what he fhould  then propound ; which ( he faid ) himfelf, the Council, and  Committee, had confulted iipon, not with Intent to conclude or determine any thing, nor to prejudice the Courts  in their Judgment, but only the better to prepare the Bufinefs for their Confideration ; looking upon themfelves, as  his Lordfhip exprefled it, only as Servants to the Court. After which Declaration, he proceeded and told them,  that, as it was propofed, and in fome Meafure concluded,  in the Preparative Court, they judged it neceflTary, that there  fliould be one principal Officer, by the Name of Direftor,  on whofe Sufficiency, Care, and Integrity, the whole Succefs of the Bufinefs did chiefly depend ; and that they conceived the faid Direftor would well deferve, for his Salary of  that Year, five hundred Pounds. Next to him, was a Deputy : For without fuch an Afliflant, it would be impoffible  for the Dire£tor, to undergo all the Burthen of Bufinefs,  that would lie upon him. And to this Office they conceived requifite  Book IV. The History of VIRGINIA. requifite an extraordinary Deal of Pains and Induftry, and  no fmall SuflSciency. The Third Officer was a Treafurer, ''  to iceep the Cafh. But altho' the Offices of Deputy and ^" P'-"'""  Treafurer were diftincft in themfelves, and would require ^^^J*^"'  two Perfons, yet the better to hufband the Expences for  that Year, they thought it beft (according to the Refolution of the Preparative Court) to join them both in one Perfon, for the prefent. And to this Officer, they allotted a  Salary of four hundred Pounds, for the current Year. Next  they conceived it neceflary, to have a Committee of, at  leaft, eight able and judicious Perfons, chofen out of the  two Companies, for felling and difpofing of their Tobaccoes,  and for aflifting the Director, with their Counfels, and Help,  in the feveral Parts of his Office ; which would be very many  and exceedingly weighty and important. And to thefe,  they appointed a Salary of fifty Pounds, a Man. And belides thefe principal Officers, he told them, there would be  neceffary, two Cafliiers, the one to be conftantly refident in  the Treafury, the other to receive and gather in the Monies ;  a Book-keeper; two Clerks; a Sollicitor ; a Hufband, to  whom the Cuftody.of the Warehoufes flipuld be committed ;  and a Beadle ; with a Houfe, for the Meetings of the Officers ; and Warehoufes, for the Reception of the Tobacco.  And the whole Amount of all thefe Salaries and Expences,  was computed at two thoufand Pounds a Year, which muft  be raifed upon the Tobacco. But as the Spanijh yaftly exceeded the Plantation Tobacco in Price, it was agreed, that  it fhould bear a double Proportion in the Rate of the Charges.  His Lordfhip farther told them, that they conceived it  neceflary, that there fhould be five hundred Pounds more  fet apart, for fuch contingent Expences, as fhould occafionally arife ; which Money, if it were not, by the Confent  and Order of the Courts, expended for the Advantage and  Improvement of the Price of Tobacco, was to be again repaid, to each Adventurer proportionably. And altho' this  Sum, of twenty five hundred Pounds a Year, might to many feem very great and extraordinary ; yet, he faid, confidering, that five hundred Pounds was not to be expended,  except for the evident Advantage of the Commodity ; and  that, of the two thoufand Pounds remaining, his Majefty  was to bear one third Part, and the Spanijh Tobacco a Proportion double to the reft, he conceived, it would be found  no great Burthen upon the Plantations (whofe Benefit was  the grand Point in View) but fuch, as it was hoped, would  be manifoldly repaid, by the Advancement of the Price.  And as to the Officers Salaries, he declared it to be his  Opinion, that they were far below the Pains, Care, and  Charge, that they mufl, of neceffity, be at. The  rhe History of VIRGINIA. Book IV. The Earl of Southampton having thus finiflied his Report,  ' there followed, for fome time, a general Silence among the  Sr Francis Adventurers. Whereupon his Lordfliip entreated them,  vemor. "" freely to fpeak their Minds concerning all thefe things, and  to declare, w^hat and how^ they w^ould have them done.  And he repeated it again, that they efteemed themfelves only as their Minifters or Servants, to prepare Bufinefs for the  Court, in w^hom alone, was Power and Authority to determine and conclude Matters. He therefore earneftly entreated them, without Refpedl to himfelf, or any others,  from whom thofe Propofitions came, to declare their Opinions freely, efpecially concerning the Salaries, which, he  perceived, was the grand Rock of Offence. Hereupon, Mr. Robert Smith, the Under-ChamberIain, faid ; th^t he thought, many able Gentlemen might  be found, who, for Confcience Sake, would do the Bufinefs  for far lefs Salaries. To which Sir Edward Sackvil replied ;  that for his Part, he thought Men bound in Confcience, to  give thofe whom they employed, fome -reafonable SatiffacSion for their Labour and Pains ; and that he had found  by Experience, that fome Men, who had, for Confcience  Sake, ferved the Company, had alfo, for Confcience Sake,  undone it. But the Earl of Southampton, to foften the Quicknefs of Sir Edward SackvU's Reply, and to encourage a Freedom of Debate, declared, that Mr. Robert Smith was a very  worthy and honeft Man ; and he thanked him, for fpeaking  his Mind freely, defiring all others to do the fame. After  which, there enfued a fhort Debate ; and it was often obferved, in the Progrefs of the Affair, that this was properly  a Point of Merchandife, and not of fettling Colonies ; and  that it was not jufl or reafonable, to expeft, that Men, fit  to be trufted with, and capable to perform, fo important  a Bufinefs, fhould expend their whole Time and Labour,  for the Advancement of other Mens Effates, without any  Reward or Retribution at all. Mr. Barker alfo now faid ;  that, having been, many Years, a Member of that Court,  he had never heard of fuch great Salaries, as four and five  hundred Pounds a Year ; but that he had however heard of  five hundred, and a thoufand Poufids, deficient in the Accounts of fome Officers, who did their Bufinefs for nothing.  Soon after, the Earl of Southampton was called upon, to  put the feveral Propofitions to the Vote. But his Lordfhip  faid, he would once more read them over to them ; which  having done, and no Man making any Objedlion, after a  good Paufe, he put the fevfral things, concerning the Officers and Salaries, above rdated, diflinftly to the Queflion,  and they were all approved and confirmed. They Book IV. 'Be History 0/ VIRGINIA. 253 They then proceeded to the Election of their Officers. i6aa. Sir Edwin Sandys had been nominated, in a former Court, ''^ — y ' to the Place of Diredior ; but he earneftly refufed it, as be- ^" Francis  ing unexperienced in Matter of Trade and Merchandifej^^^^J^ °"  in which that Officer ought to have an exadt Knowledge ;  and as he could not conftantly refide in Town, having a  ■great Family in the Country. Befides which, he faid, he  began, as he now grew old, to wax weak ; and therefore  purpofed, rather to withdraw from all Bufinefs of the World, ' than to engage himfelf farther in it. But the Court, efpecially the Earl of Southampton and the other Lords, being  not fatisfied with this Excufe, earneftly prefled him, not  to refufe a Place, wherein he might do fuch lingular Service to the Colonies ; the whole Welfare of which did, almoft entirely depend, upon the wife and upright Management of this Contradt. No other Perfon therefore being  fo much as named- againft him, and himfelf rather not oppoling, than confenting to accept the Place, he w;as, upon  the Ballot, chofen DirecStor, by having fixty five Balls for,  and only five againft him. Mr. yohn Farrar had alfo, at  the fame Court, been named to the joint Place of Deputy  and Treafurer ; but he likewife refufed, alledging, that the  Company had laid fuch a Burthen of Bufinpfs upon him,  for now almoft four Years together, that he had been obliged to negleft his own private Affairs, which required his  immediate and diligent Infpeftion. All which the Court  acknowledged to be true ; yet declared, they held him fo fit  a Man for that Place, that they would not propofe any other  to ftand in Eleftion with him ; and fo he was chofen, by  having fixty eight Balls for, and only two againft him. They  then made Choice bf their Committee, and inferior Officers ;  and alfo added a Committee extraordinary, to be chofen out  of the Council, without Salaries. They were not obliged ,  to a conftant Attendance ; but were only to give their Advice and Affiftance to the Diredlor and other afting Committee, in Cafes of a high and extraordinary Nature. And  this Committee confifted of the Lords Paget and Maynard,  Sir Edward Sackvil, Sir John Brooke^ Sir "John Dctvers^ Sir  Henry Mildmay^ Mr. Thomas Gibbs, Mr. Samuel Wrote^  Mr. John Smithy and Mr. Rbbert Smith.  TrfE 254  THE HISTORY OF  V. I R G I N I A. BOOK V. 1622.  HAVE, in the former Book, been the more  full and exa£l, in relating the Affair of the Officers and Salaries, as it afterwards became the  Subject of much Wrangling and Contention.  There was one Mr. Samuel Wrote, a Gentleman of Fortune and Diftincftion in the Company, who had,  ever till now, behaved himfelf with great Moderation,  Judgment, and Induftry, and had therefore been elected of  his Majefty's Council for Virginia. This Gentleman did  fuddenly, in a fubfequent Court, held on the 4th of December this Year, break forth into much Violence, Indecency, and Opprobrioufnefs of Language ; and endeavoured, to call into queftion and cancel, in an inferior and ordinary Court, what had been fettled and determined, by the  Authority of a Great and General Quarter Court. He  faid, that this Affair, which was of efpecial Confequence  to the Company, had been propofed and paffed, without  that due Preparation, which the Laws and Orders of the  Company required in the like Cafes ; that the lawful and  regular Courfe had not been taken for preparing Matters,  but they had been haftily fhuffled over ; that the Bufinefs  o£ the Salaries, in particular, was not duly committed, but carried  BookV. T/6e History 0/ VIRGINIA. carried fo